/* Generated by MyAnimeList-Scrape https://github.com/shaggyze/MyAnimeList-Scrape
Template=#tags-[ID]:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: '[DESC]';}
Filter=
*/
#tags-49596:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Yoichi Isagi was mere moments away from scoring a goal that would have sent his high school soccer team to the nationals, but a split-second decision to pass the ball to his teammate cost him that reality. Bitter, confused, and disappointed, Isagi wonders if the outcome would have been different had he not made the pass. When the young striker returns home, an invitation from the Japan Football Union awaits him. Through an arbitrary and biased decision-making process, Isagi is one of three hundred U-18 strikers selected for a controversial project named Blue Lock. The projects ultimate goal is to turn one of the selected players into the star striker for the Japanese national team. To find the best participant, each diamond in the rough must compete against others through a series of solo and team competitions to rise to the top. Putting aside his ethical objections to the project, Isagi feels compelled to fight his way to the top, even if it means ruthlessly crushing the dreams of 299 aspiring young strikers. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-357:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Sakura Kusakabe, a mere junior high student, has committed a horrible crime. Or, rather, he will commit a crime-20 years into the future. The crime in question? He will prevent all women from developing past the age of 12, with immortality as an unintended side effect. As a result, the angel Dokuro Mitsukai is sent from the future as an assassin, armed with with a magical spiked bat named Excalibolg. However, rather than kill him, Dokuro wants to take a different approach. She resolves to be a constant nuisance to Sakura, in an attempt to prevent him from focusing on anything long enough to create his criminal technology. With Dokuro going against orders, the angel Sabato is sent out to complete Dokuros mission. Between the impulsive Dokuro-who often murders Sakura with her bat before reviving him with the magic words \"Pipiru piru piru pipiru pi\"-and the electric baton-wielding Sabato, Sakuras life will never be peaceful again. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-53411:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'On Christmas Eve, four-year-old Miri Unasaka arrives in Tokyo completely alone, in search of her father. The bright lights and merry atmosphere guide Miri to a big hotel and a man with a delicious-looking cake. However, the child has just unknowingly walked into the center of an elaborate, foolproof plan for assassinating a dangerous mafia boss. Professional assassins Kazuki Kurusu and Rei Suwa live together, fleeing memories of their grim childhoods and avoiding emotional connections. When their mission goes awry and they end up bringing Miri home, there is only one reasonable thing to do: return Miri to her mother. But the girls innocent laugh and pure worldview quickly enamor her to Kazuki, who secretly enjoys playing a parent, and it is not long before Reis impenetrable heart makes room for Miri. Miris every move is unpredictable, and Kazuki and Rei find raising an energetic child harder than any of their missions. Although it presents a great risk to their careers, Kazuki and Rei-both assuming the affectionate nickname \"papa\"-decide to provide Miri with a normal childhood despite all the odds stacked against them. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-51680:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Despite their distinctive personalities, Souma Shiki, Hayate Ichikura, Shun Futami, and Takayuki Mima all have one thing in common: though naturally clumsy, the four disguise their embarrassment from tiny slip-ups by maintaining a composed demeanor. However, it is actually the guys airheaded natures that makes the girls hearts throb. No matter what happens in their daily lives, the boys do their best not to lose their cool! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-10851:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Keisuke Takatou wakes up in a featureless white room, unaware of how and when he arrived. While exploring his whereabouts, he notices six familiar girls huddled around a large monitor-his childhood friend Kanae Hokari, the class president Miyakou Ando, his English teacher Natsuki Aoi, his junior Rika Makiba, and his classmates Rinne Byakuya and Nemu Manaka. As they attempt to make sense of their current situation, a voice suddenly declares through the monitor, \"The game will now begin.\" The rules of the game are simple yet brutal; assigned as the \"unlocker,\" Keisuke must select one of the girls as his \"keyhole\" and violate her in a specific manner. Only after he does this for five rounds will the group be promised freedom to the outside world. Refusing to acknowledge the situation, Miyakou vehemently denies her participation. Suddenly, the entire room goes dark. When the lights come back on, Miyakou is strapped to an electric chair. \"Withdrawal from the game will result in death,\" announces the mysterious voice as the chair electrocutes her to death. Left with no other option, the terrified captives concede, and thus begins the sadistic game that will awaken their carnal desires through pain-and pleasure. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-28891:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Following their participation at the Inter-High, the Karasuno High School volleyball team attempts to refocus their efforts, aiming to conquer the Spring tournament instead. When they receive an invitation from long-standing rival Nekoma High, Karasuno agrees to take part in a large training camp alongside many notable volleyball teams in Tokyo and even some national level players. By playing with some of the toughest teams in Japan, they hope not only to sharpen their skills, but also come up with new attacks that would strengthen them. Moreover, Hinata and Kageyama attempt to devise a more powerful weapon, one that could possibly break the sturdiest of blocks. Facing what may be their last chance at victory before the senior players graduate, the members of Karasunos volleyball team must learn to settle their differences and train harder than ever if they hope to overcome formidable opponents old and new-including their archrival Aoba Jousai and its world-class setter Tooru Oikawa. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-34403:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Following a prank pulled by his perverse friends, Junichi Hashiba asks a gal out in an attempt to change the fact that hes a hopeless virgin. Yukana Yame, the girl in question, is disgusted by Junichis groveling. However, through a series of teasing remarks, she soon finds herself bonding with him and ultimately accepting Junichis confession, much to his surprise. Hajimete no Gal follows Junichi as he overcomes his lack of self-confidence and suppresses his sexual urges, all while thrust into a whole new school life full of lively girls and unpredictable mayhem. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-21877:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The year is 1991, and arcade video games are the latest craze. Becoming a professional gamer is a far-fetched dream in an industry that has yet to spread its influence. Yet, that is the path sixth-grader Haruo Yaguchi wants to pursue. His aptitude for video games has earned him respect in local arcades and bestowed him with confidence and pride, both of which are shattered when fellow classmate Akira Oono easily defeats him in Street Fighter 2. Akira is rich, pretty, and smart-as close as can be to a perfect girl. But Haruo had never cared about these things as, despite his multiple shortcomings as a person, his supremacy in video games was, in his mind, undisputed. So, now that someone has appeared who can rival him, part of Haruo cannot help but loathe her. Another part, however, itches for somebody who can compete with him on equal terms, and Akira is more than capable. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38276:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Miki Takekasa is an introverted high schooler who does not socialize with her classmates. However, she wants to know what \"fun\" really is, waiting for someone who could help her understand its true meaning. One day after school, she crosses paths with her classmate Aya Takayashiki, who takes her on a little adventure. Miki discovers wonders she had never seen before, opening a way to change her withdrawn life. On their way home, Miki and Aya see their class representative Midori Oono entering Saikoro Club, a store specializing in board games. After trying out a German board game, Miki soon understands the kind of fun she had been looking for: playing various games after school along with the friends and acquaintances she makes from her newfound pleasure. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50197:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Hayase Nagatoro and Naoto Hachiouji have grown closer: the girl spends more time than ever in the art club room with her senpai. Although he is always on edge, Naoto no longer seems to mind Nagatoros presence. Time and again, Naoto demonstrates his hidden, cool demeanor, and Nagatoro displays her possessive tendencies. However, they still can not seem to completely close the distance between them. It is clear to everyone else that the pair have feelings for each other. For Nagatoro, there is nothing more entertaining than toying with Naoto. But as the girl shows no plans to stop teasing her senpai, it is only a matter of time before they realize how they truly feel. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-51265:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'On a rainy afternoon, a male high school student awakens freezing on the streets with no memory of how he got there. His classmate and crush, Karen Inukai, finds him and takes him back to her home where, to his surprise, she starts to undress. She seems intent on bathing with him, though he has no idea why. When she holds him once more, he catches a glimpse of himself in the mirror-discovering that he has turned into a dog! Inukai adopts the puppy and names him Pochita. Now, he must adjust to life as a dog and figure out how to get out of this strange predicament. But while he mulls over an escape plan, Pochita sees a whole new side to Inukai that he never saw at school. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48316:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'For as long as he can remember, Minoru Kagenou has been fixated on becoming as strong as possible, which has led him to undertake all kinds of rigorous training. This wish, however, does not stem from a desire to be recognized by others; rather, Minoru does everything he can to blend in with the crowd. So, while pretending to be a completely average student during the day, he arms himself with a crowbar and ruthlessly thrashes local biker gangs at night. Yet when Minoru finds himself in a truck accident, his ambitions seemingly come to a sudden end. In his final moments, he laments his powerlessness-no matter how much he trained, there was nothing he could do to overcome his human limitations. But instead of dying, Minoru reawakens as Cid, the second child of the noble Kagenou family, in another world-one where magic is commonplace. With the power he so desired finally within his grasp, he dons the moniker \"Shadow\" and establishes Shadow Garden: a group whose sole purpose is to combat the enigmatic Cult of Diablos, an organization born from Cids imagination. However, as Shadow Garden grows in both membership and influence, it becomes increasingly apparent that the Cult of Diablos is not as fictional as Cid had intended. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-5042:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When Keita Suminoes father remarried, not only did he gain a new mother, but elder twin sisters as well. Distinct yet similar, the homely and mature Ako is a former student council president, while the athletic and aloof Riko is the previous disciplinary president. The three of them have been together since kindergarten, resulting in a deep bond between the siblings. However, over time, their relationship developed into something more romantic-and erotic . Now in his last year of middle school, Keita has already received a sports recommendation, but its from a different high school than his two sisters. Disappointed, both sisters try to change his mind, and he agrees, giving in to their desperate pleas. Unaware of the consequences, he now has to attempt to study for his high school exams while warding off the advances of his lust-driven sisters. With their parents blessings, Ako and Riko strive to be Keitas future wife, leaving him to try his best to keep the relationship between them strictly platonic. However, with two beautiful girls vying for his attention, will Keita be able to withstand the endless temptations? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33489:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: '\"A believing heart is your magic!\"-these were the words that Atsuko \"Akko\" Kagaris idol, the renowned witch Shiny Chariot, said to her during a magic performance years ago. Since then, Akko has lived by these words and aspired to be a witch just like Shiny Chariot, one that can make people smile. Hence, even her non-magical background does not stop her from enrolling in Luna Nova Magical Academy. However, when an excited Akko finally sets off to her new school, the trip there is anything but smooth. After her perilous journey, she befriends the shy Lotte Yansson and the sarcastic Sucy Manbavaran. To her utmost delight, she also discovers Chariots wand, the Shiny Rod, which she takes as her own. Unfortunately, her time at Luna Nova will prove to more challenging than Akko could ever believe. She absolutely refuses to stay inferior to the rest of her peers, especially to her self-proclaimed rival, the beautiful and gifted Diana Cavendish, so she relies on her determination to compensate for her reckless behavior and ineptitude in magic. In a time when wizardry is on the decline, Little Witch Academia follows the magical escapades of Akko and her friends as they learn the true meaning of being a witch. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49376:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After one last tournament and an embarrassing loss in the final round, Michi decides to call it quits on the sport of judo. Between high school social activities and entrance exams, shell have no time to compete in the martial art she loves most, but putting aside old hobbies is a normal part of growing up. Still, the love of judo lingers-and it comes back full force when she meets her new classmate Towa, the girl who bested Michi in her final match! Towa wants to form a judo club at their school, but shell need new members to get it up and running. United by their love of judo, theyll throw in their passions into the ring together and score ippon again! (Source: HIDIVE) ';}
#tags-34978:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A skilled, deadly ninja on the clock and an adorable, na&iuml;ve girl off it, Chidori continues to pave the way forward for her master, Nobunaga Oda, in his conquest of the Land of the Rising Sun. Though Nobunaga has made great progress in his quest, uniting a nation has not become any easier. Between vindictive former enemies and powerful new rivals, his stubborn adversaries have taken up arms to stamp out the warlords ambitions. However, standing beside the ambitious general are his many close friends and supporters, including one loyal, capable shinobi. Ready to serve in whatever way she can, Chidori gathers key allies, infiltrates enemy castles, and duels against skilled warriors in the name of realizing her lords dream: establishing a unified Japan. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-51678:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Self-professed \"home security guard\" Mahiro Oyama has not left his home in years, secluding himself in his room playing erotic visual novels. This depraved lifestyle causes his prodigious sister, Mihari, to worry about his well-being. In hopes of solving this problem, she devises a plan to rehabilitate him back to normalcy. The first part of Miharis plan is to concoct a medicine that changes her brothers biological constitution into a bona fide female, much to Mahiros vehement dismay. Stuck in this predicament, Mahiro has no choice but to live out his life as a cute girl until the effect wears off-if it ever does. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32013:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'At first glance, Galko, Otako, and Ojou are three high school girls who seem like they wouldnt have anything to do with each other. Galko is a social butterfly with a reputation for being a party animal, even though she is actually innocent and good-hearted despite her appearance. Otako is a plain-looking girl with a sarcastic personality and a rabid love of manga. And Ojou is a wealthy young lady with excellent social graces, though she can be a bit absent-minded at times. Despite their differences, the three are best friends, and together they love to talk about various myths and ask candid questions about the female body. Oshiete! Galko-chan is a lighthearted and humorous look at three very different girls and their frank conversations about themselves and everyday life. No topic is too safe or too sensitive for them to joke about-even though every so often, Galko seems to get a bit embarrassed by their discussions! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50739:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Mahiru Shiina is worthy of her nickname \"Angel\": she is a divine beauty loved by all, and she excels in both academics and athletics. Shiina lives in an entirely different world from Amane Fujimiya, her next-door neighbor. Despite living so close together, they have never spoken once. But their silence is broken when Fujimiya spots Shiina gloomily sitting on a swing amidst a heavy rainstorm and lends her his umbrella. When Fujimiya catches a cold the next day, Shiina wishes to return the favor for the umbrella by nursing him back to health. Believing that this would be their first and last interaction, he silently appreciates her kindness. However, Shiina-who can not help but worry about Fujimiyas lack of tidiness and proper nutrition-begins to cook and clean for him. As the unlikely pair spend time together in Fujimiyas apartment, they explore the true nature of their relationship and the gentle emotions that emerge from it. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-51252:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A decade ago, mankind witnessed the deadly potential of weapons caused by the Great War. To avoid another catastrophe, governments worldwide have resorted to espionage to fulfill their agendas. In the Din Republic, Lily is an enthusiastic young girl who aspires to become a spy and serve her nation. However, she begins to doubt her abilities, as she struggles to perform well academically. Lilys passion is reignited when she is offered provisional graduation by joining the spy team Lamplight, which she eagerly accepts despite the enigmatic nature of the opportunity. Upon arriving at her destination, Lily is surprised to find six other girls waiting there, all of whom have faced their own academic difficulties as well. A mysterious man named Klaus soon appears and reveals they must complete an \"Impossible Mission\": to infiltrate the Galgad Empire after just one month of training. Although skeptical, the girls eventually agree to work together under Klaus guidance-as this might be their only chance to prove their worth as spies. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-52305:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Tomo Aizawa and Junichirou \"Jun\" Kubota are the tightest bros you would ever see. They roughhouse and spar, but through thick and thin, they have got each others back. Yet, there is just one small problem: Tomo is in love with Jun! Since she was young, tomboyish Tomo has been just another one of the guys; due to his extreme muscle-brained nature, Jun does not notice any of her advances-not even when she explicitly confesses. To add insult to injury, for the longest time, he did not even realize that she was a girl. Will Tomo ever be able to catch Juns eye and escape the infamous bro zone? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-481:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Yuugi Mutou is a na&iuml;ve and lonely high school student who is fascinated by games. While staying with his grandfather, the owner of a game shop, he comes across an ancient Egyption relic known as the \"Millennium Puzzle.\" Rumored to grant any wish to those who solve the Puzzle, Yuugi becomes determined to solve it to wish for some friends. After years of struggling, Yuugi manages to complete the puzzle and mysteriously finds that his wish has been fulfilled. Meanwhile, a new card game known as \"Duel Monsters\" starts rising in popularity. In this game, players called duelists fight against each other with \"monsters\" by using magic and trap cards to foil their opponents plans. Yuugi quickly becomes skilled at the game and lives a peaceful life with his newfound friends. However, Yuugis peace is short-lived. The undefeated duelist and egocentric billionaire Seto Kaiba suddenly abducts Yuugis grandfather, forcing him to duel against the rare \"Blue Eyes White Dragon card. Yuugi is thrown into a new world of fierce battles and the stakes continue to rise as dark forces interfere from the shadows. After unexpectedly defeating Kaiba with the help of his \"other self\"-the spirit of a nameless pharaoh-contained in the puzzle, he unofficially becomes the top duelist known as \"The King of Games.\" However, this new title will attract covetousness and Yuugi will have to use all his intelligence and willpower in order to protect what he holds the dearest to him. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38474:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Having spent Christmas camping with her new friends, Rin Shima embarks on a solo-camping trip to see the New Year sunrise by the sea. All goes according to plan until unforeseen weather blocks the roads back home, making a return trip impossible. Rin, who is now stranded for a few days, is invited by Nadeshiko Kagamihara to stay at her grandmothers house. What is supposed to be a two-day trip becomes an extended period of sightseeing and new experiences for Rin, and she encounters some new and old faces along the way. Yuru Camp△ Season 2 continues the story of Rin, Nadeshiko, and their friends as they further explore the joys of camping. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33993:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'One day at the supermarket, a boy meets Manami Sugiura, a petite girl looking at the snacks corner, mulling over as to which snack to buy with her limited budget. Enticed by her cuteness, the boy decides to treat her to a snack worth 300 yen, but only in exchange for something somewhat inappropriate. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-51464:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'What do an alien, former ninja, weak telepath, and boy pretending to be a girl have in common? They are all classmates at Kashihara Girls Academy, and they hide their true identities from the world. Rikka, Chiyo, Sekine, and Tsubasa seem like the best of friends, but they each harbor a monumental secret that they cannot reveal, no matter what. In order to continue masquerading as normal middle school girls, each of them must invent creative ways to conceal their true selves. But that is easier said than done, as the four students end up entangled in numerous shenanigans along the way. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38101:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Fuutarou Uesugi is an ace high school student, but leads an otherwise tough life. His standoffish personality and reclusive nature have left him friendless, and his father is debt-ridden, forcing his family to scrape by. One day during his lunch break, Uesugi argues with a female transfer student who has claimed \"his seat,\" leading both of them to dislike each other. That same day, he is presented with a golden opportunity to clear his familys debt: a private tutoring gig for a wealthy familys daughter, with a wage of five times the market price. He accepts the proposal, but is horrified to discover that the client, Itsuki Nakano, is the girl he confronted earlier! After unsuccessfully trying to get back on Itsukis good side, Uesugi finds out that his problems dont end there: Itsuki is actually a quintuplet, so in addition to her, he must also tutor her sisters-Miku, Yotsuba, Nino, and Ichika-who, despite the very real threat of flunking, want nothing to do with a tutor. However, his familys livelihood is on the line so Uesugi pushes on, adamant in his resolve to rid the sisters of their detest for studying and successfully lead them to graduation. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-39783:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Through their tutor Fuutarou Uesugis diligent guidance, the Nakano quintuplets academic performance shows signs of improvement, even if their path to graduation is still rocky. However, as they continue to cause various situations that delay any actual tutoring, Fuutarou becomes increasingly involved with their personal lives, further complicating their relationship with each other. On another note, Fuutarou slowly begins to realize the existence of a possible connection between him and the past he believes to have shared with one of the five girls. With everyones feelings beginning to develop and overlap, will they be able to keep their bond strictly to that of a teacher and his students-or will it mature into something else entirely? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32484:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Based on the adult manga by Kou Okada. ';}
#tags-49520:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Beginning his first year of high school, all Matsuboshi Raidou wants is to make friends-starting with the cute, tiny, and soft-spoken Reina Aharen, who sits right next to him in class. Unbeknownst to Raidou, Reina shares the same sentiment, but she has a problem. Awkward and timid, Reina is incapable of determining how chummy she has to be when approaching a person. Due to Reinas complete inability to gauge personal space, the two struggle to spark their unlikely friendship, as even the simplest tasks like talking seem impossible for them. But despite the countless yet pointless challenges that hinder the pair, the overly imaginative Raidou will do whatever it takes to befriend the indecipherable Reina. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-34881:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Yoshiko Hanabatake is an idiot beyond all belief. Somehow managing to consistently score zeroes on all of her tests and consumed by an absurd obsession with bananas, her senseless acts have caused even her own mother to lose all hope. Only one person is up to the task of keeping her insanity in check: childhood friend Akuru \"A-kun\" Akutsu. Though he bemoans the ridiculous behavior he has to endure, the studious but terrifying A-kun is always ready to put an end to any stupidity Yoshiko gets up to, with no qualms about using physical force. Unfortunately, no matter how many times he attempts to knock some sense into her, the girl bounces right back to her usual shenanigans, even dragging in some other eccentrics along for the ride. Try as he might to rein in her nonsense, every moment is unpredictable with Yoshiko and her profound idiocy on the loose. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-17082:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'As spring vacation comes to a close, a new school semester approaches. Deciding to make the most of the remaining holiday, Ayuko Uehara takes a stroll into her neighborhood and stops by a small cafe. However, her peaceful day is abruptly disturbed when a girl clumsily bumps into her. Left puzzled by the encounter, Ayaku is even more surprised when she meets them again as freshmen at the same high school she attends. Recognizing her from the store, the girls introduce themselves as Kanaka Amaya and Saki Iwasawa, and the three quickly become friends. As they go through their daily lives as high school girls, the trios distinct personalities-Kanakas happy-go-lucky attitude, Sakis tomboyish behavior, and Ayukos easygoingness-are sure to make every mundane school day filled with silly and fun interactions. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48553:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Ever since she was young, Komichi Akebi has always adored sailor uniforms, even going so far as to ask her mother to sew one if she succeeds in getting into her mothers alma mater, Roubai Academy. And thus, when she gets accepted into the prestigious school, Komichi is ecstatic. However, much to her surprise, the middle school no longer uses sailor uniforms as its dress code-making Komichi stand out from her schoolmates. Despite this, Komichi is granted permission to continue wearing the traditional attire. With renewed confidence, Komichi meets fascinating classmates as they experience school life together. Under the colorful shower of blossoming prospects, an exciting tomorrow awaits them! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-52193:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The innocent Nagomi Wahira has always admired the cute girls serving at maid cafes. Hoping to fulfill her dream of becoming one, she moves to Akihabara to work at the maid cafe Ton Tokoton. Nagomis first day seems completely normal-until she has to run an \"errand\" at a rival maid cafe along with her fellow recruit, the mature Ranko Mannen. There, things quickly go south, and Nagomi soon gets her first taste of Akihabaras violent maid wars. As she watches Ranko calmly battle her way through a horde of gun- and knife-wielding maids, Nagomi realizes that maid cafes are drastically unlike what she had envisioned. While struggling to reconcile her expectations with the harsh reality she finds herself in, Nagomi searches for the enjoyment she once saw in the lives of maids. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32828:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Since the death of his wife, Kouhei Inuzuka has been caring for his young daughter Tsumugi to the best of his abilities. However, with his lack of culinary knowledge and his busy job as a teacher, he is left relying on ready-made meals from convenience stores to feed the little girl. Frustrated at his own incapability to provide a fresh, nutritious meal for his daughter, Kouhei takes up an offer from his student, Kotori Iida, to come have dinner at her familys restaurant. But on their very first visit, the father and daughter discover that the restaurant is often closed due to Kotoris mother being away for work and that Kotori often eats alone. After much pleading from his pupil, Kouhei decides to continue to go to the restaurant with Tsumugi to cook and share delicious homemade food with Kotori. Amaama to Inazuma follows the heartwarming story of a caring father trying his hardest to make his adorable little daughter happy, while exploring the meanings and values behind cooking, family, and the warm meals at home that are often taken for granted. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49938:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Kousuke and Natsume have been friends since childhood, but as time goes on, the relationship between the two sixth graders seems strained as they keep avoiding each other. One day during the summer vacation, they visit a housing complex that is scheduled to be demolished. Having grown up there, the place holds a lot of memories, but while playing, they suddenly get caught up in a mysterious phenomenon. When they regain consciousness, they see an entire ocean before them as the housing complex has drifted into a mysterious sea with Kousuke, Natsume, and others in it. Will they be able to return to their previous world? A summer farewell journey begins... (Source: Netflix, edited) ';}
#tags-28981:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Aoi Tokura is a server at Rainy Color, a cozy and diverse cafe known for its hot cocoa. Along with barista Shion Koga, Aoi serves a small crowd of regulars who are attracted by his girlish good looks. When two handsome college students start frequenting the cafe as well, Aoi cannot help but be drawn into their lives. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33245:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Ame-iro Cocoa: Rainy Cocoa Goes to Hawaii!! Nozomu Tokura, who is Aois older brother, is appointed as the manager of the Hawaii store. With more new characters, will he be able to open up the store there successfully? ';}
#tags-35923:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The series follows Nozomu Tokura as he tries to get more sales to the cafe he recently opened with the new helpers he met. ';}
#tags-31139:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Life at the Rainy Color café can never be described as boring. The arrival of the Koga brothers from England-Noel, always brimming with curiosity, and Nicola, somewhat shy and conservative-ensures that their sibling, café manager Shion, is kept on his toes. Theres also another newcomer, cameraman/photographer Jun Arisawa, who holds a mysterious connection to café owner Koji Amami. Last but not least, theres a special photograph that incites all kinds of heartfelt and comedic reactions from the Rainy Color crew! (Source: YTV) ';}
#tags-37747:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'In the fifth season of the Ame-iro Cocoa series Youko, the daughter of the Rainy Color cafes owner Kouji Amami, takes over as the acting manager of the cafe. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-37206:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Kohane Hatoyas most lovable trait is also her greatest flaw. She loves to help others no matter how far she has to go in order to get the job done. Her biggest inspiration to do so comes to light when she sees what cheerleading looks like for the first time in middle school. Now a highschooler but as enthusiastic as ever, Kohane wants nothing more than to start her very own cheerleading squad. Shes encouraged by her best friend, Uki Sawatari, who often has to help her get out of trouble. There is just one problem: Kohane does not have any experience in cheerleading. She has absolutely no idea what to do, what to wear, or how to perform. To make matters worse, she has been scared of heights since childhood, and this new sport is full of stunts pulled far from the ground for a girl her size. Enter Hizume Arima, a former cheerleader who wishes to leave her pastime behind. Unfortunately for her, Kohane recognizes Hizume, and will stop at nothing just so she can lead the new squad, even if it means facing her childhood fear. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-31519:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: '\"Move your soul and body!\" Each episode contains a variety of routines, such as push-ups, sit-ups, spine twists, dance, yoga, stretches, trunk training, and taichi. Five girls aiming to become idols will exercise with you, and that troubling body fat percentage will go down by 1000%...!? ';}
#tags-33746:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Sequel of Anitore! EX. New member Sakura Izumi joins the five idol candidates of the previous season. A second year middle schooler, she often wears a big smile on her face. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-31080:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Tennomifune Academy is an elite institution for the best and the brightest, with the exception of Class 1-7, the so-called \"Happiness Class.\" Each member of the classroom copes with personal misfortunes, and the special class is geared to help them move past their issues and find true happiness. After being accepted into the academy, An Hanakoizumi, Ruri Hibarigaoka, and Botan Kumegawa find themselves placed into the Happiness Class, plagued by dreadful luck, love problems, and bad health respectively. Alongside their classmates, they do their best to overcome the difficulties they are faced with in pursuit of a life filled with joy. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-11111:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'In class 3-3 of Yomiyama North Junior High, transfer student Kouichi Sakakibara makes his return after taking a sick leave for the first month of school. Among his new classmates, he is inexplicably drawn toward Mei Misaki-a reserved girl with an eyepatch whom he met in the hospital during his absence. But none of his classmates acknowledge her existence; they warn him not to acquaint himself with things that do not exist. Against their words of caution, Kouichi befriends Mei-soon learning of the sinister truth behind his friends apprehension. The ominous rumors revolve around a former student of the class 3-3. However, no one will share the full details of the grim event with Kouichi. Engrossed in the curse that plagues his class, Kouichi sets out to discover its connection to his new friend. As a series of tragedies arise around them, it is now up to Kouichi, Mei, and their classmates to unravel the eerie mystery-but doing so will come at a hefty price. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-11701:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Shortly before the start of a new semester, Misaki Fujioka visits her twin sister Mei Misaki in Yomiyama City. The girls make full use of the last days of summer, roaming around a heat-weary town and visiting various places including a shopping center and shooting stall. When they prowl around her basement, Mei expresses uneasiness about her new class, which is said to be cursed. Craving more entertainment, the twins decide to pay a visit to the local amusement park. But the leisure of a sleepy summer day could soon turn woeful as Mei sees the color of death on her sister-an unmistakable omen that a tragedy is bound to strike. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-24833:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Tucked in the mountains near the elite Kunugigaoka Middle School lies a small derelict building that houses the delinquents and dropouts of Class 3-E. Looked down upon by their peers, the students in this class appear to have little hope in advancing their academic careers. That is, until the national government tasks them with eliminating the greatest threat to their planet: their new teacher. Having already destroyed the moon, the octopus-like professor-dubbed \"Koro-sensei\"-has now threatened to destroy the Earth by March of the following year. In light of their mission, the students have found that killing him is easier said than done. Not only can Koro-sensei move at speeds of up to Mach 20, but he can also resist almost every earthly weapon. Ironically, he also proves to be one of the best teachers Class 3-E has ever had. Training the class to excel in both their studies as students and skills as assassins, Koro-sensei is confident that his students ingenuity and indomitable will could return them to the main campus. Through trial and error, Nagisa Shiota, as well as the other students of Class 3-E, must figure out Koro-senseis weaknesses-and fast, for the very fate of the world depends upon it. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-28391:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'With the invention of anti-gravitational shoes known as Grav-Shoes, the ability to fly freely has become an everyday experience for the people inhabiting a four-island archipelago south of Japan. This invention has brought the people new ways of living and also a new sport known as \"Flying Circus,\" where participants gain points by either touching floating buoys or their opponents back. The gullible and clumsy Asuka Kurashina, newly transferred to Kunahama High School, enters this world of flight unknowingly when she is able to pull off a difficult maneuver the first time she participates in a Flying Circus match. Eventually, this leads her to join her schools Flying Circus club. Led by their coach, Masaya Hinata, their members consist of the experienced Misaki Tobisawa and her overprotective friend, Mashiro Arisaka. Ao no Kanata no Four Rhythm follows this rookie group soaring high above the skies and toward their dreams, armed only with their unwavering passion against an uncertain future. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36214:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Yui Yamada, a high school girl with a fondness for plants and gardening, starts dating Tomoka Kase, the ace of her schools track team. Yui is shy, girly, and has never been in a relationship. On the other hand, Tomoka is vivacious, tomboyish, and popular among her friends. Despite being different in so many ways, they try to understand and support each other while experiencing the rush of exhilaration that accompanies the magic of first love. Asagao to Kase-san is a heartwarming tale of two girls dealing with their ever-increasing feelings for each other along with other concerns that plague the hearts of maidens in love. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-37171:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'During recess, Olivia, a foreign transfer student who doesnt know English, plays a game of \"look-the-other-way\" with Hanako Honda, a loud-mouthed airhead. Their rowdy behavior spurs the ire of Kasumi Nomura, a deadpan loner constantly teased by her older sister for her tendency to lose games. Not willing to compete, Kasumi declines Olivias offer to join the fun, but eventually gets involved anyway and dispenses her own brand of mischief. Soon, a strange friendship blossoms between the peculiar trio, and they decide to form the \"Pastime Club,\" where they are free to resume their daily hijinks. Whether it be failing to learn English, trying desperately to become popular, or getting caught by teachers at the wrong time, school life will never be boring when the girls of Asobi Asobase are up to their hilarious antics. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-7817:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Most people, including the girl herself, would say that first year high school student Yamada is beautiful and perfect. Despite this, she is working towards a peculiar goal: to have sex with one hundred men by the end of high school. Trying to put some sense into her head, Yamadas best friend, Miharu Takeshita, points out a major flaw in that plan-she is completely inexperienced with men. However, the reason behind this is that Yamada thinks her lady parts look strange and believes others will judge her for it. As a result, Yamada decides that her first time must be with a fellow virgin, since they will not hurt or scare her. After a fateful encounter, she sets her sights on the shy and average Takashi Kosuda, an aspiring photographer with a heart of gold. With contending rivals for his affection and her own raging hormones, Yamada must find ways to seduce Kosuda and take his cherry. However, as she gets closer to Kosuda, she finds herself increasingly enjoying their time spent together. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-30795:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Every day Hane Sakura makes the arduous trip to school, cycling up a large hill on her bicycle. After encountering the motorcycle enthusiast Onsa Amano one morning, she is introduced to the motorcycle club, led by the ever-silent Raimu Kawasaki. New to motorcycles, Sakura experiences firsthand the difficulty of learning to ride again. However, through this, she hopes to once again recreate her first biking experience, which was filled with both horror and exhilaration. Alongside Baita, the talking motorcycle; Rin Suzunoki, a Suzuki model enthusiast; Hijiri Minowa, a wealthy girl who dreams of being a thug; and professional racer Chisame Nakano, Sakura strives toward getting her bike license and experiencing the joys and hardships of motorcycles. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-22789:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Seishuu Handa is an up-and-coming calligrapher: young, handsome, talented, and unfortunately, a narcissist to boot. When a veteran labels his award-winning piece as \"unoriginal,\" Seishuu quickly loses his cool with severe repercussions. As punishment, and also in order to aid him in self-reflection, Seishuus father exiles him to the Goto Islands, far from the comfortable Tokyo lifestyle the temperamental artist is used to. Now thrown into a rural setting, Seishuu must attempt to find new inspiration and develop his own unique art style-that is, if boisterous children (headed by the frisky Naru Kotoishi), fujoshi middle schoolers, and energetic old men stop barging into his house! The newest addition to the intimate and quirky Goto community only wants to get some work done, but the islands are far from the peaceful countryside he signed up for. Thanks to his wacky neighbors who are entirely incapable of minding their own business, the arrogant calligrapher learns so much more than he ever hoped to. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33462:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: '​Sawako Machida-or \"Miss Bernard,\" as she prefers to be called-can frequently be found in the school library with a book in hand. Whether or not she has read it, however, is another matter entirely. In her own words, Sawako finds it too much work to actually read, and would rather just make others believe she spends a lot of time reading. But in the same library where she constantly hangs out, there are other students who love books and are quite upset with her disdainful approach to reading their favorite titles. As she pretends to read and discuss great literary works amid eccentric book lovers, Sawako finds herself learning something after all, as well as making new friends along the way. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-47917:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Yearning to make friends and perform live with a band, lonely and socially anxious Hitori \"Bocchi\" Gotou devotes her time to playing the guitar. On a fateful day, Bocchi meets the outgoing drummer Nijika Ijichi, who invites her to join Kessoku Band when their guitarist, Ikuyo Kita, flees before their first show. Soon after, Bocchi meets her final bandmate-the cool bassist Ryou Yamada. Although their first performance together is subpar, the girls feel empowered by their shared love for music, and they are soon rejoined by Kita. Finding happiness in performing, Bocchi and her bandmates put their hearts into improving as musicians while making the most of their fleeting high school days. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35712:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Haruka Shinozaki has been interested in the class representative, Akiho Kousaka, since his first year in high school. She is attractive, good at sports, and is an all-around model student. Since they are in the same class this year, Shinozaki decides to confess his feelings-and, to his shock, Kousaka agrees to be his girlfriend! However, he finds that Kousaka is a bit stranger than he first thought: this seemingly perfect girl has never been in a relationship. But even though she is inexperienced, she vows to please Shinozaki in every way she can... such as learning multiple sex positions or his fetishes. Shinozaki tries to assure her that her studies into such subjects arent necessary, but Kousaka devotes herself to making him happy in more ways than one. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36560:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Bundled with the limited edition sixth manga volume. ';}
#tags-1639:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Upbeat and effeminate Pico is working at his grandfathers coffee shop, Café Bebe, for the summer. Tamotsu is a white-collar worker looking for an escape from the mundanity of his everyday life. When they meet at the café, sparks of love and lust quickly draw the two together. Conventional notions of age, gender, and sexuality are broken down as the pair seeks carnal gratification in one anothers company. But do the pleasures of flesh equate to a connection between hearts? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-10719:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When Kodaka Hasegawa finds out that he will be transferring to a new school, he is determined to make a positive impression, and maybe even some friends. However, Kodaka discovers he is out of luck when he immediately gets labeled as a violent delinquent due to his blond hair and intimidating expression. Although a month has passed, Kodaka is still alone thanks to his notorious reputation. However, his life begins to change when he finds fellow loner Yozora Mikazuki talking to her imaginary friend in an empty classroom. After sharing stories of their lonely high school life, Kodaka and Yozora decide to overcome the difficulties of making friends together by starting the Neighbors Club. Created for people who dont have friends, daily activities involve learning social skills and how to fit in, which will hopefully allow them to make friends. Joined by the eroge-loving Sena Kashiwazaki, and other eccentric outcasts, Kodaka may finally have managed to find people he can call friends, in this club filled with hilarious oddballs. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33475:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The Private Aichi Symbiosis Academy was originally a high school for high-class girls. When it became co-ed, the girls, out of fear, asked to be permitted to bring weapons to school. When that was enforced, a five-member vigilante corps-like organization called the \"Supreme Five Swords\" was also formed. After many generations, the five swords eventually became a group which corrected problematic students, and the academy started proactively accepting such students in order to correct them. Nomura Fudou was sent to this school after being part of a huge brawl. What will he do when the only options he has after enrolling are being expelled from that school or being corrected the way the rest of the male students there were...by being forced to dress and act like a girl! (Source: Batoto, edited) ';}
#tags-35314:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Original 13th episode bundled with the limited edition 7th volume of the Busou Shoujo Machiavellianism manga. ';}
#tags-44511:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Denji is robbed of a normal teenage life, left with nothing but his deadbeat fathers overwhelming debt. His only companion is his pet, the chainsaw devil Pochita, with whom he slays devils for money that inevitably ends up in the yakuzas pockets. All Denji can do is dream of a good, simple life: one with delicious food and a beautiful girlfriend by his side. But an act of greedy betrayal by the yakuza leads to Denjis brutal, untimely death, crushing all hope of him ever achieving happiness. Remarkably, an old contract allows Pochita to merge with the deceased Denji and bestow devil powers on him, changing him into a hybrid able to transform his body parts into chainsaws. Because Denjis new abilities pose a significant risk to society, the Public Safety Bureaus elite devil hunter Makima takes him in, letting him live as long as he obeys her command. Guided by the promise of a content life alongside an attractive woman, Denji devotes everything and fights with all his might to make his naive dreams a reality. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-28999:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'If not for his ability to take over peoples mind and body, Yuu Otosaka would be an ordinary high school student. Though it only lasts for five seconds at a time, Yuus mysterious power allowed him to cheat his way to the top of his class and enter a prestigious high school, where he continues his dishonest acts. His shenanigans are eventually stopped by Nao Tomori-the headstrong student council president from Hoshinoumi Academy-who sees through his deceit. Through coercion, Nao convinces Yuu to transfer to Hoshinoumi and join the student council. Hoshinoumi Academy is secretly an institution created for adolescents who possess supernatural abilities-with the student council serving as a means of locating those who abuse their powers. With Yuu begrudgingly assisting in council affairs, the group sets out to find and protect new ability users from harm. However, as they further investigate the abilities, their findings entangle them in far more complicated matters than they could ever imagine. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-31553:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Takehito Kumagamis clairvoyance leads his group of friends to another child with supernatural powers: Iori Sekiguchi, a mind reader. However, as they try to approach her, they realize her power makes her nearly impossible to pin down. Having been chosen by the club to handle this case, Nao Tomori and Yuu Otosaka must find a way to get around the childs unique ability before it is too late. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-31740:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Based on the adult manga by Ayumu Shouji. ';}
#tags-14277:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Chitose is an 11-year-old girl who is madly in love with an older guy named Hiroshi. He works at the town hall right next to the school and Chitose spends every day relentlessly pursuing him. Can Chitose ever convince Hiroshi to go out with her? ';}
#tags-16169:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The anime adaptation of the four-panel manga \"Ai Mai Mii\". The story follows girls in a manga club-Ai, Mai, Mii, and Ponoka-senpai-who might be fighting evil invaders threatening Earth, facing off against rivals in tournaments, and dealing with other absurd situations when they are not drawing manga. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-23551:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second season of Ai Mai Mii. ';}
#tags-34295:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Third season of Ai Mai Mii. ';}
#tags-14741:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Everybody has had that stage in their life where they have thought themselves to be special, different from the masses of ordinary humans. They might go as far as seeing themselves capable of wielding mystical powers, or maybe even believe themselves to have descended from a fantasy realm. This \"disease\" is known as \"chuunibyou\" and is often the source of some of the most embarrassing moments of a persons life. For Yuuta Togashi, the scars that his chuunibyou has left behind are still fresh. Having posed as the \"Dark Flame Master\" during his middle school years, he looks back at those times with extreme embarrassment, so much so that he decides to attend a high school far away where nobody will recognize him. Putting his dark history behind him, he longs to live a normal high school life. Unfortunately, he hasnt escaped his past yet: enter Rikka Takanashi, Yuutas new classmate and self-declared vessel of the \"Wicked Eye.\" As this eccentric young girl crashes into Yuutas life, his dream of an ordinary, chuunibyou-free life quickly crumbles away. In this hilarious and heartwarming story of a boy who just wants to leave his embarrassing memories behind, the delusions of old are far from a thing of the past. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-16934:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Although Yuuta Togashi and Rikka Takanashi have just started dating, they do not know how to progress their young relationship. Due to both of them being shy, neither of them are capable of making the first move. Rikka decides to ask her class representative Shinka Nibutani for some love advice, and she advises Rikka get closer to Yuuta during the Christmas season. Following the suggestion of Yuutas friend, Makoto Isshiki, they hold a Christmas party at Sanae Dekomoris place. During the party, Yuuta notices Rikka has gone missing and searches for her. When he finds Rikka, he notices that she is acting strange and quickly figures out that she and Sanae are both drunk! How will this Christmas party turn out for the budding couple? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35608:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Although already a third-year high school student, Rikka Takanashi remains a chuunibyou-a \"disease\" that causes people to fantasize about themselves and their surroundings. Her relationship with Yuuta Togashi has also gone unchanged for the past six months, and with entrance exams right around the corner, both of them strive to enroll at the same college. However, Tooka-Rikkas elder sister-decides to take Rikka to Italy as she has found a stable job there. This unforeseen turn of events causes a commotion between the couple as neither of them want to be separated from each other. Desperate for ideas, they seek assistance from their friends, and after a brief conversation, they come up with a plan-to elope. Chuunibyou demo Koi ga Shitai! Movie: Take On Me is a sensational drama featuring the couple-Yuuta and Rikka-as they journey across Japan. The two attempt to prevent Rikka from being taken to Italy, but will they be able to succeed in doing so? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-18671:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The awkward lovebirds, Yuuta Togashi and Rikka Takanashi are now living together as they enter a new school year, but their adorable relationship remains stagnant. Yuuta struggles to adapt to having a chuuni girlfriend while the gang-Sanae Dekomori, Shinka Nibutani and Kumin Tsuyuri-are still keeping up with their quirks despite having advanced a grade. Making matters worse, another chuuni girl from Yuutas middle school, Satone Shichimiya, appears... With the various events revolving around Yuuta, will he be able to develop his relationship with Rikka? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-27601:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'One normal school day, Rikka Takanashi notices Makoto Isshiki secretly passing a flash drive to Yuuta Togashi. Curious, Rikka talks to her friends about the case, who agree that Yuuta is hiding something from her. They decide to discover the contents of the flash drive by any means necessary, but to their surprise, it merely contained pictures of an idol that Yuuta adored back in middle school. However, Rikka takes offense, as she claims that this breaks their contract as lovers and demands Yuuta to return the flash drive. Although having seen Yuuta return the flash drive, she still felt uncertain about the situation. This leads to her sneaking into Yuutas room during the night, only to find out that the flash drive had not been returned! Scanning through its contents, she hurriedly rushes to bed when Yuuta enters her room. To her terror, she finds the flash drive crushed due to her negligence in keeping it in a safe place. Yuuta quickly finds out and demands an apology. However, Rikka too, demands an apology from him, resulting in both of them refusing to be the one to apologize first. Will the two lovebirds be able to resolve their argument? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-34382:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'During the summer of her freshman year of high school, Yuzu Aiharas mother remarried, forcing her to transfer to a new school. To a fashionable socialite like Yuzu, this inconvenient event is just another opportunity to make new friends, fall in love, and finally experience a first kiss. Unfortunately, Yuzus dreams and style do not conform with her new ultrastrict, all-girls school, filled with obedient shut-ins and overachieving grade-skippers. Her gaudy appearance manages to grab the attention of Mei Aihara, the beautiful and imposing student council president, who immediately proceeds to sensually caress Yuzus body in an effort to confiscate her cellphone. Thoroughly exhausted from her first day, Yuzu arrives home and discovers a shocking truth-Mei is actually her new step-sister! Though Yuzu initially tries to be friendly with her, Meis cold shoulder routine forces Yuzu to begin teasing her. But before Yuzu can finish her sentence, Mei forces her to the ground and kisses her, with Yuzu desperately trying to break free. Once done, Mei storms out of the room, leaving Yuzu to ponder the true nature of her first kiss, and the secrets behind the tortured expression in the eyes of her new sister. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-2167:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Tomoya Okazaki is a delinquent who finds life dull and believes hell never amount to anything. Along with his friend Youhei Sunohara, he skips school and plans to waste his high school days away. One day while walking to school, Tomoya passes a young girl muttering quietly to herself. Without warning she exclaims \"Anpan!\" (a popular Japanese food) which catches Tomoyas attention. He soon discovers the girls name is Nagisa Furukawa and that she exclaims things she likes in order to motivate herself. Nagisa claims they are now friends, but Tomoya walks away passing the encounter off as nothing. However, Tomoya finds he is noticing Nagisa more and more around school. Eventually he concedes and befriends her. Tomoya learns Nagisa has been held back a year due to a severe illness and that her dream is to revive the schools drama club. Claiming he has nothing better to do, he decides to help her achieve this goal along with the help of four other girls. As Tomoya spends more time with the girls, he learns more about them and their problems. As he attempts to help each girl overcome her respective obstacle, he begins to realize life isnt as dull as he once thought. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35756:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Kaoruko \"Chaos\" Moeta is a young manga artist who is down on her luck. She wants to draw manga about high school girls, but her storyboards are bland, her art uninspired, and her premises weak. Her concerned, exasperated editor comes up with an idea: push Chaos to be more social. So, by her recommendation, Chaos moves into a dormitory for female manga artists. She soon meets the other residents: Tsubasa Katsuki, a shounen manga artist; Ruki Irokawa, who draws erotic manga popular with women; and Koyume Koizuka, a shoujo artist who, like Chaos, has yet to be serialized. Quickly striking up a friendship with these girls, Chaos finds new inspiration for her manga and continues to grow her creativity. Comic Girls is a showcase of the daily lives of these manga artists. Will Chaos finally be able to make her debut and become serialized? None of the girls know, but they will all do their best to help each other become the best artists they can be. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-42310:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Dreams are doomed to die in Night City, a futuristic Californian metropolis. As a teenager living in the citys slums, David Martinez is trying to fulfill his mothers lifelong wish for him to reach the top of Arasaka, the worlds leading security corporation. To this end, he attends the prestigious Arasaka Academy while his mother works tirelessly to keep their family afloat. When an incident with a street gang leaves Davids life in tatters, he stumbles upon Sandevistan cyberware-a prosthetic that grants its wearer superhuman speed. Fueled by rage, David implants the device in his back, using it to exact revenge on one of his tormentors. This gets him expelled from the academy, shattering his hopes of ever making his mother proud. After witnessing Davids newfound abilities, the beautiful data thief Lucyna \"Lucy\" Kushinada offers to team up with him, handing him a ticket to salvation. However, associating with Lucy introduces David to the world of Edgerunners-cyborg criminals who will break any law for money. Edgerunners often lose their lives, if the cyberware does not break their minds first; but in his fight for survival inside a corrupt system, David is ready to risk it all. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-31636:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Out in the countryside stands a sweet shop run by the Shikada family for nine generations: Shikada Dagashi, a small business selling traditional Japanese candy. However, despite his fathers pleas, Kokonotsu Shikada, an aspiring manga artist, adamantly refuses to inherit the family business. However, this may start to change with the arrival of the eccentric Hotaru Shidare. Hotaru is in search of Kokonotsus father, with the goal of bringing him back to work for her familys company, Shidare Corporation, a world famous sweets manufacturer. Although the senior Shikada initially refuses, he states that he will change his mind on one condition: if Hotaru can convince Kokonotsu to take over the family shop. And so begins Hotarus mission to enlighten the boy on the true joy of delicious and nostalgic dagashi! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36049:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second season of Dagashi Kashi. ';}
#tags-12549:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'On the surface, Ryousuke Kaga is the token perverted teenager, spending his days ogling women and indulging in erotic reveries. Because of this, Ryousuke is ostracized by his classmates. Only his childhood friend Mina Okura knows that behind his lecherous persona lies a compassionate boy who has sworn to be chivalrous to girls, believing they are treasures that must be protected. One fateful day, Ryousuke runs into Lisara Restall, a Soul Reaper hailing from a noble family, whose primary objective in the human realm is to locate a magically potent person known as the One. In order to fuel her movement with magic, she decides to form a provisional contract with Ryousuke: to use his sexual desires as a source of energy. Carrying out this peculiar arrangement with Lisara, Ryousuke encounters many disparate individuals but also learns of the intriguing yet dark secrets surrounding his world. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-30127:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Haruki Nakano lives an average high school life, except for the fact that his mother is overseas and he shares an apartment with his four sisters. Theres the oldest, Mutsuki, who has a bad habit of falling asleep in his bed, the junior high school student Yayoi, who hits him whenever something happens, and then the grade school twins, Uzuki and Satsuki, who love to play pranks on their older brother. Stuck in a house with four girls, Haruki has to deal with all sorts of trials. From going grocery shopping, watching scary movies, to kissing practice, life is never boring in Danchigai! ';}
#tags-38656:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'High school student Kaname Sudou receives an invitation from a classmate to play Darwins Game, a mobile game he has never heard of. However, as soon as he opens the application, a green snake suddenly pops out from his phone screen and bites his neck, leaving him unconscious. Waking up in the infirmary without any signs of a snake bite, he is told by the school to take the rest of the day off. Although he is puzzled by what has happened, he dismisses the surreal experience as a hallucination and boards the train home. Unfortunately, his curiosity gets the better of him and he uses the application once again. As the application appears to be just like any other battle game, Kaname breathes out a sigh of relief and decides to start his first match. However, the pleasant surprise is short-lived, as his in-game opponent unexpectedly appears right in front of him and attempts to hunt him down with a knife. As he desperately runs for his life, Kaname puts two and two together and realizes that Darwins Game is not an ordinary game, but rather, its a brutal fight for survival. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-41194:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Recap of the first 4 episodes of Darwins Game. ';}
#tags-15583:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Thirty years ago, the Eurasian continent was devastated by a supermassive \"spatial quake\"-a phenomenon involving space vibrations of unknown origin-resulting in the deaths of over 150 million people. Since then, these quakes have been plaguing the world intermittently, albeit on a lighter scale. Shidou Itsuka is a seemingly average high school student who lives with his younger sister, Kotori. When an imminent spatial quake threatens the safety of Tengu City, he rushes to save her, only to be caught in the resulting eruption. He discovers a mysterious girl at its source, who is revealed to be a \"Spirit,\" an otherworldly entity whose appearance triggers a spatial quake. Soon after, he becomes embroiled in a skirmish between the girl and the Anti-Spirit Team, a ruthless strike force with the goal of annihilating Spirits. However, there is a third party that believes in saving the spirits: \"Ratatoskr,\" which surprisingly is commanded by Shidous little sister! Kotori forcibly recruits Shidou after the clash, presenting to him an alternative method of dealing with the danger posed by the Spirits-make them fall in love with him. Now, the fate of the world rests on his dating prowess, as he seeks out Spirits in order to charm them. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-19163:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Spirits are otherworldly entities with immense power, capable of creating spatial quakes whenever they appear. One way of dealing with them is through brute force and killing them... or making them fall in love and sealing their powers. Having sealed three Spirits, Shidou Itsuka continues his mission with Ratatoskr in locating more spirits and dating them, to ensure the worlds safety from further destruction. However, this time around, their problems will not be limited to Spirits as a more imposing threat seems to have noticed their activities. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-22961:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'On the day of the Tanabata festival, Shidou Itsuka happens to meet the eerie Kurumi Tokisaki, who proceeds to ask him out on a date. Although nervous, Shidou accepts the offer. The two spend their time visiting to a planetarium, buying food at the festival, and trying out a mock wedding ceremony. Meanwhile, Shirous friends-Tooka Yatogami, Yoshino, and Kotori Itsuka-are looking for him, while also enjoying the festival themselves. As Shidou spends the day with Kurumi, he begins to notice an unexpected softer side of her. He knows that Kurumi is infamously called the \"Worst Spirit,\" but the girl standing before him is a gentle soul. However, as the day draws to a close, Shirou finally begins to understand the truth behind it all. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36633:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Shidou Itsuka carries on with his quest for Ratatoskr in finding Spirits and trying to seal their powers, all while maintaining his relationships with the ones he had already sealed. Moreover, as new Spirits appear, he must undergo more complicated trials-all to put a stop to further disasters as he discovers more about the Spirits origin. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-24655:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'War(Date), resumes. The peaceful days of Itsuka Shidou returned without having to save the Spirits from the relentless battle days. But, the peaceful days were interrupted by the emergence of a mysterious sphere emitting spiritual wave――as well as a mysterious girl who showed herself at the same time. What is her purpose of keeping an eye on Shidou&hellip;&hellip;? The mission that had been entrusted to Shidou under the tense situation was, &ldquo;Date all of the Spirits, and make them fall in love?!&rdquo; ――With the fate of humanity at stake, the war(date) resumes! (Source: Date A Live Wiki) ';}
#tags-17641:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When Origami Tobiichi asks Shidou Itsuka out on a date, Shidou considers this his best opportunity to set the record straight and end their relationship. However, even with the help of the Ratatoskr crew, his attempts to break up with her fail; in fact, Origami gladly tolerates Shidous humiliating requests and blunt comments! Shidous unconventional mission incidentally complicates his relationship with Tooka Yatogami, and it seems that easing the tension is only possible by going on another date. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48779:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Ten years have passed since Nagomu Irino left his home to pursue his dream that ultimately failed. He finally decides to return after hearing that his father-owner of the Kyoto sweets store Ryokushou-has been hospitalized. Worrying that no one would inherit the shop if his father passes away, Nagomu prepares himself to embrace his familys legacy and the art of making sweets⁠. Unsurprisingly, Nagomu discovers that his father has already chosen a different successor-a 10-year-old girl named Itsuka Yukihira, who was abandoned at Ryokushou by her father for reasons unknown. While she has since become a part of the family and is now the shops poster girl, Itsuka still longs to see her father and follows all possible clues that may lead her to him. Sympathizing with Itsukas situation, Nagomus mother asks Nagomu to act as Itsukas father, hoping that Itsuka will open up to him and relieve her pain, even if just a little. Starting on bad terms, Itsuka and Nagomu gradually learn more about each other, realizing that they are more similar than they had thought. Connected by their mutual love for both Ryokushou and its confections, their relationship as child and father figure begins to make lives around them a little bit sweeter. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-52252:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'No synopsis information has been added to this title. Help improve our database by adding a synopsis ';}
#tags-33988:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'High school biology teacher Tetsuo Takahashi may look like your average everyday instructor, but beneath his gentle appearance lies something less ordinary: his fascination for the \"Ajin,\" more commonly known as \"Demi.\" Although these half-human, half-monster beings have integrated into human society, Takahashi believes that much about them will remain unknown unless he interacts with them firsthand. Demi-chan wa Kataritai follows Takahashis daily life in Shibasaki High School together with his three Demi students-Hikari Takanashi, an energetic vampire; Kyouko Machi, a gentle dullahan; and Yuki Kusakabe, the shy snow woman. Along the way, Takahashi also meets fellow teacher Sakie Satou, a succubus with an aversion towards men. To fulfill his goal of learning more about the Demi, Takahashi decides to conduct casual interviews with the girls to learn more about their abilities, psyche, and interaction with human society. As Takahashi strengthens his bond with his students, he soon discovers that the Demi are not as unusual as he initially believed. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35823:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'During summer break, Tetsuo asks Sakie to join him on patrol duty for the local summer festival, which both the demis and Himari and her friends go to. As each group decides to check out a nearby shrine, they get spooked by some strange occurrences, which turn out to be each other. As the next term begins, Tetsuo converses with an invisible woman named Matsuri. (Source: Crunchyroll) ';}
#tags-48542:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The Fourth Industrial Revolution has led to the development of cutting-edge technologies that have rapidly evolved the world. As a result, schools have begun incorporating these technologies into their curriculum, leaving behind the ways of the old. One such institution is the elite Yuyu Girls Vocational High School, where both Serufu Yua and her childhood friend, Miku \"Purin\" Suride, have applied. Although the tech-savvy Purin is accepted to Yuyu High, the accident-prone Serufu is rejected and enters the traditional Gatagata Girls High School instead, driving a wedge into their friendship. On her way to class one day, Serufu gets into a bike accident, and Rei Yasaku, a passerby who attends the same school, fixes her damaged bicycle. Serufu later finds out that Rei has a passion for old-fashioned crafts and is the head of the schools Do-It-Yourself (DIY) Club-which is in danger of closing due to a lack of members. Realizing that this may be her chance to repair her relationship with Purin, Serufu joins the club in hopes of creating projects that could bring them together once more. As the DIY Club welcomes new faces, Serufu learns to build not only handicrafts but also new friendships along the way! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-37982:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'In their teenage years, few things can hurt people more than the heartaches that come with unrequited love. Such is the case for Natsuo Fujii, who has found himself entranced by his schools ever-cheerful teacher Hina. Deflated by this unreachable desire, Natsuo humors his friends and attends a mixer. There he meets Rui, a girl whose lack of excitement rivals that of himself. After bonding over their mutual awkwardness, Rui takes Natsuo to her house and asks him to have sex with her, hoping that the experience will stop her friends from treating her like a clueless child. With his hopeless feelings towards Hina still on his mind, Natsuo hesitantly agrees. Equally unfulfilled by their \"first times,\" the two decide to part ways as strangers. However, before he even has a chance to process this experience, Natsuos father drops a major bombshell: he is getting remarried, and his new wife Tsukiko Tachibana is coming over now to meet Natsuo. As if that was not enough of a shock, her daughters-and, in turn, Natsuos new sisters-are Hina and Rui Tachibana, the woman hes in love with and the girl with whom he shared his first night. Now, Natsuo must come to terms with the feelings he has for his step-siblings as his eyes open to a darker side of love. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-39026:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'During a regular after-school grub crawl, gluttonous high schooler Hibiki Sakura is confronted about her ever-expanding waistline by her best friend, Ayaka Uehara. With her attempts at solitary exercise failing miserably, Hibiki decides to join the newly opened Silverman Gym. At her orientation, Hibiki runs into student council president and school idol Akemi Souryuuin. However, it soon turns out that Hibiki is in for a lot more than she bargained for. Not only is Silverman Gym full of world-renowned bodybuilders and athletes, but to make matters worse, Akemi turns out to be a total muscle fetishist! Grossed out by the scene unfolding before her eyes, Hibiki begins to leave, only to be stopped by trainer Naruzou Machio. Completely enthralled with her newfound Prince Charming, Hibiki signs up as a gym member. Now, as a result of her spur-of-the-moment decision, Hibiki must adapt to her new lifestyle. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-226:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Lucy is a special breed of human referred to as \"Diclonius,\" born with a short pair of horns and invisible telekinetic hands that lands her as a victim of inhumane scientific experimentation by the government. However, once circumstances present her an opportunity to escape, Lucy, corrupted by the confinement and torture, unleashes a torrent of bloodshed as she escapes her captors. During her breakout, she receives a crippling head injury that leaves her with a split personality: someone with the mentality of a harmless child possessing limited speech capacity. In this state of instability, she stumbles upon two college students, Kouta and his cousin Yuka, who unknowingly take an injured fugitive into their care, unaware of her murderous tendencies. This act of kindness will change their lives, as they soon find themselves dragged into the shadowy world of government secrecy and conspiracy. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-51417:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Bayron City, a pioneering metropolis built on a newly discovered energy source, promises every citizen a luxurious and comfortable lifestyle. In reality, young demon exterminator Shuu Ogatas life is far from extravagant. Despite running a private military business, he often struggles to make ends meet due to reckless expenses. Fortunately, Kisara, his demon partner, is more than eager to help Shuu with household matters-albeit a little too forcefully for his comfort. The two work side by side, taking countermeasures against demon hazards, which stand as the biggest threats to the city. With danger lurking in the shadows, Shuu and Kisara strive to grant the towns safety; however, exterminating the possessed comes with a price unbeknownst to others. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32901:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'One year ago, Sagiri Izumi became step-siblings with Masamune Izumi. But the sudden death of their parents tears their new family apart, resulting in Sagiri becoming a shut-in which cut her off from her brother and society. While caring for whats left of his family, Masamune earns a living as a published light novel author with one small problem: hes never actually met his acclaimed illustrator, Eromanga-sensei, infamous for drawing the most lewd erotica. Through an embarrassing chain of events, he learns that his very own little sister was his partner the whole time! As new characters and challenges appear, Masamune and Sagiri must now face the light novel industry together. Eromanga-Sensei follows the development of their relationship and their struggle to become successful; and as Sagiri slowly grows out of her shell, just how long will she be able to hide her true persona from the rest of the world? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-37188:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Every day, all kinds of different people stop at railroad crossings on their way to work or school, resulting in all sorts of different conversations. Friends, enemies, acquaintances, and complete strangers-theres always a new encounter to be had. Fumikiri Jikan documents the discussions that take place at these locations. Whether these are funny or depressing, expected or completely unexpected, they certainly have the potential to be quite interesting. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-8187:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Everyone handles rejection in their own way. But when Takashi turns down Fumikos confession, the young schoolgirl unleashes her frustrations on a fanatical sprint through the neighborhood. However, a single misstep sends her soaring, and things go downhill from there... [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-51212:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Despite having a good reputation as one of the most seasoned guards in the local guild of Mebuki, Kikuru Madan believes he has been wasting his youth and hopes to spend the rest of it like any other person. However, his conscience prevents him from retiring at present, as he worries about the guilds future without him. Coincidentally-as if to help him find his successor-the guilds receptionist, Enome, assigns Kikuru four fresh recruits: the energetic beastwoman Hitamu \"Hitamuki\" Kyan, the prodigy Maidena Ange, the laid-back Toxico Dannar, and the stalwart Hanabata Nohkins. Although each of them possesses significant talents, they also display characteristics that detract from their potential-including Hitamus extreme clumsiness and Hanabatas unintentional perverseness. As if there was not enough to deal with, the monsters outside Mebukis walls start exhibiting odd behavior by targeting women salaciously, causing the party endless problems in more ways than one. Nevertheless, Kikuru is committed to retiring early; to achieve his goal, the guidance he gives the trainees will be absolutely essential. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50425:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Third-year high school student Jirou Yakuin is in love with his childhood friend and classmate, Shiori Sakurazaka. Thus, he hopes to be paired with her for the \"marriage practical\": their schools practice of randomly selecting boy-girl pairs to live as pretend married couples while monitoring and rating them on how close they have gotten. Meanwhile, the lively Akari Watanabe wants to be assigned to her crush, the popular and good-looking Minami Tenjin. Much to their dismay, Jirou and Akari find out that not only have they been paired together, but so have Shiori and Minami! Determined to be with their crushes, Jirou and Akari strive to earn as many points as possible, as the top 10 pairs earn the right to switch their partners-so long as both couples agree. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-24765:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Carefree high school senior Yuki Takeya every day looks forward to the School Living Club. Consisting of the president Yuuri Wakasa, the athletic Kurumi Ebisuzawa, the mature Miki Naoki, the supervising teacher Megumi Sakura, and club dog Taroumaru, the club prides itself on making the most of life at school. There is only one rule the club members have to follow: all members must live their entire lives within school grounds. Gakkougurashi! follows the adventures of the School Living Club as they promote independence and self-determination through their lively time residing at Megurigaoka Private High School. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32455:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Five years ago, a mysterious phenomenon known as the Global Synchronic Urban Disappearance caused a large chunk of Ikebukuro to disappear overnight. Following the catastrophe, the inhabitants found themselves thrown into a state of disorder, and unexplained electromagnetic anomalies called \"Auroras\" began to be sighted. Awed by the performance of idol Izumi Hinazaki at a play utilizing the \"Super Material Theater,\" a stage designed to revitalize Ikebukuro through hologram-enhanced plays, high school student Seria Morino is inspired to become an idol. Shortly afterward, she is scouted by a young woman named Kaoru Sakakibara, who turns out to be the director of Alice in Theater-the troupe that Izumi used to be a part of. Aiming to pursue her dreams, Seria decides to follow Kaoru and joins Alice in Theater. Upon arriving at their establishment, she is cordially welcomed by a group of young and friendly girls who are all very passionate about acting. However, something seems to be amiss&hellip; [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-34213:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Oniisan, a typical salaryman, has the weekly duty of protecting high school student Ai-chan from gropers by escorting her during their Monday morning train commutes. Despite the short time Oniisan and Ai-chan spend together, they manage to bond and learn more about each others lives. To help Oniisan get through his Monday blues, Ai-chan gives him small presents as motivation. Ai-chan and many other girls-who all share a certain attractive trait-lighten up the Mondays of their male friends and colleagues for the long week ahead. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49854:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The anime follows a salaryman who has a chance meeting with a girl named Ai on the train. They begin to meet every Monday on the train, with the man serving as her bodyguard on the crowded commute while they chat. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-42737:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Beauty Water looks like a common skin cosmetic. But unlike other cosmetics, people can sculpt their skin with it like molding clay and change their appearance. An ordinary girl, Yaeji, comes across the Beauty Water by chance, and her endless desire to be the most beautiful woman brings her unimaginable disaster. (Source: Anilist) ';}
#tags-39533:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Tightly clutching his Gibson guitar, Mafuyu Satou steps out of his dark apartment to begin another day of his high school life. While taking a nap in a quiet spot on the gymnasium staircase, he has a chance encounter with fellow student Ritsuka Uenoyama, who berates him for letting his guitars strings rust and break. Noticing Uenoyamas knowledge of the instrument, Satou pleads for him to fix it and to teach him how to play. Uenoyama eventually agrees and invites him to sit in on a jam session with his two band mates: bassist Haruki Nakayama and drummer Akihiko Kaji. Satous voice is strikingly beautiful, filling Uenoyama with the determination to make Satou the lead singer of the band. Though reticent at first, Satou takes the offer after an emotional meeting with an old friend. With the support of his new friends, Satou must not only learn how to play guitar, but also come to terms with the mysterious circumstances that led him to be its owner. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-14811:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'School clubs usually advertise their activities, but the goings-on of the GJ Club are a mystery. Kyouya \"Kyoro\" Shinomiya recently joined and became the sole male member of the five-person club. Besides Kyoro, there is Mao Amatsuka, the club president who has a tendency to bite Kyoro when she gets mad or bashful; Megumi Amatsuka, Maos composed younger sister who always makes tea and desserts for the clubs members; Shion Sumeragi, a demure chess prodigy; and Kirara Bernstein, a meat lover with a strong feline personality. All four girls have some form of interest in Kyoro. With the girls idiosyncratic and cute personalities, Kyoros time in GJ-bu will never be a dull one, for better or for worse. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-21273:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Kokoa Hoto is a positive and energetic girl who becomes friends with anyone in just three seconds. After moving in with the Kafuu family in order to attend high school away from home, she immediately befriends the shy and precocious granddaughter of Rabbit House cafes founder, Chino Kafuu, who is often seen with the talking rabbit, Tippy, on her head. After beginning to work as a waitress in return for room and board, Kokoa also befriends another part-timer, Rize Tedeza, who has unusual behavior and significant physical capabilities due to her military upbringing; Chiya Ujimatsu, a waitress from a rival cafe who does everything at her own pace; and Sharo Kirima, another waitress at a different cafe who has the air of a noblewoman despite being impoverished. With fluffy silliness and caffeinated fun, Gochuumon wa Usagi Desu ka? is a heartwarming comedy about five young waitresses and their amusing adventures in the town they call home. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38337:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Although the year is coming close to an end, there is no lack of fun for Kokoa Hoto and the other café waitresses! From bazaars to festivals, life is as enjoyable as it gets. As for Chino Kafuu and her middle school friends-the friendly Megumi Natsu and the playful Maya Jouga-they begin to look towards the future and decide on a high school to enroll in. Bonds of friendship and exciting adventures blend into Gochuumon wa Usagi Desu ka? Bloom as the joyful lives of the café waitresses continue. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-29787:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'With a new year comes new adventures, especially at the Rabbit House! Since her arrival at the café, Kokoa Hoto has become accustomed to her new life as a waitress even though the Rabbit House isnt the rabbit paradise she initially envisioned it to be. Life is pleasant, and she enjoys spending time both working and playing with her friends and fellow waitresses Chino Kafuu, a cute middle school student with a fuzzy bunny companion named Tippy, and Rize Tedeza, the pig-tailed daughter of a soldier who is readily armed for any scenario. Together with Chiya Ujimatsu and Sharo Kirima, who also work at neighboring cafés in town, the Rabbit House crew gets involved in all sorts of crazy adventures. Throughout these adventures, the girls encounter troubled novelists, rival cafes, secret treasure, and... alcoholic chocolates? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33280:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Cocoa visits her family, in the mountains, after quite some time again after her sister Mocha wrote her, through a letter, to come back soon. Her friends will have to spend a week in the town without her, while Cocoa has time with her family that she hasnt seen for a long time. But Chino, Cocoas self proclaimed little sister, wants to go watch, with Cocoa and all her friends, the fireworks in the fireworks festival, which is coming up in less than a week. Cocoa decides to return early as she misses them all, but will she arrive in time for the climax of the festival? (Source: TMDB) ';}
#tags-38333:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Chino Kafuu returns to Rabbit House with a horrified look on her face. When questioned by her friends, she explains to them that she had just agreed to sing the solo section of a song for her class graduation ceremony. Although they congratulate their friend on her important role, Chino reveals that she has stage fright, but is determined to overcome it before the ceremony takes place.With the support of her friends and special training from Rize Tedeza, will Chino be able to overcome her stage fright? Gochuumon wa Usagi Desu ka??: Sing for You is a wholesome and heart-warming short story featuring Chino and the other girls from the cafe. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-43692:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Who would have ever thought that the most feared gangster of his time now spends his days as a modest househusband? Seemingly giving up the way of the yakuza, the legendary \"Immortal Dragon\" Tatsu, best known for his prolific skirmishes against rival gangs, has abruptly vanished. Unbeknownst to most, however, Tatsu is currently staying at an apartment with his wife, doing his best to live a peaceful life. Donning his trusty apron, Tatsu is now striving to become an efficient homemaker. Because of this, he has mastered the required skills-be it cooking the most delicious dishes, making sure to get the best deals at supermarkets, and everything in between-garnering the surprise of both of his former subordinates and enemies alike. Despite being a man with quite a controversial past, Tatsus new way of life will only be more eccentric from here on out! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48707:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Once a terrifying yakuza, \"Immortal Dragon\" Tatsu now continues to conquer the challenges of mundane life. While his beloved wife Miku works, Tatsu equips his trusted apron, takes care of their finances, hunts down the biggest store sales, and learns the way of a true househusband with the help of the neighborhood wives. Although Tatsu abandoned the life of violence, his former colleagues and enemies reappear around every corner-but this time only as rivals in homemaking ventures. Surrounded by a myriad of chores to occupy him, it seems that no matter how tough things get, Tatsus undying perseverance prevails as he gives his tasks his absolute best. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-53148:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'With a wicked scar on his face, a terrifying gaze, and an apron adorned with a teddy bear, ex-yakuza member Tatsu proudly assumes the role of a full-time househusband. Already familiar with the regular challenges of grocery shopping, Tatsu now takes it to the next level by joining a womens organization-but acceptance is not easily achieved without first mastering the elegance of flower arranging and housekeeping. Approaching homemaking ventures through the lens of his former occupation, Tatsu faces haiku battles, typhoon alerts, and cosplaying villains. For his dearest wife Miku, Tatsu will do anything, even if he is interrupted by his old acquaintances, whose former vigor has also yet to subside. Never faltering before a new challenge, Tatsus tranquil days as a househusband are proving to be just as hectic as before. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-17729:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Yuuji Kazami is a transfer student who has just been admitted into Mihama Academy. He wants to live an ordinary high school life, but this dream of his may not come true any time soon as Mihama Academy is quite the opposite. Consisting of only the principal and five other students, all of whom are girls, Yuuji becomes acquainted with each of them, discovering more about their personalities as socialization is inevitable. Slowly, he begins to learn about the truth behind the small group of students occupying the academy-they each have their own share of traumatic experiences which are tucked away from the world. Mihama Academy acts as a home for these girls, they are the \"fruit\" which fell from their trees and have begun to decay. It is up to Yuuji to become the catalyst to save them from themselves, but how can he save another when he cannot even save himself? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-29093:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Having attended Mihama Academy for about a year, Yuuji Kazami has seemingly found his place within the school, but he suddenly decides to pursue a promotion in CIRS. After consulting JB about his intentions, they both thoroughly examine Yuujis documents and dissect the events of his upbringing to determine if the job is fit for him. Meanwhile, unbeknownst to the two, the girls of Mihama uncover some torn documents in Yuujis room. After restoring the papers, they discover the story that has formed-or perhaps broken-Yuuji into the man he is today. However, what was thought to be history has haunted him to the present, and the chains of the past begin to drag him back into the darkness... [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-29095:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Grisaia no Rakuen begins right at the end of the previous installment, Grisaia no Meikyuu. Kazami Yuuji is arrested under suspicion for terrorism. A video showing apparently concrete proof that Yuuji committed these acts, and he is held in custody by Ichigaya. Ichigaya knows full well that Yuuji didnt commit the crimes he has been accused of. But he did fail to assassinate Heath Oslo, who is the leader of the terrorist organization with an extremely devastating weapon in their possession. In fact, Ichigaya have their own plans for Yuuji... But all may not be lost for Yuuji. The girls of the Mihama Academy are not about to let Yuuji be used for political gain, and neither may the mysterious new figure which appears before them. ';}
#tags-10417:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Though her trip to Okinawa was supposed to be a lovely excursion to the seaside, college student Kaori Sawahara finds that it is anything but when a horrifying menace emerges from the watery depths. A strange mechanism has taken control of the sea creatures, granting them legs and sending them on land to attack anything in their way. Kaori and her friends-the lustful Erika and the reserved Aki-find themselves caught up in this onslaught, made worse by the creatures rotting stench of death. Surviving the first assault, Kaori tries to contact her fiancé Tadashi in Tokyo. However, the call is cut short in what sounds like another fish attack. Fearing for his safety, Kaori leaves for Tokyo. With Erika and Aki contending with the attacks in Okinawa, Kaori rushes to find Tadashi, unaware that the crisis has only just begun. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-20583:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Ever since having witnessed the \"Little Giant\" and his astonishing skills on the volleyball court, Shouyou Hinata has been bewitched by the dynamic nature of the sport. Even though his attempt to make his debut as a volleyball regular during a middle school tournament went up in flames, he longs to prove that his less-than-impressive height ceases to be a hindrance in the face of his sheer will and perseverance. When Hinata enrolls in Karasuno High School, the Little Giants alma mater, he believes that he is one step closer to his goal of becoming a professional volleyball player. Although the school only retains a shadow of its former glory, Hinatas conviction isnt shaken until he learns that Tobio Kageyama-the prodigy who humiliated Hinatas middle school volleyball team in a crushing defeat-is now his teammate. To fulfill his desire of leaving a mark on the realm of volleyball-so often regarded as the domain of the tall and the strong-Hinata must smooth out his differences with Kageyama. Only when Hinata learns what it takes to be a part of a team will he be able to join the race to the top in earnest. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-25303:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Nekoma High Schools volleyball team recruits a new member: the half-Japanese, half-Russian Lev Haiba. Though the self-proclaimed ace is blessed with great height, he lacks basic volleyball techniques. This gives the teams setter, Kenma Kozume, a hard time when matching up with him. To everyones surprise, Nekomas coach suggests that Lev play in the Kunihira Senior High Schools practice match, leaving Kenma no choice but to cooperate with the tall player. Will Kenma be able to overcome this new challenge? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-29755:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After watching a volleyball match on TV where the \"Little Giant\" of Karasuno High School helps his team secure a hard-fought victory, young and impressionable Shouyou Hinata begins to play the sport in hopes that he too can soar high one day. Now enrolled at the same school as his idol, he attempts to join the volleyball team despite his short stature. Unfortunately, upon his arrival, Hinata locks eyes with \"King of the Court\" Tobio Kageyama-a genius setter whom he had once suffered a bitter defeat to in middle school. Their unfriendly introduction and subsequent rivalry forces the rest of the Karasuno team to bar both of them from joining the club until they can learn to work together as teammates. Though reluctant to cooperate, their desire to play volleyball causes them to return with a proposal that will show the other members that they are capable of teamwork. As the two freshmen form an odd setter-and-ace relationship, an old rival school invites Karasuno for practice matches, reigniting competition between the two schools once more. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-30364:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The Inter-High has finally arrived for Karasuno High Schools volleyball team. Their opponent at the tournament is Date Tech High School-the team that crushed Karasuno the year prior. The loss brings back anxiety and fear for the teams second and third years as they were unable to overcome Dates \"read block.\" With the dynamic freshmen duo Shouyou Hinata and Tobio Kageyama on their side, will Karasuno be able to overcome their past and break through the iron wall? Awaiting Karasuno in the next round is the elite Aoba Jousai High School, led by the cunning captain Tooru Oikawa. Coming from the same middle school as Kageyama, Oikawa is a talented and unpredictable setter with a grudge against his former teammate. It is a battle between genius setters to decide who will continue on in the Inter-High. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-41793:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'On a cold winters night, a man finds two girls-Saori and Shiori Mizuki-seemingly lost in front of his apartment. Since then, the twins have gradually become attached to him, with one staying at his place while the other is at school. However, the sisters relationship with him is not merely that of a babysitter and child because sometimes more mature events occur. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-413:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Several months after a probe returning from Mars burns up during reentry, strange creatures dubbed \"Ancients\" begin to appear throughout Tokyo. Aggressive and dangerous, they cannot be killed with ordinary weapons. As scientists struggle to find the cause of their sudden appearance, the monsters wreak havoc across the world. Humanity finds hope in the form of the MARS suit-a new weapon developed to take down these enemies. The suit, however, can only be worn by those with specific DNA. Enter Takeru Hinata, an ordinary teen with a troubled past and one of the few capable of piloting the only weapon against the Ancients. With the help of the AAST, a special police force established to defeat the dangerous creatures, the young man battles against demons both personal and global whilst trying to discover the true nature of Earths new aggressors. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49551:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Recent college graduate Musashi Shinonome is visiting the Shitamachi God Heaven pachinko hall after inheriting it from his late grandfather. Inside, he stumbles upon a girl sleeping in a futon, who wakes up upon his arrival. She introduces herself as Hanabi Hana Ariake: a self-proclaimed perfected pachislot machine that has turned into a human. To prove this, she demonstrates her ability to transform and shoot fireworks out of her body. Over the following days, Musashi meets two of Ariakes human pachislot machine sisters-the energetic Versus Ikusa Takanawa and the loving Thunder Rai Nihonbashi. Now, Musashi and the dynamic trio must work together to make the grand reopening of Shitamachi God Heaven a success. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-6574:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Anzu goes to a kindergarten with her friends, the shy Koume and the eccentric Hiiragi. Together they try to make their caretaker, Tsuchida Naozumi, fall in love with Anzu. However, he is clearly more interested in the pretty Yamamoto Nanako, a fellow kindergarten teacher who supervises the class next door. Even though Anzu tries to convince Tsuchida to marry her when she grows up by using various methods. Tsuchida, on the other hand, hopes to get a chance to date Yamamoto, and, if not, to marry her. ';}
#tags-21681:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'At the tender age of 14, high school student Naru Sekiya finds that she pales in comparison to the fairy tale princesses she adores so much, not to mention the ideal girl she wants to be in contrast to her peers. Her childhood friend Yaya Sasame is enjoying herself with her school rock band, while her other childhood friend Tami Nishimikado is a member of the student council. Desiring the strength to take the next step forward, Naru has wanted a magic key to open her timid heart since the start of high school. During one moonlit night, Naru encounters what she believes is a cute fairy standing atop a torii gate who shortly invites her to dance with her. The next day, she discovers that the \"fairy\" was not only just an ordinary girl, but also a transfer high school student from America! Excited to meet Naru again, Hana N. Fountainstand encourages her to help her start a club for yosakoi, a festive type of Japanese dance that Hana has been entranced by since childhood. Though initially terrified of Hanas enthusiasm and the thought of being seen dancing, Naru slowly finds herself immersed in the art of yosakoi and assisting her new friend achieve her dream-for the path for a maiden such as herself is at the mercy of the wind! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48857:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'An established discipline on par with conventional medical approaches, \"vocal medicine\" is the practice of using songs to treat health conditions and injuries. Young people around the world strive to master the art and become \"healers\" to help people through the power of their voices. Among the many healers in training is Kana Fujii, a naturally talented singer who was inspired to pursue the profession after a life-changing experience. Along with the driven Reimi Itsushiro and the easygoing Hibiki Morishima, Kana trains at Karasuma Phoniatric Clinic under the stern yet kind mentorship of Ria Karasuma. As they endeavor to achieve their dreams, Kana and her friends meet various colorful healers along the way, discovering that there is much more to vocal medicine than just diligent studying! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38476:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'During an Outdoor Activities Club meeting, Nadeshiko Kagamihara, Aoi Inuyama, and Chiaki Oogaki debate what it means to be a real Yamanashi native. Somewhere along the line, Chiaki brings up the Yamanashi Kids Stamp Rally, which Nadeshiko has never heard of. The rally encourages one to visit famous places in the prefecture and collect stamps; those who complete the rally will win a years worth of Minobu steamed buns. Enticed by the humongous food prize, Nadeshiko is set on participating. Follow the Outdoor Activities Club as they travel around the Yamanashi prefecture to collect stamps and explore what the region has to offer! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-41061:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Upon returning from school one day, Rin Shima encounters an unfamiliar three-wheeled motorcycle parked outside her house. After asking her father about it, she learns that the vehicle is a temporary loaner while her moped undergoes its annual maintenance. With arrangements to go camping at Yatsugatake the next day, Rin has no choice but to utilize the three-wheeler. As she embarks on her trip, Rins traveling experience soon shifts gears, and she discovers a refined driving performance on new unexplored roads. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-934:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Keiichi Maebara has just moved to the quiet little village of Hinamizawa in the summer of 1983, and quickly becomes inseparable friends with schoolmates Rena Ryuuguu, Mion Sonozaki, Satoko Houjou, and Rika Furude. However, darkness lurks underneath the seemingly idyllic life they lead. As the village prepares for its annual festival, Keiichi learns about the local legends surrounding it. To his horror, he discovers that there have been several murders and disappearances in the village in the recent years, and that they all seem to be connected to the festival and the villages patron god, Oyashiro. Keiichi tries to ask his new friends about these incidents, but they are suspiciously silent and refuse to give him the answers he needs. As more and more bizarre events occur, he wonders just what else his friends might be keeping from him, and if he can even trust them at all. When madness and paranoia begin taking root in Keiichis heart, he will stumble straight into the mysteries at work in Higurashi no Naku Koro ni, a story that is told across multiple arcs. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-1889:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'In the small village of Hinamizawa, Rika Furude and her friends live together in relative harmony. Beneath this mask of peace, however, lies a hidden darkness, one that Rika understands all too well. In this eternal summer, she has been witness to unspeakable horrors. Every time the clock resets, Rika must try to find the villain behind these senseless deaths before tragedy strikes again. However, trying to decipher a mystery when only half the clues are present proves time and again to be disastrous, and each time she believes that things will change, she inevitably fails. As the annual festival approaches, Rika begins her descent from hope to despair in her struggle to break the chains of fate entangling them all. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-3652:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The infamous series of unexplainable murders in Hinamizawa have been solved and the chains of fate have broken due to the efforts of Rika Furude and her friends. Rika believes she has finally obtained the normal and peaceful life she desired with her friends; however, she is proven wrong when the wheels of fate begin turning once again after an unfortunate accident. Rika suddenly finds herself in a \"perfect\" world, the constant cycle of brutal killings having never taken place, where all of her friends are content and satisfied. Not wanting to abandon the world that she fought so hard for, she learns she must destroy an essential \"key\" to get back. But can Rika abandon the faultless world she is given the chance to live in, after all of her battles have brought her this far? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-28825:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'People are not always who they appear to be, as is the case with Umaru Doma, the perfect high school girl-that is, until she gets home! Once the front door closes, the real fun begins. When she dons her hamster hoodie, she transforms from a refined, over-achieving student into a lazy, junk food-eating otaku, leaving all the housework to her responsible older brother Taihei. Whether shes hanging out with her friends Nana Ebina and Kirie Motoba, or competing with her self-proclaimed \"rival\" Sylphinford Tachibana, Umaru knows how to kick back and have some fun! Himouto! Umaru-chan is a cute story that follows the daily adventures of Umaru and Taihei, as they take care of-and put up with-each other the best they can, as well as the unbreakable bonds between friends and siblings. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-30991:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Episodes included in the mangas seventh and tenth volumes. ';}
#tags-35376:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Umaru Doma is a model student who has a hidden side: when she gets home each day, she puts on her hamster hoodie and turns into a sluggish otaku fond of junk food. As Umaru continues these daily antics, the friendship between her and her classmates-Nana Ebina, Kirie Motoba, and Sylphinford Tachibana-deepens, and more and more interesting events begin to unfold. Of course, these events give rise to numerous questions. What did Nana ask of Umarus brother Taihei? Who is the mysterious girl with the diamond hairpin? And most important of all: why does this girl seem to know Umaru? These questions and more will be answered in Himouto! Umaru-chan R! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33948:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Born and raised in the countryside of Japan, Hinako \"Hina\" Sakuragi gets anxious easily when she talks to new people-so much so that she resembles a stiff scarecrow. To overcome this, Hina hopes to get involved in theater, inspired by a play she saw during her schools field trip. So, Hina moves into the Hitotose Manor in the bustling city of Tokyo to study at Fujiyama High School, aspiring to join the schools renowned theater club. But to Hinas dismay, she learns that Fujiyama Highs theater club has been on a lengthy hiatus. Having already come to Tokyo and enrolled in the school, Hina is at a loss for what to do next. Sensing her disappointment and eagerness to learn theater, Chiaki Hagino, the landlady of Hitotose Manor, encourages Hina to create a troupe with the residents of Hitotose Manor as its members. Hinako Note follows Hina as she begins a new life in Tokyo attending Fujiyama High while learning the ropes of theater with the support of her friends along the way. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-20673:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Hinata is very good at drawing and falls in love with his classmate, Shigure; however, Hinata is not good at talking to people, so he keeps his feelings in his imagination and drawings. Then, Shigures family decides to move to another town. On the day of their move, Hinata says to himself, \"I must tell her my feelings!\" and starts to chase after the train which is taking Shigure away. (Source: MAL) ';}
#tags-37614:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Many of us know what it is like to transition to a new school with few to no friends in a new environment, going through the arduous process of getting to know people again. Bocchi Hitori knows this struggle all too well, having just graduated from elementary school and thrown into middle school. Unfortunately, she suffers from extreme social anxiety: she faints when overwhelmed, vomits when nervous, and draws up ridiculously convoluted plans to avoid social contact. It does not help that her only friend from elementary school, Kai Yawara, will not be attending the same middle school as Bocchi. However, wanting to help her, Kai severs ties with Bocchi and promises to reconcile with her when she befriends all of her classmates in her new middle school class. Even though Bocchi has no faith in herself, she is determined to be friends with Kai again. Summoning all of her courage, Bocchi takes on the daunting challenge of making friends with her entire class, starting with the delinquent-looking girl sitting in front of her... [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-42897:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'On the surface, the thought of Kyouko Hori and Izumi Miyamura getting along would be the last thing in peoples minds. After all, Hori has a perfect combination of beauty and brains, while Miyamura appears meek and distant to his fellow classmates. However, a fateful meeting between the two lays both of their hidden selves bare. Even though she is popular at school, Hori has little time to socialize with her friends due to housework. On the other hand, Miyamura lives under the noses of his peers, his body bearing secret tattoos and piercings that make him look like a gentle delinquent. Having opposite personalities yet sharing odd similarities, the two quickly become friends and often spend time together in Horis home. As they both emerge from their shells, they share with each other a side of themselves concealed from the outside world. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-39730:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Hina Tsurugi and her family have just moved to a quaint seaside town. Hoping to savor the sight of the peaceful ocean, Hina stumbles upon a girl named Yuuki Kuroiwa-an upperclassman at her new school-who invites Hina to join her in fishing. Hina reels in an octopus, which falls onto her; being afraid of bugs and big creatures, she panics and begs Yuuki to remove it from her. Yuuki sees this as an opportunity to force Hina to join the schools Breakwater Club-a club where members gather, catch, and eat various types of marine life as their main activity. Although her attempts to refuse to join fail, Hina slowly begins to discover the hidden joy in fishing. Her view on the sport changes, now looking forward to all the delightful experiences she can take part in alongside her fellow club members. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-1782:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A group of young adults have decided to travel to a mysterious island through a tour line. The island has been deserted of human life and the ruins of a once promising city continue to decay. Each of the group members have a reason to visit the island, including returning to their former homes or embarking on a scavenger hunt. During their visit, strange events start to take place and past memories and sexual emotions began to surface among the group. The tour takes a turn for the worst when several of tourists are found murdered, showing that someone remains on the desolated island. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-35558:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'No synopsis information has been added to this title. Help improve our database by adding a synopsis ';}
#tags-42361:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Every day, Naoto Hachiouji is teased relentlessly by Hayase Nagatoro, a first year student he meets one day in the library while working on his manga. After reading his story and seeing his awkward demeanor, she decides from that moment on to toy with him, even calling him \"Senpai\" in lieu of using his real name. At first, Nagatoros relentless antics are more bothersome than anything and leave him feeling embarrassed, as he is forced to cater to her whims. However, as they spend more time together, a strange sort of friendship develops between them, and Naoto finds that life with Nagatoro can even be fun. But one things for sure: his days will never be dull again. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-2506:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Yoshugara Hikaru and his little sister, Mioto, are childhood friends of Sugihara Hakuro, and Hakuros little sister, Akimi. Although Mioto and Hakuro love each other, Hikaru is also secretly in love with Mioto. One day, Akimi walks into Hikarus room whilst he was playing with himself while spying on Mioto and Hakuro. Akimi demands that Hikaru finds a way to break-up their sibling as Akimi also loves her brother. Hikaru refuses her but Akimi threatens to reveal his shameful act. Hikaru loses his temper and rapes her. Horrified by what he had done, Hikaru eventually agrees to cooperate with Akimi on condition that his indiscretions be kept secret. (Source: AnimeNfo) ';}
#tags-13643:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Twins Izuru and Kokone harbor a deep love for their elder brother, but only Izuru has acted upon her feelings so far. When she arrives home from school, Izuru often goes directly to her brothers side and indulges in him. Unlike her proactive sister, Kokone merely watches them from the side while drowning in jealousy. All she can do is pleasure herself to the sound of their salacious acts. One day, however, Kokones frustration bubbles up, leading her to lash out at her sister and brother. Now, Izuru takes it upon herself to console Kokone, trying to convince her to be more honest about her feelings. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-17831:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A nonsense comical mystery. Harumi Kazuhito is a high school boy who loves books and is a fan of novelist Natsuno Kirihime. One day, he finds Kirihime writing at a cafe, about to be shot by a robber. He protects her from the attack but is killed instead. Through the supernatural power of a book-worm, he is reincarnated as a dachshund dog. Kazuhito (as a dog) writhes in a painful bookless life, when a sadistic woman carrying a pair of scissors offers him help. She is Kirihime herself. (Source: Dog and Scissors Wiki) ';}
#tags-22123:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Yachiyo Inugami, a cat-loving extrovert, and Suzu Nekoyama, a dog-loving introvert, are unexpectedly cast into a relationship on a day like any other. The pair find themselves drawn together through an inexplicable attraction of their opposite personalities. As they quickly begin to understand one another, Inugamis hardened resolve to gain Nekoyamas favor only leads to frenzied responses. Soon after their momentous union, the two begin to spend more time with one another, growing closer all the while. Their combined antics gain the attention of the mousy Mikine Nezu, a classmate of Inugami, and soon they join the \"biology\" club. There, they meet Ushikawa Ukiji, a passive, cow-like upperclassmen. Nezu and Nekoyama soon begin to build upon their relationship and a game of cat and mouse soon begins. Wild, explosive, and vibrant, Inugami-san to Nekoyama-san tells the comedic tale of two high school girls and their less-than-normal relationship. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-40010:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Countless diverse races, from perky fairies to oozing slimes, inhabit the world. Naturally, such a melting pot of creatures has a broad and alluring variety of brothels. With so many options to choose from, it is hard to decide with which succu-girl to have a meaningful, interpersonal experience. Fortunately, a tight group of brave warriors has come together to enlighten the public. These perverted adventurers take it upon themselves to assess the appeal of all types of succu-girls through hands-on research. Whether it be the scorchingly hot salamanders or the udderly hu-moo-ngous cow-girls, the Yoruno Gloss reviewers leave no species behind. Directed by the mastermind behind Miru Tights, Ishuzoku Reviewers seeks to answer one of the most pressing questions there is: which species is the sexiest? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-41783:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Video games, especially puzzle games, were always at the center of Konomi Kasaharas life. However, upon entering Hanamiya High School, she decides to break away from this lifestyle. As Konomi wanders the halls in search of a new activity to engage herself in, she stumbles upon a gigantic wall owned by the schools rock climbing team. Fascinated, she attempts to scale the wall, discovering that she can use her puzzle-solving skills to help her reach the top. Certain that she has found her calling, Konomi immediately joins the club. As she strives to improve her climbing skills, Konomi, alongside the rest of the Hanamiya Climbing Team, will learn what it truly means to be a \"sports climber\" and work to achieve victory in the upcoming competitions. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50789:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Based on characters from the free to play online mahjong game; Mahjong Soul; Janatama Pong is chibi comedy following the lives and random strange occurences that befall the inhabitants of the mahjong soul shrine. ';}
#tags-36906:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The demon Jashin-chan has been summoned to Earth by Yurine Hanazono, a girl with a knack for the occult. Unfortunately, Yurine does not actually know how to send Jashin-chan back to Hell. Now stuck on Earth, she must live at Yurines apartment as her familiar. The only way for Jashin-chan to return would be to kill her summoner, but this is easier said than done for the incompetent demon. Since Jashin-chan is immortal and can regenerate her body, Yurine does not hold back in attacking her with a range of weapons, punishing her in gruesome manners for her evil schemes. Jashin-chan is also often visited by her demon friends: the kindhearted Gorgon Medusa and the energetic minotaur Minosu, who seem much more well-behaved in contrast, and disapprove of her plans to kill Yurine. Jashin-chan Dropkick is a comedy focusing on these two reluctant roommates and their bizarre antics as they get by with their cat-and-mouse relationship. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38383:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: '\"It\" was believed to be traveling in space, but, \"Im back, guys!\" Due to popular demand, we decided to bring Jashin-chan back for an extra episode! What will she face when she returns to Earth? Yurine, Medusa, Pekola, Minos, Yusa, Koji and Peru-chan are all in for the \"swimsuit edition\"! Then appears Kraken for what seemed like the last battle of the season, but the real battle continues... (Source: Amazon Prime Video) ';}
#tags-42994:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Third season of Jashin-chan Dropkick. ';}
#tags-39049:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Jashin-chan is a demon who was summoned by Yurine Hanazono, a gothic looking girl. Unable to return home as the relevant spell was not included in the summoning grimoire, Jashin-chan resorts to violence to liberate herself from her earthly shackles. However, this is easier said than done, as Yurine is no weakling herself. She in fact possesses formidable physical power and uses it to massacre Jashin-chan in a variety of ways, be it shoving her arm in a blender, spreading her intestines across the room or even cooking her. Though these actions would be fatal to anyone without the ability to regenerate, Jashin-chan isnt exactly undeserving of this treatment. Stuck with each other, Yurine lets Jashin-chan live with her in exchange for work around the apartment, and this cohabitation results in situations where, more often than not, Jashin-chan ends up in pieces. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-40661:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The episode will be funded through Chitoses Hometown tax program, a system that allows taxpayers who live in urban areas to contribute to taxes that apply to rural residents. Taxpayers who contribute over 2,000 yen are then awarded in credit to reduce their income tax and residence tax. The Hometown tax program will also be the episodes focus. (Source: MAL News) ';}
#tags-40787:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Equipped with his passion for diving and admiration for marine biology, university student Tsuneo Suzukawa tries his best to juggle several part-time jobs to earn enough money to study abroad. But one night, in a fateful accident, he meets a girl in a wheelchair, driving his current path into a detour. The girl, Kumiko-who prefers to be called \"Josee\"-initially comes off as rude. Tsuneo, however, is then convinced by Josees grandmother to take on the paid job to be Josees caretaker. Despite being annoyed with her bossy demeanor, Tsuneo sees the opportunity to save more funds to support his academic dream. Nonetheless, after putting up with Josees behavior for some time, Tsuneo tries to quit, only to discover Josees dreams of traversing the outside world-to experience a life free from her crippling condition. Changing his mind, Tsuneo decides to accompany Josee in exploring the wonders that the world has to offer. Through their time together, the two begin to realize that the traits that bind them may be vital toward fulfilling their respective aspirations. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38295:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Momoko Futo is an average high-school girl going about her everyday life. Though laid-back and cheerful, her life is anything but mundane as her eccentricity and clumsiness never fail to spice up her days. Her two best friends are always with her: the cute and innocent Mayumi Furui, and the calm and cool Shibumi Shibusawa. Without any spoken dialogue or narration, Joshikausei aims to recount the comedic shenanigans these girls get up to through the expressive sounds and gestures that they make. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-40748:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Idly indulging in baseless paranormal activities with the Occult Club, high schooler Yuuji Itadori spends his days at either the clubroom or the hospital, where he visits his bedridden grandfather. However, this leisurely lifestyle soon takes a turn for the strange when he unknowingly encounters a cursed item. Triggering a chain of supernatural occurrences, Yuuji finds himself suddenly thrust into the world of Curses-dreadful beings formed from human malice and negativity-after swallowing the said item, revealed to be a finger belonging to the demon Sukuna Ryoumen, the \"King of Curses.\" Yuuji experiences first-hand the threat these Curses pose to society as he discovers his own newfound powers. Introduced to the Tokyo Metropolitan Jujutsu Technical High School, he begins to walk down a path from which he cannot return-the path of a Jujutsu sorcerer. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48561:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Violent misfortunes frequently occur around 16-year-old Yuuta Okkotsu, a timid victim of high school bullying. Yuuta is saddled with a monstrous curse, a power that dishes out brutal revenge against his bullies. Rika Orimoto, Yuutas curse, is a shadow from his tragic childhood and a potentially lethal threat to anyone who dares wrong him. Yuutas unique situation catches the attention of Satoru Gojou, a powerful sorcerer who teaches at Tokyo Jujutsu High. Gojou sees immense potential in Yuuta, and he hopes to help the boy channel his deadly burden into a force for good. Yet Yuuta struggles to find his place among his talented classmates: the selectively mute Toge Inumaki, weapons expert Maki Zenin, and Panda. Yuuta clumsily utilizes Rika on missions with the other first-year students, but the grisly aftermath of Rikas tremendous displays of power draws the interest of the calculating curse user Suguru Getou. As Getou strives to claim Rikas strength and use it to eliminate all non-jujutsu users from the world, Yuuta fights alongside his friends to stop the genocidal plot. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-5680:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A fresh high school year always means much to come, and one of those things is joining a club. Being in a dilemma about which club to join, Yui Hirasawa stumbles upon and applies for the Light Music Club, which she misinterprets to be about playing simple instruments, such as castanets. Unable to play an instrument, she decides to visit to apologize and quit. Meanwhile, the Light Music Club faces disbandment due to a lack of members. This causes the club members to offer anything, from food to slacking off during club time, in order to convince Yui to join. Despite their efforts, Yui insists on leaving due to her lack of musical experience. As a last resort, they play a piece for Yui, which sparks her fiery passion and finally convinces her to join the club. From then onward, its just plain messing around with bits and pieces of practice. The members of the Light Music Club are ready to make their time together a delightful one! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-9617:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Graduation looms for the founding members of the Light Music Club. With only a few precious weeks of school left, the girls decide to make the most of it and plan a trip abroad. Hawaii, New York, Dubai-many destinations are suggested, but after a little help from the clubs precious pet turtle, Ton-chan, London is chosen as the host of their next misadventure! Yui Hirasawa, Mio Akiyama, Tsumugi Kotobuki, Ritsu Tainaka, and Azusa Nakano will visit famous landmarks, perform live music for Londoners, and eat all sorts of delicious food, all while stumbling clumsily from place to place. But the fun wont last forever, as heartfelt songs and goodbyes will be made as their high school days together come to a close. One thing is for certain though: the undeniable friendships these girls have formed is something that will carry on long after the final scene rolls. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-7791:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'It is the new year, which means that the senior members of the Light Music Club are now third-years, with Azusa Nakano being the only second-year. The seniors soon realize that Azusa will be the only member left once they graduate and decide to recruit new members. Despite trying many methods of attracting underclassmen-handing out fliers, bringing people into the clubroom, and performing at the welcoming ceremony-there are no signs of anyone that plans to join. While heading to the clubroom, Azusa overhears Yui Hirasawa say that the club is fine with only five people and that they can do many fun things together. Changing her mind, she decides that they do not need to recruit any members for the time being. K-On!! revolves around the members of the Light Music Club as they experience their daily high school life. From rehearsing for concerts to just messing around, they are ready to make their last year together an exciting one! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-9734:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The summer holidays are coming to an end, but the girls from Houkago Tea Time want to take one more trip before their next semester starts. With countless travel destinations to choose from and as many preferences as there are club members, coming to an agreement seems far-flung. Unable to reach a decision, they remember that they must first apply for new passports. As simple as it may sound, the routine visit to a government office and filing a form soon turns into an all-day adventure for Yui Hirasawa and the rest of the band. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-6862:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'It is almost the end of the year, and Houkago Tea Time has been invited to participate in a live house on New Years Eve! The iconic band members are Yui Hirasawa, the carefree guitarist who is enthusiastic to play music; Mio Akiyama, the shy bassist who gets embarrassed easily; Tsumugi Kotobuki, the gentle and sweet keyboardist who finds joy in normal activities; Ritsu Tainaka, the extroverted drummer who likes to tease Mio; and Azusa Nakano, the rhythm guitarist who is one year younger than the rest but slightly more mature. Performing in the set gives the girls the rare opportunity to meet various people from different bands, including the one that invited them, Love Crysis. Will Houkago Tea Time be able to delight their audiences successfully? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-30524:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A video blogger attempts to fake cryptid sightings to boost his views, but gets more than he bargained for when his crew is slaughtered by a real monster. Elsewhere, students find themselves preyed upon by a sandworm-like beast, initiating a desperate struggle for survival on their own school grounds. With more of these attacks from mysterious creatures occurring, researcher Sousuke Banba tasks himself with delving into the mystery. With nothing but the keyword \"Kagewani\" to lead him, he scours the sites of recent attacks in hopes of finding a lead to eradicating the creatures for good. However, Sousuke finds that these threats to humanity are even closer to home when the pharmaceutical company, Sarugaku, starts to encroach on his investigation. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32682:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After surviving the onslaught at Sarugaku headquarters, Sousuke Banba resumes his investigation of the Kagewani monster hybrids. Armed with the ability to harness the Kagewanis power, the researcher now has a means to eliminate the creatures. But despite the benefits of this skill, it has one major drawback: Sousuke now struggles to maintain his sanity, with the power threatening to consume his body. Soon, threats old and new begin to rear their heads, as the upper echelons of Sarugaku become active once again and an assassin with a personal vendetta sets her sights on Sousuke. Nevertheless, he resolutely forges ahead on his mission, determined to track down the origins of the Kagewani and eliminate their threat once and for all. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-7054:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Misaki Ayuzawa is a unique phenomenon within Seika High School. In a predominantly male institution, she became the first-ever female student council president through her honesty and diligence. Ever since Misaki got promoted to the position, she has been working tirelessly to ensure a better school life for all girls. Despite that, Misaki is very strict with the boys, which has earned her the title \"Demon President.\" One day, after hearing a girl cry in the hallway, Misaki encounters Takumi Usui-the most popular boy in the school-as he rejects a love confession. Enraged at what she is seeing, Misaki reprimands him for making the girl cry. However, Usui is indifferent and brushes it off as nothing. Unexpectedly, Misaki soon runs into Usui again, but this time when she is working at a maid cafe! Embarrassed that someone has found out about her secret occupation, Misaki promises herself not to let Usui destroy her reputation. However, the mysterious boy now begins to visit the same cafe regularly to observe and tease Misaki. When push comes to shove, will Usui still be able to keep the presidents secret? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48675:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Nagi Umino and Erika Amano, a studious high school student and a social media star, had nothing that linked them together-until they found out they were swapped at birth. When the sudden news is revealed to both of their families, their parents quickly devise a proposition with neither Nagis nor Erikas knowledge: in order to restore them both to their rightful families and ensure everyones happiness, the two should get engaged. When informed of this, Nagi and Erika are quick to reject the absurd plan, refusing to go along with their parents wishes. But, with neither party willing to back down, only time can tell where their relationship will go. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32491:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'For the longest time, its just been the two of them. \"Kanojo\" and her cat Daru are inseparable, having grown up together. Now a junior in college, Tomoka-her roommate of a year and a half-moves out of their shared apartment, and in order to keep her living space, Kanojo must find a job. Day by day, Daru watches her continued efforts from a cats-eye view, eagerly awaiting his owners return. When she gets back, once again, its just she and her cat. Kanojo to Kanojo no Neko: Everything Flows is a charming short series about the bond between a pet and his owner. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-40839:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Kazuya Kinoshita is a 20-year-old college student who has a wonderful girlfriend: the bright and sunny Mami Nanami. But suddenly, he doesnt. Without warning, Mami breaks up with him, leaving him utterly heartbroken and lonely. Seeking to soothe the pain, he hires a rental girlfriend through an online app. His partner is Chizuru Mizuhara, who through her unparalleled beauty and cute demeanor, manages to gain Kazuyas affection. But after reading similar experiences other customers had had with Chizuru, Kazuya believes her warm smile and caring personality were all just an act to toy with his heart, and he rates her poorly. Aggravated, Chizuru lambastes him for his shameless hypocrisy, revealing her true pert and hot-tempered self. This one-sided exchange is cut short, however, when Kazuya finds out that his grandmother has collapsed. They dash toward the hospital and find Kazuyas grandmother already in good condition. Baffled by Chizurus presence, she asks who this girl might be. On impulse, Kazuya promptly declares that they are lovers, forcing Chizuru to play the part. But with Kazuya still hung up on his previous relationship with Mami, how long can this difficult client and reluctant rental girlfriend keep up their act? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-42963:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A year after they met, Kazuya Kinoshita and Chizuru Mizuhara still regularly see each other through the rental girlfriend app. However, Chizuru confesses that she is ready to quit her job to pursue her true passion-acting. Despite wishing to maintain the relationship they have, Kazuya decides to support her dream. When Kazuya goes to watch Chizurus anticipated first play, he is amazed by her talent and ability to captivate the audience. At the same time, he is saddened at the thought that she will undoubtedly be scouted by the famous director in attendance. However, after the show, Chizuru explains that the director recruited another actress, lamenting her lack of talent. Frustrated on her behalf, Kazuya resolves to rent her every week to help her financially. But as Kazuyas ex-girlfriend Mami Nanami lingers around for unknown reasons, hesitance muddles his true feelings, and fulfilling his promise to Chizuru becomes uncertain. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35860:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Having a friend that knows you inside out should be a good thing, but in Nishikatas case, the opposite is true. His classmate Takagi loves to tease him on a daily basis, and she uses her extensive knowledge of his behavior to predict exactly how he will react to her teasing, making it nearly impossible for Nishikata to ever make a successful comeback. Despite this, Nishikata vows to someday give Takagi a taste of her own medicine by making her blush out of embarrassment from his teasing. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38993:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Even after spending a considerable amount of time with Takagi, Nishikata is still struggling to find a perfect plan to defeat the expert teaser. A battle of wits, a contest of physical prowess, a test of courage-any strategy he employs to expose her weaknesses is to no avail. On the contrary, Nishikatas pitiful attempts only reveal more of his own flaws, which Takagi takes advantage of to become increasingly daring in her teasing attempts. To make things worse for Nishikata, rumors about him and Takagi may have spread in class due to the frequent interactions between them. However, the optimistic Nishikata believes that wisdom comes with age and that as the days go by, his experience with her constant teasing will eventually bear fruit, leading him to the awaited moment of victory. Thus, Nishikata continues to strive for the seemingly impossible-to outsmart Takagi and make her blush with embarrassment. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-45613:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Yuu Izumi leads a high school life filled with one mishap after another. No matter how improbable the situation, unfortunate events strike him at every turn. In possession of such terrible luck, Izumi enters his second year with a single wish in mind-to spend more time with his affectionate girlfriend, Micchon Shikimori. Cute, athletic, and caring, Shikimori is immensely popular at their school. But since they began dating a year ago, Izumi has witnessed a surprising side to his otherwise adorable girlfriend: when the need arises, she turns incredibly cool! His misfortunes are easily avoided when she is there to protect him with an awe-inspiring look on her face. Charming in every way, she never ceases to make his heart skip a beat. Unfortunate as he may be, Izumi is sure to see his days of bad luck end thanks to the cute yet cool Shikimori. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-39326:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'As far as it goes, many boys, especially in their teenage years, want to have a girlfriend. Keiki Kiryuu is no exception. One eventful afternoon, his days of yearning for a lover seem to come to an end when he receives a love letter from an anonymous sender-along with a pair of white panties. To determine the identity of his secret admirer, referred to as Cinderella, he proceeds to investigate several possible candidates including his senior Sayuki Tokihara, his underclassman Yuika Koga, and his classmate Mao Nanjou. However, as Keiki seeks to uncover who this mystery girl might be, he comes to know about the perverted fetishes hidden behind each candidates innocent exteriors... [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-52168:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'On the planet Mercury, the advanced technology of cybernetic prostheses has led to the development of giant pilotable robots. However, prolonged use of these achievements in bioengineering takes a significant toll on a pilots body. As the Merucians mobile suits gain formidable power, fear rises among the people of Earth. On her daughter Erichts fourth birthday, pilot Elnora Samaya tests the state-of-the-art Gundam Lfrith under the watchful eye of its creator, Cardo Nabo. Ericht visits Elnora at work despite orders not to, and chaos unfolds after she forms a strange bond with her mothers mecha. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33218:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The story focuses on high school girl Nagisa Yukiai who lives in a seaside town. She has believed her grandmothers story that spirits dwell in words and they are called \"kotodama\" (word spirit). One day, she strays into a mini FM station that has not been used for years. As an impulse of the moment, she tries to talk like a DJ using the facility. But her voice accidentally broadcasted reaches someone she has never expected. (Source: Crunchyroll) ';}
#tags-51213:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Alto Goldfilled, a diligent student at the Ortigia Academy of Magic, aspires to become a powerful sorcerer. But he is unable to become one as, despite his excellent grades and strong commitment to his studies, he fails his summoning class. With the threat of repeating a year hanging over his head, Alto tries following an old, worn-out grimoire in a desperate attempt to resolve his situation. To his surprise, he succeeds and summons a powerful demon named Vermeil. As a sign of gratitude for releasing her, Vermeil agrees to become Altos familiar, sealing their relationship with a deep kiss. Little does Alto know what else he is capable of and what Vermeils past hides. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-7593:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After Keita Suminoes mother passed away, his father promptly remarried, introducing two step-sisters into Keitas life: twins Ako and Riko. But since their fateful first encounter, a surge of incestuous love for their younger brother overcame the girls, beginning a lifelong feud for his heart. Now at the end of his middle school career, Keita studies fervently to be able to attend Ako and Rikos high school. While doing so however, he must resolve his conflicting feelings for his siblings and either reject or succumb to his sisters intimate advances. Fortunately-or perhaps unfortunately for Keita-his sisters arent the only women lusting after him, and theres no telling when the allure of temptation will get the better of the boy as well. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33206:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'As Kobayashi sets off for another day at work, she opens her apartment door only to be met by an unusually frightening sight-the head of a dragon, staring at her from across the balcony. The dragon immediately transforms into a cute, busty, and energetic young girl dressed in a maid outfit, introducing herself as Tooru. It turns out that the stoic programmer had come across the dragon the previous night on a drunken excursion to the mountains, and since the mythical beast had nowhere else to go, she had offered the creature a place to stay in her home. Thus, Tooru had arrived to cash in on the offer, ready to repay her saviors kindness by working as her personal maidservant. Though deeply regretful of her words and hesitant to follow through on her promise, a mix of guilt and Toorus incredible dragon abilities convinces Kobayashi to take the girl in. Despite being extremely efficient at her job, the maids unorthodox methods of housekeeping often end up horrifying Kobayashi and at times bring more trouble than help. Furthermore, the circumstances behind the dragons arrival on Earth seem to be much more complicated than at first glance, as Tooru bears some heavy emotions and painful memories. To top it all off, Toorus presence ends up attracting several other mythical beings to her new home, bringing in a host of eccentric personalities. Although Kobayashi makes her best effort to handle the crazy situation that she has found herself in, nothing has prepared her for this new life with a dragon maid. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-39247:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'As Tooru continues on her quest to become the greatest maid and Kanna Kamui fully immerses in her life as an elementary school student, there is not a dull day in the Kobayashi household with mischief being a daily staple. On one such day, however, a massive landslide is spotted on the hill where Kobayashi and Tooru first met-a clear display of a dragons might. When none of the dragons they know claim responsibility, the perpetrator herself descends from the skies: Ilulu, the radical Chaos Dragon with monstrous power rivaling that of Tooru. Sickened by Toorus involvement with humans, Ilulu resorts to the typical dragon method of resolving conflict-a battle to the death. Despite such behavior, she becomes intrigued by Kobayashis ability to befriend dragons and decides instead to observe just what makes Kobayashi so special. With a new troublesome dragon in town, Kobayashis eccentric life with a dragon maid is only getting merrier. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49893:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Special episode bundled with the fifth Blu-ray and DVD volume. ';}
#tags-35363:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Wanting to take her affection for Kobayashi a step further, dragon maid Tooru is confident in her latest creation: a love potion! With Valentines Day just around the corner, Tooru decides there is no better way to use the potion than in homemade chocolates. However, on the special holiday, Toorus plan is quickly foiled after Kobayashi sees through her heartfelt yet deceptive gift. Despite the unsuccessful attempt, many opportunities still await. Between the lively atmosphere and a trip to the hot springs, Kobayashi and the dragons indulge themselves in the sweet festivities. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48926:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Hitohito Tadano is an ordinary boy who heads into his first day of high school with a clear plan: to avoid trouble and do his best to blend in with others. Unfortunately, he fails right away when he takes the seat beside the schools madonna-Shouko Komi. His peers now recognize him as someone to eliminate for a chance to sit next to the most beautiful girl in class. Gorgeous and graceful with long, dark hair, Komi is universally adored and immensely popular despite her mysterious persona. However, unbeknownst to everyone, she has crippling anxiety and a communication disorder which prevents her from wholeheartedly socializing with her classmates. When left alone in the classroom, a chain of events forces Komi to interact with Tadano through writing on the blackboard, as if in a one-way conversation. Being the first person to realize she cannot communicate properly, Tadano picks up the chalk and begins to write as well. He eventually discovers that Komis goal is to make one hundred friends during her time in high school. To this end, he decides to lend her a helping hand, thus also becoming her first-ever friend. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50631:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After an exciting and momentous cultural festival, Shouko Komi continues her endeavor to make one hundred friends alongside her friend and classmate Hitohito Tadano. As winter begins, the class is joined by the seemingly delinquent student Makoto Katai, who has been absent since the first week of school. Despite his intimidating appearance, Katai has difficulty communicating with others and just wants to befriend his classmates. As new friendships form and current ones deepen, Komi and Tadanos relationship begins to change-though not necessarily for the worse. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-31091:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Fifteen-year-old Komori Shuri is a junior high school girl who is too nice to decline requests. Constantly doing favors for other people has given her incredible strength?! But even so, she is also an adolescent junior high school girl. An anime overflowing with the ups and downs of everyday life! (Source: Batoto, edited) ';}
#tags-30831:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After dying a laughable and pathetic death on his way back from buying a game, high school student and recluse Kazuma Satou finds himself sitting before a beautiful but obnoxious goddess named Aqua. She provides the NEET with two options: continue on to heaven or reincarnate in every gamers dream-a real fantasy world! Choosing to start a new life, Kazuma is quickly tasked with defeating a Demon King who is terrorizing villages. But before he goes, he can choose one item of any kind to aid him in his quest, and the future hero selects Aqua. But Kazuma has made a grave mistake-Aqua is completely useless! Unfortunately, their troubles dont end here; it turns out that living in such a world is far different from how it plays out in a game. Instead of going on a thrilling adventure, the duo must first work to pay for their living expenses. Indeed, their misfortunes have only just begun! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32937:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When Kazuma Satou died, he was given two choices: pass on to heaven or be revived in a fantasy world. After choosing the new world, the goddess Aqua tasked him with defeating the Demon King, and let him choose any weapon to aid him. Unfortunately, Kazuma chose to bring Aqua herself and has regretted the decision ever since then. Not only is he stuck with a useless deity turned party archpriest, the pair also has to make enough money for living expenses. To add to their problems, their group continued to grow as more problematic adventurers joined their ranks. Their token spellcaster, Megumin, is an explosion magic specialist who can only cast one spell once per day and refuses to learn anything else. There is also their stalwart crusader, Lalatina \"Darkness\" Dustiness Ford, a helpless masochist who makes Kazuma look pure in comparison. Kono Subarashii Sekai ni Shukufuku wo! 2 continues to follow Kazuma and the rest of his party through countless more adventures as they struggle to earn money and have to deal with one anothers problematic personalities. However, things rarely go as planned, and they are often sidetracked by their own idiotic tendencies. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-34626:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Kazuma meets a novice adventurer called Ran who claims to be Kazumas fan. A quest is proposed to Kazuma and his party in front of Ran, so he accepts the quest to look good in front of his fan; after some convincing, they all go to fight the metal golem. (Source: Wikipedia) ';}
#tags-32380:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'While exploring Wizs magic shop with his party, Kazuma Satou finds a magical wish-granting choker and decides to try it on. Only then does Wiz tell him that the choker strangles its wearer to death in four days unless their desires are fulfilled. This wouldnt be a problem if Kazuma knew what his wish was. Fearing for Kazumas life, Aqua, Megumin, and Lalatina \"Darkness\" Dustiness Ford all agree to do his bidding in order to satisfy his desires and hopefully grant his wish, no matter what he asks for... [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38040:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'It is not strange that the Demon Lords forces fear the Crimson Demons, the clan from which Megumin and Yunyun originate. Even if the Demon Lords generals attack their village, the Crimson Demons can just easily brush them off with their supreme mastery of advanced and overpowered magic. When Yunyun receives a seemingly serious letter regarding a potential disaster coming to her hometown, she immediately informs Kazuma Satou and the rest of his party. After a series of wacky misunderstandings, it turns out to be a mere prank by her fellow demon who wants to be an author. Even so, Megumin becomes worried about her family and sets out toward the Crimson Demons village with the gang. There, Kazuma and the others decide to sightsee the wonders of Megumins birthplace. However, they soon come to realize that the nonsense threat they received might have been more than just a joke. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35241:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'In a bustling village of spirits, Yuzu, a cheerful fox girl, starts her first job as an attendant at the traditional hot springs inn Konohanatei. Though Yuzu has no experience working at such a high-class establishment, Kiri, the affable and reliable head attendant, immediately puts her to work learning the basics. While Yuzus eagerness initially proves to be more of a hindrance than a blessing, her playful nature brings a unique charm to the inn, as both customers and her fellow workers quickly warm up to her clumsy yet well-meaning mistakes. Under the guidance of the other foxes-the rigid Satsuki, the carefree Natsume, the critical Ren, and the quiet Sakura-Yuzu steadily learns the trade of an inn attendant while learning to love the magical world surrounding her. Konohana Kitan presents the heartwarming tale of a simple fox girl forging bonds with others and finding a home amidst the mysterious, beautiful world of spirits. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-412:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Izumi Sawatari and her younger sister, Mitsuki Sawatari, have run away from home and are in need of employment. The only jobs available are as maids in the mansion of 14-year-old millionaire, Yoshitaka Nakabayashi. What seems like simple work is soon revealed to be far more than the girls bargained for when they find Yoshitaka to be an authoritative employer who demands they call him \"Master\". (Source: Sentai Filmworks) ';}
#tags-44516:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Novice bounty hunter Chateau Dankworth never expected to encounter someone capable of overpowering her in combat. Even less so that the mysterious man would take an immediate interest in her-to the point of aiding her missions. However, Chateau makes it clear that she has no plans of entertaining any personal involvement with him. Chateaus company is soon tasked with eliminating Song Ryang-ha-an expert assassin and a former member of a powerful Asian organization. Coincidentally, Ryang-ha is the man that has been pursuing her. Despite his background, Chateau reluctantly agrees to meet with Ryang-ha as part of a deal: in exchange for going out with him, he will provide her with the locations of current targets, dead or alive. But when the past begins to haunt both killers, their arrangement may need to come to an end, as their entanglement puts their lives at grave risk. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49909:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'One day, manga author Shin Karino is greeted by four-year-old Kotarou Satou, his new next-door neighbor, who gifts him a box of tissues. In Karinos eyes, Kotarou is an odd kid: he speaks in an extremely formal manner, and he lives alone in his apartment-no parents or relatives in sight. But Kotarou neither seems to mind, nor wants to rely on people. Feeling sympathetic toward Kotarous circumstances, Karino decides to follow Kotarou to a bathhouse in case something might happen to him and there he comes to understand the little boy is not so different from him. Little by little, Karino-along with the other residents of the apartment complex-grows fond of Kotarou and his antics. At the same time, Kotarou himself might have found something akin to a family in his unique neighbors. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49776:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Tooru Kirishimas notoriety is spread far and wide in the underworld. He is most commonly known as \"The Demon of Sakuragi\"-a man who is not afraid to resort to violence if deemed necessary. After almost jeopardizing a peace treaty, his boss tasks him with the most difficult job he has ever had: taking care of seven-year-old Yaeka Sakuragi-the boss precious daughter-so that Tooru understands what it means to be responsible for another life. At first, the two do not seem to meet eye to eye, as Tooru has no clue on how to communicate with Yaeka, and the young girl is not used to expressing her emotions. However, as time goes on, they come to understand each other despite their differences. The fearsome right-hand man of a yakuza boss and the child he must protect are about to learn that family is not always bound by blood. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50338:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Tsubaki hails from an all-female clan of ninjas hidden deep in the forest. While a strict code guides the many kunoichi in training, the most important rule the young women must adhere to is: never interact with men, for they are far too dangerous to be trusted. As the leader of Team Dog, Tsubaki has many duties she must handle. However, despite being a skilled trainee, she begins to react strangely whenever the topic of men surfaces. Unaware of what mysterious feelings are taking over her heart, Tsubakis growing curiosity soon interferes with her ability to keep up with her work. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38915:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After an airplane crash during a school trip, Oribe Mutsumi and her classmates were stranded on a seemingly deserted island. Mutsumi found the other survivors, and used her wilderness knowledge to help them. She expects that they will be rescued in about three days, which doesnt seem so long to endure. However, she didnt account for the fact that the island is populated with gigantic killer insects. Her knowledge of butterflies, wasps, and more may be the only thing that will help any of her classmates survive to be rescued! (Source: MangaHelpers) ';}
#tags-40332:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After an airplane crash during a school trip, Oribe Mutsumi and her classmates were stranded on a seemingly deserted island. Mutsumi found the other survivors, and used her wilderness knowledge to help them. She expects that they will be rescued in about three days, which doesnt seem so long to endure. However, she didnt account for the fact that the island is populated with gigantic killer insects. Her knowledge of butterflies, wasps, and more may be the only thing that will help any of her classmates survive to be rescued! (Source: MangaHelpers) ';}
#tags-39017:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Hidden in plain sight, spirits known as youkai inhabit the world. While most are benign, a certain subset threatens the tenuous peace between youkai and humanity. Ever since she agreed to become their \"God of Wisdom,\" Kotoko Iwanaga has served as a mediator between the two realms, resolving any supernatural problems that come her way. At a local hospital, Kotoko approaches Kurou Sakuragawa, a university student whose long-term relationship ended with an unfortunate breakup. Kotoko harbors feelings for him and suspects that something supernatural lurks within his harmless appearance, so she asks Kurou for his assistance in helping out youkai. Two years later, news of an idol who was accidentally crushed to death by steel beams flooded the press. However, months later, sightings begin to tell of a faceless woman who wields a steel beam. As is the case for any supernatural problem, Kotoko and her partner set out to stop this spirit from wreaking havoc-but this case may prove to be far more sinister and personal than they could have ever thought. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32997:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Based on the manga by Red Akazawa. ';}
#tags-30652:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Falling in love at first sight with a collapsible bicycle outside the station, Ami Kurata, first-year university student empties her account without a second thought and buys the bicycle. Now she enjoys weekend cycling trips with Aoi, her childhood friend, and Hinako, a senior at her university. \"Owning a road bike may change your view of the world completely.\" Prompted by the comment, Ami purchased a road bike, and she is really impressed with the traveling performance. As soon as she places her feet on the pedals and presses down, everything about riding a road bicycle-the lightness of the pedal, the speed, the acceleration-is nothing like she has ever experienced. Amis cycle life gets going with the new road cycle as her partner! (Source: Showgate, edited) ';}
#tags-50634:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Two high school girls, Kaede and Suzu, who are in love with each other. They share intimate moments together while exploring their sexuality. ';}
#tags-50709:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The number of terrorist acts in Japan has never been lower, thanks to the efforts of a syndicate called Direct Attack (DA). The organization raises orphaned girls as killers to carry out assassinations under their \"Lycoris\" program. Takina Inoue is an exceptional Lycoris with a strong sense of purpose and a penchant for perfection. Unfortunately, a hostage situation tests her patience, and the resulting act of insubordination leads to her transfer out of DA. Not thrilled about losing the only place she belonged to, she reluctantly arrives at her new base of operations-LycoReco, a cafe in disguise. Takinas new partner, however, turns out to be quite different from what she imagined. Despite being the famed Lycoris prodigy, Chisato Nishikigi appears almost unconcerned with her duties. She drags Takina along on all kinds of odd jobs under the simple explanation of helping people in need. Takina is even more puzzled when Chisato takes down a group of armed assailants without killing any of them. Feeling like a fish out of water, Takina itches to get reinstated into DA-but Chisato is determined to prove to her that there is more to a life than just taking them. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-39071:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After a strange dream of a mysterious ancestor, high school student Yuuko Yoshida wakes to see that she has grown demonic horns and a tail. Dazed and confused, her mother reveals to her a dark family secret: her family is descended from a Dark Clan that was banished to live powerless and destitute by their mortal enemies, the magical girls of the Light Clan. The only way to lift their ancestrys curse is for Yuuko to find a magical girl, murder her, and splatter her blood all over her ancestors Demon God statue. Fortunately for \"Shadow Mistress Yuuko,\" a magical girl saves her from being run over by an oncoming truck. Unfortunately, Momo Chiyoda happens to be Yuukos classmate at Sakuragaoka High and is much stronger than her in both strength and endurance. Taking pity on her wimpy assailant, the magical girl agrees to train Yuuko and help her unlock her dormant powers. Now, Yuuko must rise up and defeat her generous frenemy to save her family from the terrible grip of poverty. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-42745:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second season of Machikado Mazoku. ';}
#tags-49470:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Listless geek Mizuto Irido and introverted nerd Yume Ayai seemed like a match made in heaven, connected by their mutual love for literature. Unfortunately, their differences gradually grew, and they separated just after their middle school graduation. But, as if by divine comedy, the two find themselves reunited as step-siblings. A rivalry begins to brew between the former couple, both unwilling to acknowledge the other as the older sibling. In an attempt to \"solve\" this issue, Mizuto and Yume agree upon a rule: whoever crosses the boundaries of siblinghood norms loses, and the winner will not only be called the older sibling, but also get to make a request. However, now that they live under the same roof, the lingering memories they share start to influence their actions-possibly rekindling the feelings that may not have been fully extinguished in the first place. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33487:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When Masamune Makabe was a child, he was rejected by a rich, beautiful girl named Aki Adagaki, who gave him the nickname Piggy for being overweight. Devastated, Masamune put great effort into working out to improve his appearance. Now a handsome yet narcissistic high school student, Masamune is determined to exact revenge-he will have Aki fall madly in love with him and ultimately reject her the next time they meet. To his surprise, Masamune discovers he has transferred into Akis school. Setting his plan into motion, Masamune first begins to form a relationship with the Brutal Princess but, despite his efforts, fails miserably at his initial attempts. Shockingly, when Masamune finally progresses towards his vengeance, he receives a mysterious letter addressing him by his old nickname. Unless Masamune discovers the senders identity, his plan is doomed before it even starts! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-37377:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Uchi no Mama ni Kagitte Upon returning home from school one day, Masamune Makabe is joyfully greeted by a young girl who he mistakes for his ever-cheerful mother. However, he quickly learns that she is actually his cousin Haruka! In fact, Haruka, his mother, and his Aunt Asae all happen to look strikingly similar to each other. Seizing the chance to reap the benefits of the situation, Masamunes sister Chinatsu persuades the three to dress up and have some fun. Tsunade Shima, Futatabi. Aki Adagaki invites Neko Fujinomiya, Tae Futaba, and Kojuurou Shuri back to Tsunade Island for another round of summer leisure. Missing from the trip is Masamune, who had injured himself by walking into a pole. His absence happens to evoke mixed feelings amongst the group, even perhaps a sense of loneliness. 12-Ji wo Sugita Cinderella Yoshino Koiwai is given the day off after completing her work at Tsunade Island. With the help of her sister, she receives a complete makeover and is involuntarily led to enjoy the opportunity away from her arduous maid duties. Despite having the brief freedom to finally indulge herself, Yoshino realizes there is satisfaction through other colorful ways. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38778:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: '\"Show them your A-O face!\" As an innocent child, Ao Horie would unhesitantly proclaim the origins of her name. Now that she is in high school, she is determined to study hard in order to one day escape the influence of her lascivious father, a famous erotic author. However, when the amiable Takumi Kijima confesses to Horie, her mind runs wild with scandalous thoughts. Moans eager to escape, legs crossing, and a warmth spreading through her body, Horie cannot help but misconstrue Kijimas rather pure motivations. To make things worse, no matter how hard she tries to ward off Kijima, his advances do not stop. Now, if only she could just study! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48483:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Miko Yotsuyas eyes water as she fixates on a single spot on her phone-she ignores yet another dreadful, horrific monster that is in her face, uttering the disturbing words: \"Can you see me?\" Before now, Miko enjoyed her unassuming high school days, with late-night horror shows serving only as a form of entertainment. But ever since one fateful day, she is the only person aware of the invisible monsters walking freely among humans. Courageously, Miko makes a bold decision: she will never, under any condition, acknowledge the presence of the horrid specters. However, even though she pretends they do not exist, she can still see how they disturb the people around her, especially her best friend, the energetic and lovely Hana Yurikawa. In order to protect them from the monsters annoyances, Miko gives it her best to continue her school life and avoid every troublesome crisis-even when they scare her to tears. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-25045:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: '2-minute specials for Barakamon featuring chibi characters. These specials were streamed exclusively on YouTube only in Japan after every episode of the main series. ';}
#tags-26085:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The story takes place during a conflict between the Krakozhia Dukedom and the Grania Republic. In the midst of the fighting, a savior appears to the Krakozhia Dukedom, and it is a high school student named Yano Souhei. Two female soldiers, First Lieutenant Ruto and Second Lieutenant Haruka, appear in tanks to intrude on Souheis everyday life, followed by the enemy soldier Shachirofu, all of whom use firearms without hesitation at his house. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-29941:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Million Doll revolves around Suuko, an idol-loving hikikomori (shut-in) who has one ability: To make any idol popular through the power of blogging. She puts her sights on the Fukuoka idol Itorio and tries to make her sell more, but she is impeded by the charismatic idol Ryuu-san and the underground idol Mariko. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-31422:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Maiharu Hiromi has moved from Nagasaki to Kamakura. She begins her new life in Kamakura and her first day in Minami Kamakura High School by cycling to her school, but she has not ridden a bicycle in many years. On the way to the first day ceremony she almost crashes into Akizuki Tomoe. Obviously Hiromi needs a lot more practice, so Tomoe decides to help Hiromi train to become better at riding a bicycle, and they become good friends. When they discover that the school used to have a bicycle club, the girls, together with Kamikura Fuyune and Higa Natsumi, resurrect the club naming it the Minami Kamakura High School Girls Bicycle Club. (Source: AniDB) ';}
#tags-34734:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Unaired episode included with the special edition BD release. The girls hear from school principal Ryuko that the school is considering Taiwan as the destination for the school trip. Since Taiwan is one of only a few advance cycling nations, she instructs the cycling club to go to Taiwan as part of a preliminary inspection for the school trip. But as soon as they arrive in Taiwan, Hiromi and Sandy become separated... (Source: Crunchyroll) ';}
#tags-20033:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Miss Monochrome is an android powered by a single AA battery. She lives with her only friend, a robot vacuum named Ruu-chan. With hopes of one day meeting the idol Kikuko, whom she has bizarre recurring dreams about, Miss Monochrome sets foot on the path to stardom. However, she experiences difficulties and struggles to make her own debut as an idol. Though Miss Monochromes methods seem bizarre, such as recruiting her manager from a convenience store, somehow her dedication always results in her standing out from the crowd and shining in the spotlight. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-30384:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The Ultra Super Pictures Special Stage event announced at AnimeJapan 2015 on Saturday that the Miss Monochrome television anime series will receive a second season. The season will run within the 30-minute Ultra Super Anime Time block beginning on July 3, 2015. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-31560:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Third season of Miss Monochrome: The Animation. ';}
#tags-35078:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Residing within Tokyos district of Ueno are the Colors, three individuals who protect their city by performing good deeds and aiding their community. Or, at the very least, they pretend to be the citys defenders. In reality, the Colors are just three young girls: the shy Yui Akamatsu, the noisy Sacchan, and the video game-loving Kotoha, who spend their time playing make-believe and exploring the city. The Colors activities are facilitated by the grandfatherly Daigorou \"Pops\" Kujiraoka, who uses his stores inventory of knick-knacks to entertain the rambunctious trio. Not everyone is a fan of the Colors though. The local policeman Saitou just wants to deal with his regular duties, but he often finds himself the target of the Colors attention, having been made the villain in most of their fantasies. But despite his personal feelings, Saitou always finds the time to go along with the three girls games. Even though the Colors do not actually defend Ueno, they definitely help brighten everyones day. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-10671:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Morita Mayu, a high school girl. She is extremely reticent and her silence and habit of looking at peoples eyes straightly sometimes cause misunderstanding. The reason behind it is not because she doesn’t like to talk nor because she has nothing to say. The reason she rarely speaks is due to the fact she thinks too much before speaking, thus losing the timing to speak altogether. But she lives a happy school life with her classmates. ';}
#tags-11615:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The second season of Morita-san wa Mukuchi that directly follows the first. ';}
#tags-9181:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Rito Yuuki never gets a break-hes always finding himself in lewd accidents with girls around him. Although his heart still yearns for Haruna, his childhood love, Rito cant help but question his feelings for Lala, the alien princess who appeared in front of him and declared she would marry him. But now, its not just Lala he has to deal with: her younger twin sisters, Momo and Nana, have also traveled to Earth, wanting to meet their older sisters fiancé, and just as luck would have it, they end up staying at Ritos home. Meanwhile, amidst the bustle of his new family members, Yami, the human weapon girl, begins her pursuit for Rito. Its not an easy life for Rito as he deals with uncertain love, punishment for being a pervert, and a girl dead set on murdering him. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-41619:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Fifty years ago, horrific creatures dubbed as the \"enemies of humanity\" suddenly appeared around the world. To combat these threats, teenagers gifted with supernatural abilities called \"Talents\"-such as pyrokinesis and time travel-hone their powers at an academy on a secluded island. Nanao Nakajima, however, is quite different from the others on the island: he has no Talent. With many \"Talented\" teenagers around him, Nanao is often a target for bullying, but even so, he still strives to complete his training. Soon after, two transfer students, the mysterious Kyouya Onodera and the mind-reading Nana Hiiragi, join the class. But just as everyone starts blending as comrades-in-arms, mysterious disappearances begin to threaten the classs entire foundation. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35335:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Sequel series to Urawa no Usagi-chan. ';}
#tags-16067:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Long ago, all humans lived beneath the sea. However, some people preferred the surface and abandoned living underwater permanently. As a consequence, they were stripped of their god-given protection called \"Ena\" which allowed them to breathe underwater. Over time, the rift between the denizens of the sea and of the surface widened, although contact between the two peoples still existed. Nagi no Asu kara follows the story of Hikari Sakishima and Manaka Mukaido, along with their childhood friends Chisaki Hiradaira and Kaname Isaki, who are forced to leave the sea and attend a school on the surface. There, the group also meets Tsumugu Kihara, a fellow student and fisherman who loves the sea. Hikari and his friends lives are bound to change as they have to deal with the deep-seated hatred and discrimination between the people of sea and of the surface, the storms in their personal lives, as well as an impending tempest which may spell doom for all who dwell on the surface. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38397:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second year high school student Ichirou Satou has always been an average person-that is, until he runs into some not-so-average situations with his teacher, Kana \"The Demon\" Kojima. Kojima is Satous Japanese language teacher with a reputation for being so ruthless that even school delinquents bow down to her. One fateful day, things escalate when Satou runs into Kojima in the restroom, leading them to share an intimate encounter that makes his imagination run wild for days after. Nande Koko ni Sensei ga? follows the daily life of Satou and his teacher as they continue to meet under similar conditions, growing ever closer with each encounter. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36038:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'For the first time since graduating high school, 30-year-old Moriko Morioka is unemployed-and she couldnt be happier. Having quit her long-standing job of over 11 years, Moriko quickly turns to online games to pass her now-plentiful free time, reinventing herself as the handsome and dashing male hero \"Hayashi\" in the MMO Fruits de Mer. With the pesky societal obligations of the real world out of the way, she blissfully dives headfirst into the realm of the game, where she promptly meets the kind and adorable healer Lily. Befriending each other almost instantly, the two become inseparable just as Moriko herself becomes more and more engrossed in her new \"life\" as Hayashi. Eventually, Moriko adopts the reclusive lifestyle in its entirety, venturing out from the safety of her apartment only when absolutely necessary. Meanwhile, unbeknownst to Moriko, a timid 28-year-old corporate worker named Yuuta Sakurai has also logged onto Fruits de Mer from the other side of town. Coincidentally bumping into each other at the convenience store one night, both write off their meeting as no more than just another awkward encounter with a stranger-however, fate has more in store for them than they think. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36043:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Much to her dismay, Moriko Moriokas computer has broken down. However, not all is lost as she remembers that Yuuta Sakurai is a computer geek, leading Morioka to seek his expertise. But when Sakurai visits to help build her a new computer, hilarity ensues. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-18897:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Raku Ichijou, a first-year student at Bonyari High School, is the sole heir to an intimidating yakuza family. Ten years ago, Raku made a promise to his childhood friend. Now, all he has to go on is a pendant with a lock, which can only be unlocked with the key which the girl took with her when they parted. Now, years later, Raku has grown into a typical teenager, and all he wants is to remain as uninvolved in his yakuza background as possible while spending his school days alongside his middle school crush Kosaki Onodera. However, when the American Bee Hive Gang invades his familys turf, Rakus idyllic romantic dreams are sent for a toss as he is dragged into a frustrating conflict: Raku is to pretend that he is in a romantic relationship with Chitoge Kirisaki, the beautiful daughter of the Bee Hives chief, so as to reduce the friction between the two groups. Unfortunately, reality could not be farther from this whopping lie-Raku and Chitoge fall in hate at first sight, as the girl is convinced he is a pathetic pushover, and in Rakus eyes, Chitoge is about as attractive as a savage gorilla. Nisekoi follows the daily antics of this mismatched couple who have been forced to get along for the sake of maintaining the citys peace. With many more girls popping up his life, all involved with Rakus past somehow, his search for the girl who holds his heart and his promise leads him in more unexpected directions than he expects. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-27787:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Despite having seemingly quelled the war between their respective gangs, Raku Ichijou and Chitoge Kirisaki still carry on with their fake relationship. Eventually, as Chitoges perception of Raku slowly changes, she even begins to see him as a little charming. Chitoge struggles to come to terms with her newfound feelings for Raku, as a new girl joins the slew of Rakus admirers and the competition among those vying for the yakuza heirs attention grows even fiercer. And amidst all this, Rakus search for his first love and the contents of the mysterious sealed locket continues in Nisekoi:, which picks up where the first season left off. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32829:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Rescued from nearly drowning in a river, a young Chidori yearns to pay back her saviors kindness. Though her cute and innocent appearance might not show it, she is actually a highly skilled ninja, so years later, Chidori and her friend Sukezou come to serve under the man who saved her-the ambitious warlord, Nobunaga Oda. As Nobunaga fights off invading forces and sets his sights upon neighboring lands, Chidori is assigned vital tasks to assure victory, such as gathering information or assassinating key figures. Between taking on these important missions and dealing with the colorful cast of Nobunagas family and servants, the young ninja is always ready to do her best to lead her master toward greatness. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-34283:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Oda Nobunaga saves a girl from drowning one day. She clumsily tells him that shes a shinobi. Instead of attempting to kill him, she swears to serve him one day after hearing his plans to unify Japan. (Source: Crunchyroll) ';}
#tags-17549:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Hotaru Ichijous lifestyle completely changes when she leaves Tokyo and moves with her family to the isolated Asahigaoka village. Her new school has only five students including herself, all sharing a single classroom regardless of grade level. There are no convenience stores in the area, and it can take up to two hours for a bus to arrive. Nevertheless, Hotaru finds herself captivated by the countrysides charm thanks to her four unique schoolmates with whom she quickly forms a genuine bond. The most colorful of them is Renge Miyauchi, a first-grader who is often perceptive despite her age. However, no less intriguing are the three Koshigaya siblings: the quiet oldest brother Suguru, the petite older sister Komari, and the prankish youngest sister Natsumi. Having someone from the city join their cheerful little group enlivens the ordinary days in Asahigaoka. Not only does Hotaru bring firsthand knowledge from the alluring outside world, but her fresh outlook on life welcomes a blossom of change to their usual routine. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36990:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'With summer vacation coming to an end, the girls are having as much fun as they can with their remaining time. However, their daily shenanigans are cut short when Suguru Koshigaya wins the grand prize of a lottery-tickets to Okinawa! After hasty preparations, the Asahigaoka group embarks on a three-day trip for their final summer getaway. Upon arriving in Okinawa and checking into an inn, the group comes across Aoi Niizato-the young daughter of the inns hostess. Despite being of similar age, her mature demeanor leaves Natsumi Koshigaya reflecting upon her own childish nature. With the sign of an unexpected friendship blooming on the horizon, the girls waste no time diving into their ambitious sightseeing plans and regional activities! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-23623:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Far from the hustle and bustle of urban life, and with only a single candy store and bus route to its name, the rural Asahigaoka is certainly not a place for everyone. Nevertheless, the villages children still manage to cheerfully spend their days exploring and having fun in the wilderness around them. One such child, Renge Miyauchi, the youngest of the group, looks forward to the entrance ceremony of the upcoming school year, signalling her entry into first grade and the beginning of her elementary school life. Attending the only school in town, Renge and her friends, seventh grader Natsumi Koshigaya and her eighth grade sister Komari, make the most out of their rural lifestyle, playing and studying everyday. Meanwhile, fifth grader Hotaru Ichijou has just moved to Asahigaoka from Tokyo, unaware of the numerous adventures and memories that await her. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32547:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Life in rural Asahigaoka moves at its own pace. Devoid of the pleasures and worries of a bustling metropolis, this small village might seem painfully dull at first glance. However, despite living this far from her hometown of Tokyo, Hotaru Ichijou manages to find a group of friends whom she can spend quality time with. No matter whether its winter, spring, summer, or fall, they make full use of everything the nature around them has to offer. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-21667:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'While spending a summer day at the department store, Suguru Koshigaya wins the lotterys grand prize-four tickets to Okinawa! Filled with awe and excitement, the girls of Asahigaoka do various things to prepare for the trip. From practicing how to ride on an airplane to buying travel essentials at the convenience store, they do everything beforehand so they can enjoy their time in Okinawa to the fullest extent. A departure from the familiar scenery of Asahigaoka is a new experience for Renge Miyauchi, but that does not stop her from pondering how her perspective of the world may change. As the day of the trip draws near, a promise is made. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-17157:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After moving into his new apartment, art school student Tatsuhiko Kido discovers a crack in his wall. When he peeks inside, he makes eye contact with his neighbor, Emiru Ikuno, as she masturbates. He rushes next door to clear the misunderstanding and inform her of the crack, but accidentally trips and falls over her in the process. To make matters even worse, Emiru now has photographic evidence that would plainly depict Kido as a sexual offender. Kido then learns that Emiru has a voyeurism fetish, and is blackmailed into leaving the crack as is. Unfortunately for Kido, it doesnt stop here! Emiru is also attending the same art school that he is, and he will be seeing her far more than he would like to. Emiru and Kido are set to embark on a unique friendship with wildly erotic potential. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-34148:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Average high school student Yuuko Konagai tends to be rather shy and socially awkward. Due to this, besides earning rather mediocre grades, she barely has friends inside her class. However, after a monotonous day at school, she returns to her long-awaited haven-home with her cats Maa, Shi, and Ro! With their unique personalities, the three possess bodies similar to those of humans, retaining the ability to speak and communicate. Every day, the adorable bunch awaits their owners return to shower her with much-needed companionship. Nyanko Days highlights the life of Yuuko and her cats as they brighten up each moment and make new friends in the passing days. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-28819:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Hayato Izumi is running for student council president. Hes studious, responsible, down to earth...and completely outmatched by his rival, Ui Wakana. Ui wins in a landslide after promising comprehensive sex education, free condoms, and other exciting reforms. Bloodied but not discouraged, Hayato licks his wounds and settles for vice president. Then Ui moves in with him. As it turns out, their parents made a drunken promise decades ago that their children would one day marry. Ui and Hayato must now balance school life with matrimony, keeping their relationship secret from a prudish student body and learning to live with each other. Can they keep the student council in line and find happiness together? Find out in Okusama ga Seitokaichou! ';}
#tags-32603:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The story begins with Izumi Hayato running to be student council president. But when a beautiful girl swings in promising the liberalization of love while flinging condoms into the audience, he ends up losing to her and becoming the vice president. At the student council meeting, the newly-elected president invites herself over to Izumis house, where she promptly announces she is to become Izumis wife thanks to an agreement-facilitated by alcohol-made between their parents when they were only 3. (Source: MAL Scanlations) ';}
#tags-13283:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A slice of life of high school girls in the early summer. Shiozaki Haruno is a 17-year-old girl who loves her motor cycle, HONDAs Giorno. She lives in remote highlands and longs for a vivid life in a city. Encounters with people staying at Harunos parents boardinghouse encourage her to step forward to her dream. ';}
#tags-34392:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Having just moved into a new apartment building, Yui Hanasaka makes a customary visit to greet her neighbor. When she learns that he is an upperclassman at the university she aspires to attend, she asks for his help to pass her entrance exams. Meanwhile, Natsuki Momohara decides to visit her older brother, who lives alone in an apartment in Tokyo. Elsewhere, aspiring singer Moka Aoshima reunites with her childhood friend, who is a hopeful novelist. Three stories, although seemingly unrelated, contain the same essence: strings of fate will bind together those who share the same destiny, and one needs to look no further than a single apartment room. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36431:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second season of One Room. ';}
#tags-38061:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A summary of One Rooms first 4 episodes aired as a prequel to the second season. ';}
#tags-41364:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Third season of One Room. ';}
#tags-20931:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The story revolves around Tomoya Mizuhara, a 13-year-old boy who suddenly gains a big sister when his father remarries. 17-year-old Ichika is a little strange, and her affection for Tomoya is rather overwhelming, if not scary. On top of things, Ichikas friend Ruri is the ultimate sadist. Then there is Ichikas big-breasted quarter-Japanese friend Marina. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-40022:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The four daughters of the Onami household-Sora, Akane, Kohaku, and Sumi-have set some \"rules\" for their brother to follow when hugging them. He must make sure that each hug is: at least 10 seconds long; accompanied with a sniff; and, most importantly, done with lots of affection. Of course, these stipulations apply not only to mere hugging, but also to even more intimate acts. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50955:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Three oni-kids who, through the power of the onipan (a portmanteau of \"oni\" and \"pantsu\") become human to help fix the relationship between humans and oni. The three girls transfer into a normal Tokyo high school to aid in their task and help fix their image by revitalizing the town, sometimes jumping headfirst into school events, and other times...becoming idols! (Source: Crunchyroll News) ';}
#tags-31143:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After many years of dormant rest, a hot springs fairy awakens in modern-day Japan. However, while she slept, she took on the appearance of a young girl. She decides to cooperate with the locals whilst trying to regain her powers. (Source: LiveChart) ';}
#tags-31621:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Maeda has just moved into his new apartment to live by himself. While unpacking, a cute middle school student named Chie Satonaka suddenly appears in his room. She introduces herself as his new landlord, which pleasantly surprises him as he has never seen a landlord so young. His excitement is boosted further when the gorgeous Reiko Shirai, who lives directly next to him, also introduces herself as his new neighbor. Ooyasan wa Shishunki! follows the everyday lives of Maeda and his newfound acquaintances, where each day presents itself as an opportunity for new events to unfold and new bonds to be forged. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-25099:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Kimito Kagurazaka is a commoner with a fetish for mens muscles-or at least thats the lie he must keep telling if he wants to keep himself out of trouble at the elite all-girls school, Seikain Academy. Kidnapped by the school under the assumption that he prefers men, Kimito is made to be their \"commoner sample,\" exposing the girls to both commoner and man so that the transition to the world after school is not jarring. Threatened with castration should his sexual preferences not match the schools assumptions, Kimito keeps up the facade to protect his manhood. But there are eccentric individuals around every corner who begin to make Kimitos life even more difficult. Among them are Aika Tenkuubashi, a social outcast who blurts out whatever comes to mind; Hakua Shiodome, a young genius; Karen Jinryou, the daughter of samurai who is obsessed with defeating Kimito; and Reiko Arisugawa, the perfect student who has delusions of marrying Kimito. Along with the commoner himself, these four girls make up the Commoner Club, which attempts to teach the girls more about life outside the school, while Kimito gradually learns about the odd girls surrounding him. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36027:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'It can be rough transferring to a new school-even more so if you dont want to make any friends, like Nobuaki Kanazawa. But the reason for his antisocial behavior soon becomes clear when his class receives a text from someone called \"The King.\" Included are instructions for the \"Kings Game,\" and all class members must participate. Those who refuse to play, quit halfway, or dont follow an order in the allotted time of 24 hours will receive a deadly punishment. Having played the game before and watched as those around him died, Nobuaki tries to warn his clueless classmates. Unfortunately, they only believe him after the Kings Game claims its first casualties. Stuck in a horrific situation with no chance of escape, Nobuaki has a choice: put his own survival above those around him, or do what he couldnt before and save his classmates. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36889:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'There is no bond stronger than the one between siblings. Yui has been the center of her brothers sexual desires ever since they were children. But in recent years, something in their relationship has changed. The divorce of their parents has forced Akira to pay more attention to Yuis well-being, take care of her on a daily basis, and assume the paternal role in their family. As the two grow older, Akira has taken notice of the physical changes in Yui-she is no longer the precious child he thought he knew. Unable to stop himself, he starts sneaking into her room at night, admiring his sisters body and pleasing himself to her. Akira becomes increasingly frustrated with the distance between them; but when Yui reveals that a friend from school has confessed to her, something snaps inside him. No longer restricting himself to mere daydreams, he actively has intercourse with his sleeping sister. However, unbeknownst to Akira, Yui remains wide awake during these nightly visits; yet, for some reason, is unwilling to stop him. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-31498:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'For the airheaded Minami Tani, there is nothing more delightful than delicious bread for breakfast. Bonding over a mutual love for the food, Minami meets the dignified Yuu Aizawa and the upbeat Fuyumi Fukagawa. Joining them is Noa Sakura, a pint-sized girl who sees bread as the ultimate weapon of self-defense. Together, the girls strengthen their bonds of friendship, while striving to sample every kind of bread this world has to offer. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-40436:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After gaining the title of the strongest warrior in the world, Peter Grill has finally proven his worth and is ready to take the hand of his beloved senior, the beautiful and innocent Luvelia Sanctos. Peter expects to have a healthy relationship with her, despite some objections from her father. Unfortunately, this dream quickly breaks apart as news of his grand victory spreads among the womenfolk of other races-ogres, orcs, elves, and others-some of them even vying for his seed to produce offspring blessed with his might. To avoid betraying the trust of his cherished Luvelia and causing a scandal, Peter strives to avoid other womens salacious advances. However, accomplishing such a feat with so many alluring women on his trail is easier said than done. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-16397:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Kazuya, a mild-mannered high school sophomore coming to the end of a very average summer break, receives a digital single lens reflex camera as a gift. His nerdy fascination with its design soon turns to wonder when he realizes this little gadget could really give his social life a shot in the arm! (Source: TBS) ';}
#tags-33447:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'While on her summer break, Morina Nanase starts a new part-time job as a waitress at Trattoria Festa, an Italian restaurant. Finding the restaurant adorable and coincidentally close to her house, Morina quickly settles into her new profession. However, her new job comes with several eccentric co-workers and Italian dishes she has never heard of. The restaurants typical fare includes a variety of pasta dishes such as penne arrabbiata, rich dessert such as tiramisu, and even caponata. Join Morina in her restaurant adventures as she gets to know her co-workers and serves the best Italian cuisine to her customers with a smile. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-5391:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The crisp rays of summer sun find the effeminate Pico embroiled in yet another heated and lustful fling. While out biking, Pico meets and befriends Chico-a lively boy not much younger than him, but leagues behind in the affairs of the flesh. After the innocent Chico shows his sister in the midst of self-pleasure to Pico, Pico takes it upon himself to educate this confused youth. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-4866:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The young couple Pico and Chico are out for a date in town when a chance encounter has them immediately seduced by the mysterious runaway named CoCo. Pico is instantly drawn in by CoCos spiritual outlook and feminine charms, but little does he know that the swaying of his heart will fuel the sparks of jealousy, passion, and desperation between the trio, ready to engulf them in an inferno of arousal and anxiety at any moment. Two may be company, but is three really a crowd? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50917:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Black Cat Cafe is located in the fifth ward of the Imperial Capital. Having lost their purpose after the war ended a few years prior, advanced mechanical dolls known as Automata have been restored and now work at the cafe wearing elegant kimonos. While they adjust to the peaceful world, events of the past continue to haunt the Automata, preventing them from letting go of the responsibility they once held. Among the Automata working at Black Cat Cafe is the recently restored Haizakura, who has lost her memories during a reset. Her identity and role in this unfamiliar world are a mystery to her, but one thing is certain-she loves to sing. With never-ending curiosity and beautiful songs to guide them, Haizakura and the Automata search for their new purpose together, supporting each other no matter how rigorous that endeavor might be. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-19315:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Abandoned by their abusive parents and with only each other to depend on, siblings Utsutsu and Yume Hasegawa find themselves led astray by beautiful red butterflies that have appeared in their world. Unbeknownst to them, these crimson winged heralds trumpet the beginning of a cannibalistic nightmare-a mysterious virus known as Pupa is about to hatch. After succumbing to the full effects of Pupa, Yume undergoes a grotesque metamorphosis into a monstrous creature with an insatiable desire for flesh; Utsutsu, on the other hand, is only partially affected, gaining remarkable regenerative powers instead. Reaffirming the resolve to keep the promise he made to himself years ago, Utsutsu is willing to sacrifice everything in order to always be there for his precious little sister. Pupa tells the story of a loving brothers desperate struggles to save his sister while protecting the world from her uncontrollable hunger. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-10448:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'An independent animated short-film by Hiroyasu Ishida, the animator of Fumiko no Kokuhaku. In a small, forgotten town where the rain never stops, a chance encounter between a robot and an inquisitive little girl brings back memories and a chance reunion with a girl the girl the robot has never forgotten. ';}
#tags-11491:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Atsushi Miyagawa is an 11-year-old boy with the appearance of a fully-grown man. His 17-year-old sister, Atsumi, has the stature of a child! From Atsushi being arrested numerous times as a suspected predator to Atsumi constantly grabbed like a small child more times than she can count, many things go wrong for this curious sibling duo. Atsumis classmate is even in love with Atsushi, oblivious to his true age! Despite all this, indeed, there is not a single dull moment in the Miyagawa household. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-18099:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Third season of Recorder to Randoseru. ';}
#tags-13377:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second season. ';}
#tags-32262:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When a strange girl named Guri comes knocking at Seiji Ainos door, he quickly finds himself thrust into a world of romantic troubles. Claiming that she will die if he doesnt kiss someone within 24 hours, Guris pleas of desperation are misunderstood as pleas for love, leading Seiji to kiss the cute stranger that came barging into his house. In actuality, it turns out that this cosplaying cupid is the wielder of a Kiss Note, in which any pairing of names she writes will kiss and become a couple. Guri explains that she misspelt and accidentally wrote Seijis name while indulging in her yaoi fantasies, but because she had yet to pair him with anyone, their kiss was meaningless. Even worse, Guri reveals that if Seiji is not coupled with anyone soon, not only will she die, but Seiji will remain a virgin for eternity! Eager to escape his fate, Seiji sets his sights on the beautiful and popular Akane Hiyama. But after Akane hears that he kissed Guri, she reveals the obsessive and psychopathic feelings that she holds for the unfortunate boy and proceeds to viciously attack them. In the ensuing confusion, Guri is able to pair Seiji with Akane in the Kiss Note, temporarily saving Seiji from any further bodily harm. But to complicate matters, Guris newfound feelings lead her to also pair the two of them with herself. Just when the situation could not get any more convoluted, this new coupling with Guri has turned Seiji and Akane into temporary angels, forcing them into assisting the cupid with her work of pairing humans, lest they be cast into hell. With all semblance of normality snatched from his life, Seiji gets to work at matchmaking with these eccentric girls by his side. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-51403:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'In the near future when technology has significantly advanced, a famous AI TV fortune teller seemingly foresees high school student Asahi Kashiwagis day with pinpoint accuracy. On his way to school, he encounters Aoi Izumisawa, Bai Mongfa, Karin Istel, Amelia Irving, and Ilya Ilyukhin. Despite meeting them for the first time, Asahi suddenly receives love confessions from all of them at the end of the same day, perfectly aligning with the fortune tellers prediction. As if that was not enough, Asahi soon learns that these five individuals are actually candidates to become his bride, and they have been invited by his father to live at Asahis home. Left with no other choice, he reluctantly allows them to stay, resulting in a bawdy turn of events that brightens up his average high school life. However, as Asahi spends more time with them, forgotten memories gradually resurface. While uncovering the hidden truth, Asahi begins to believe that his fate with these potential partners might be more than just mere coincidence. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38529:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Rifle-shooting sports are competitive activities testing accuracy and precision using a rifle. In Japan, carrying firearms is prohibited, so most of the participants are members of the defense force. When the use of rifles using a light beam instead of real bullets as ammunition became common, rifle-shooting competitions became accessible to the younger population, giving way to school contests. First-year high school student and marksmanship enthusiast Hikari Kokura has just transferred to Chidori High School. She tries to join the club of her choice, but finds out that the club no longer exists due to the low popularity of the sport. Distraught, she tries to restore the club and somehow manages to recruit three other members: her childhood friend Izumi Shibusawa, the half-Russian Erika Meinohama, and the stoic Yukio Igarashi. This marks the beginning of the Chidori Rifle-Shooting Club, who have only one goal-to compete on the national stage! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-10572:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Subaru Hasegawa has the ambition to become one of the best basketball superstars of all time. However, this comes to an apparent halt when his schools basketball team ceases activities for a year. Shocked by the news, he decides not to involve himself in basketball anymore. One day, his aunt Mihoshi Takamura invites him to coach the Keishin Academy girls basketball team on how to play the sport, and he reluctantly agrees. He meets sixth-graders Tomoka Minato, Maho Misawa, Airi Kashii, Hinata Hakamada and Saki Nagatsuki, and begins training them in the sport with one goal: to defeat all strong opponents along the way. Ro-Kyu-Bu! follows the effort of five elementary girls and their coach as they improve their cute style of playing basketball. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-15807:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Ro-Kyu-Bu! OVA bundled with the PlayStation Portable game \"Ro-Kyu-Bu!: Himitsu no Otoshimono.\" ';}
#tags-52865:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Anzu Hoshino needs only three things in her life: video games, chocolate, and her beloved cat. Unlike other high school girls, Anzu has no time for or interest in romance. But as she begins playing a poorly programmed 3D otome game, a bizarre flying wizard named Riri emerges from the screen and calls Anzu \"subject one,\" the first person who will experience a dating game harem storyline in real life. Despite Anzus fiery protests, Riri confiscates her favorite things to force her to focus on love. Riri orchestrates a series of unlucky incidents and romantic cliches that lead her to meet Tsukasa Kazuki, one of the most attractive boys in her school. Still enraged, Anzu is adamant about resisting Tsukasas charm. As all the ridiculous fabricated scenarios help Anzu warm up to Tsukasas pleasant nature, Riri throws other stereotypical pretty boys her way-and avoiding romance quickly becomes almost impossible. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-2993:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Youkai Academy is a seemingly normal boarding school, except that its pupils are monsters learning to coexist with humans. All students attend in human form and take normal academic subjects, such as literature, gym, foreign language, and mathematics. However, there is one golden rule at Youkai Academy-all humans found on school grounds are to be executed immediately! Tsukune Aono is an average teenager who is unable to get into any high school because of his bad grades. His parents inadvertently enroll him into Youkai Academy as a last-ditch effort to secure his education. As Tsukune unknowingly enters this new world, he has a run-in with the most attractive girl on campus, Moka Akashiya. Deciding to stay in the perilous realm in order to further his relationship with Moka, he does not realize that beneath her beauty lies a menacing monster-a vampire. Rosario to Vampire is a supernatural school comedy that explores Tsukunes romantic exploits, experiences, and misadventures with a bevy of beautiful but dangerous creatures. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35905:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Shogi, a Japanese game similar to chess, is one of the most popular board games in the country, played by everyone from children to the elderly. Some players are talented enough to take the game to a professional level. The title of Ryuuou, meaning \"the dragon king,\" is only awarded to the person who reaches the pinnacle of competitive shogi. Yaichi Kuzuryuu has just become the youngest Ryuuou after winning the grand championship. However, the shogi community is unwelcoming to his victory, some even calling him the worst Ryuuou in history. Moreover, he forgets about the agreement he made with Ai Hinatsuru, a little girl he promised to coach if he won. After she shows up at his doorstep, he reluctantly agrees to uphold his promise and makes Ai his disciple. Together, they aim to improve and exceed the limits of their shogi prowess: Ai, to unlock her hidden talents; Yaichi, to prove to the world that he deserves his accomplishments. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-20709:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'On a train to her new middle school, Momoka Sonokawa is preyed upon by a molester, only to be rescued by a girl wielding dual pistols. The girl turns out to be Miou Ootori, Momokas upperclassman and president of the Aogiri Academys Survival Game Club, called Sabage-bu for short. Noticing Momokas aptitude with a pistol, Miou takes a liking to her and tries to persuade her to join the club. In spite of her steadfast refusal, Momoka inexplicably finds herself a member of Sabage-bu. Sabage-bu is anything but a typical middle-school club. Its members socially awkward behaviors scare Momoka. Their personalities range from the fanatical to the completely delusional. They do not hold back from walking around public areas wearing ghillie suits or even bungee jumping from the school building. Thrown together with this collection of survival game maniacs, the zealously ordinary Momoka must somehow adjust to her unexpectedly wild school life. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-51837:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The maid Lilith, hired to look after young Yuuri and his familys mansion, seems highly suspicious: she is too good to be true. Every dish she serves turns out to be delicious, the whole residence sparkles after she cleans it, and all the clothing has given off a pleasant scent since she started doing the laundry. Furthermore, her devilishly beautiful eyes only serve to heighten Yuuris suspicions. Is Lilith perhaps a witch or a sorcerer? Yuuri cannot figure it out. But despite his misgivings, Yuuri has to live with Lilith as he tries to unravel the mystery behind her otherworldly charm. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32542:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Sophisticated, suave, sublime; all words which describe the exceedingly handsome and patently perfect Sakamoto. Though it is only his first day in high school, his attractiveness, intelligence, and charm already has the girls swooning and the guys fuming with jealousy. No one seems able to derail him, as all attempts at tripping him up are quickly foiled. His sangfroid is indomitable, his wits peerless. Will any of Sakamotos classmates, or even teachers, be able to reach his level of excellence? Probably not, but they just might learn a thing or two trying... [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-13759:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'At Suimei High, the Sakura-sou dormitory is infamous for housing the schools most notorious delinquents. Thus, when the relatively tame Sorata Kanda is transferred to the dorm, escaping this insane asylum becomes his foremost goal. Trapped there for the time being, he must learn how to deal with his fellow residents, including bubbly animator Misaki Kamiigusa, charming playboy writer Jin Mitaka, and the ever-reclusive Ryuunosuke Akasaka. Surrounded by weirdness, Sorata frequently finds respite in his interactions with his one \"normal\" friend, aspiring voice actress Nanami Aoyama. When Mashiro Shiina-a new foreign exchange student-joins the dormitory, Sorata is instantly enraptured by her beauty. Underneath her otherworldly appearance, Mashiro is an autistic savant, capable of world-renowned brilliance in her art, yet unable to perform simple daily tasks. After Sorata ends up in charge of taking care of Mashiro, the two inevitably grow closer, with Soratas initial desire to escape the dormitory becoming a forgotten goal. Despite their eccentricities, every resident is incredible in their own field, leaving Sorata to contend with his own lack of any particular skill. With brilliance all around him, he thus strives to become an equal to their talent. Revolving around the hardships and joys of its colorful cast, Sakura-sou no Pet na Kanojo is a heartwarming coming-of-age tale of friendship, love, ambition, and heartbreak-through the lens of an ordinary person surrounded by the extraordinary. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-2944:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A horrible murder has been committed on the grounds of Nankai Academy. Professor Yuko, one of the schools most popular teachers, died when she was pushed off of the roof of one of the schools buildings. Her death has left her students with feelings of confusion, pain, and above all else... anger. Four of her male students, Masayoshi, Daisuke, Mitsuru and Shinya, are determined to uncover the truth. They soon discover an important clue: Professor Yukos planner had been marked on the very night she was killed... marked with the names of seven girls. With this evidence, the boys begin their investigations... and theyll use any method required in order to find the murderer. Through rape, manipulation and torture, they uncover important details, but piecing the puzzle together wont be easy. And the longer their search draws on, the more they feel themselves being overtaken by their own dark desires... Will they ever find out the truth behind Yukos death? (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-35069:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Tucked away in the darkest depths of this world, tales of the bizarre and the supernatural quietly unfold. These inexplicable stories are chronicled throughout the pages of a certain strange encyclopedia, sheltered within a crumbling, decrepit building. Do you dare to open its cover and experience the horrors firsthand? Each of the macabre tales held within the books pages details some unusual, surreal experiences that often come to a gruesome end. A man searches for his adulterous wife, only to find himself at the mercy of otherworldly visitors; a boy befriends a snowman who harbors a sinister secret; crop circles suddenly form on a family farm, created by some unexpected visitors; hidden in plain sight, menacing mechanical beings continue on undetected. In all of these horrifying stories, nothing is as simple as it seems, revealing a terrifying darkness that perhaps might have been best left alone. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33803:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The history, either daily life or life stories of Sengoku warriors, is described using animals. We invite popular young actors and unique casts to voice out those Sengoku warriors while joking about them. An anime that teases Japans history and Sengoku warriors; thats \"Sengoku Choujuu Giga.\" (Source: MAL News) ';}
#tags-49160:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Fushihara-san spends most of her time stuck in front of her office computer, regularly toiling at overtime like a corporate slave, even after all her coworkers have gone home. Noticing her unhealthy situation, a ghost in the form of a little girl rumored to haunt the building takes it upon herself to scare Fushihara-san out of the office in order to relieve her stress. However, the ghosts overwhelming cuteness only does the opposite and instead motivates Fushihara-san to work even more. Even so, the presence of this adorable soul will only bring more positivity and happiness to Fushihara-sans life as the two spend more time together. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-23233:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Running into your new stepsister in the bathroom is not the best way to make a good first impression, which Basara Toujou learns the hard way. When his father suddenly brings home two beautiful girls and introduces them as his new siblings, he has no choice but to accept into his family the Naruse sisters: busty redhead Mio and petite silver-haired Maria. But when these seemingly normal girls reveal themselves as demons-Mio the former Demon Lords only daughter and Maria her trusted succubus servant-Basara is forced to reveal himself as a former member of a clan of \"Heroes,\" sworn enemies of the demons. However, having begun to care for his new sisters, Basara instead decides to protect them with his powers and forms a master-servant contract with Mio to keep watch over her. With the Heroes observing his every move and the constant threat of hostile demons, Basara has to do the impossible to protect his new family members. Moreover, the protector himself is hiding his own dark secret that still haunts him to this day... [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-29027:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'OVA episode of Shinmai Maou no Testament, sold with the eight volume of the light novel of the same property. Part A: Maria is up to her ususal hijinx using a new prototype succubus video camera she tries to record one of Mios erotic dreams. Part B: Basara is invited by Sensie Hasegawa to her apartment for dinner. He gets more hospitality than he ever would have expected! ';}
#tags-51098:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Ittoki Sakuraba fails to understand why his mother, his uncle, and his childhood friend, Kousetsu, seem to take his security so seriously. Kousetsu constantly follows and observes him with no regard for his privacy, focusing only on keeping him safe every waking moment. But the consistent hounding starts making sense when an adorable second-year student at his high school, Satomi Tsubaki, asks Ittoki out on a date. Though initially innocent, Tsubakis true intentions soon become apparent when Ittoki visits her house; she plans to assassinate him, and she is not alone. Surprisingly, the ones who come to his aid are his uncle and Kousetsu-donning their dark and deadly ninja attire. After Ittoki is escorted to safety, his mother reveals the truth: he is the 19th heir to a noble clan of ninjas known as the Iga, and the target of assassination by their rival clan, the Koga. In order to protect himself against this new threat, Ittoki must hone his skills at the only ninja academy remaining in Japan: the Kokuten Ninja Academy. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-8557:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Humans have been polluting the ocean for a long time, carelessly pouring their garbage and desecrating the waters that many creatures call home. The denizens of the sea have suffered at their poisoning hands. Finally, one certain squid has had enough and vows to punish the humans selfish actions. Possessing all the fearsome abilities of a squid such as powerful hair-tentacles, the ability to spit ink, and even use bioluminescence at will, Ika Musume takes it upon herself to rise from the depths of the ocean and exact revenge upon humanity! She surfaces at a certain Lemon Beach House, a restaurant managed by the sisters Eiko and Chizuru Aizawa. Thinking them to be an easy first step toward world domination, she immediately declares war against them, only to find out that she is, quite literally, a fish out of water! To make things worse, she destroys a part of a wall of the beach house in an attempt to flaunt her squiddy superiority and is consequently forced into becoming a waitress to pay the repair costs. Beached for the time being after tasting a thorough defeat at the hands of the Aizawa sisters, Ika Musume is forced to put her plans for world domination on hold. Despite these setbacks, Ika Musume soon finds herself right at home in her unexpected position as Lemon Beach Houses newest employee. Wacky and hilarious, Shinryaku! Ika Musume follows her brand new life on the surface as she makes precious memories and meet lots of new people. With her newfound acquaintances, Ika Musume is looking to take the world by storm, one squid ink spaghetti at a time! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-9888:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: '\"Mini Ika-Musume\" side-story episodes. ';}
#tags-13267:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Original anime DVD bundled with the 12th, 14th, and 17th volumes of the manga. ';}
#tags-10378:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After regaining her squid-like abilities, Ika Musume plans to resume her self-appointed mission to destroy all of humanity. However, her carefree job as a waitress in the Lemon beach house meant she cannot help but laze around during her spare time! On top of that, she is saddled with many problems, such as being pursued by a group of alien-obsessed individuals and catching the interest of a crazy girl. Picking up after the conclusion of the first season, Shinryaku!? Ika Musume follows the hilarious life of Ika Musume as she plots her next invasion of the surface world. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-1633:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A P.E. teacher, Nikusuke, happened to obtain a brief of \"Dark Rhythmic Gymnastics Project\". It is a competition where the players compete with others their lewdness. Following the project, Nikusuke looked for the players with Tomomi, a granddaughter of the board chairman. Their first game was Miku. Tomomi deceived innocent Miku, and she invited Miku out at night. ';}
#tags-1632:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Theres a secret competition called dark rhythmic gymnastics. The entrees complete their beauty and lewd by their technique more difficult than rhythmic gymnastics. Haneoka Fubuki is a little brother-in-low of Haneoka Miku whos been missing. While he is looking for his sister, he finds her at the house of Tomomi, Mikus classmate. Acceding to Tomomi, she is trapped in the dark side of dark rhythmic gymnastics. In order to help her out, he resolves his mind to become a coach of dark rhythmic gymnastics, and he gets close to Fujimiya Koyuki who was chosen by Tomomi not knowing his fate... (Source: AnimeNfo) ';}
#tags-25835:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'It all started in Kaminoyama High School, when five best friends-Aoi Miyamori, Ema Yasuhara, Midori Imai, Shizuka Sakaki, and Misa Toudou-discovered their collective love for all things anime and formed the animation club. After making their first amateur anime together and showcasing it at the culture festival, the group vows to pursue careers in the industry, aiming to one day work together and create their own mainstream show. Two and a half years later, Aoi and Ema have managed to land jobs at the illustrious Musashino Animation production company. The others, however, are finding it difficult to get their dream jobs. Shizuka is feeling the weight of not being recognized as a capable voice actor, Misa has a secure yet unsatisfying career designing 3D models for a car company, and Midori is a university student intent on pursuing her dream as a story writer. These five girls will learn that the path to success is one with many diversions, but dreams can still be achieved through perseverance and a touch of eccentric creativity. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-39299:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'No synopsis information has been added to this title. Help improve our database by adding a synopsis ';}
#tags-32587:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Kiyoshi Tachikawa runs a candy store located in a small town on the outskirts of Tokyo. He had quit his previous job to get away from the commotion of a major city and now enjoys his days surrounded by little girls. Kiyoshis shop is regularly visited by three girls in particular: Chie Sayama, Tenka Adachi, and Komako Semenovich. Due to his friendly and easygoing demeanor, the not-so-innocent girls quickly take to Kiyoshi, seeking his attention and help with their problems. They soon develop romantic feelings toward him and gladly leave their bodies in his care, passing time in his house by indulging in sexual pleasures. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-45425:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Since childhood, Hiyori Yamakawa has witnessed her fathers various eccentricities, but one activity she has always loved doing with him is fly fishing-a complicated yet rewarding method of catching fish. Even after his sudden death, Hiyori still visits the seaside in her spare time, savoring the joy that her fathers memento brings her. Three years later, Hiyoris mother decides to remarry and arranges a dinner with her fiancé, his daughter, and Hiyori to celebrate. Anxious and wanting to pass the time, Hiyori goes to her usual fishing spot when a rather energetic girl named Koharu Minagi suddenly appears before her. The two soon become acquainted, with Koharu taking an interest in fly fishing herself. However, their meeting is more than just a coincidence: Koharu turns out to be Hiyoris future stepsibling, which is only the beginning of treasured memories the both of them will reel in as they foster their sisterhood. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35540:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Hana Ichinose, a 17-year-old high school student who is not only introverted, but also insecure and timid, has just moved and will be attending a new school. To make her situation more difficult, Hana is a \"slow start,\" which means that she missed a year and worries about attending a class where everyone is younger than her. During her introduction, the teacher reveals it is Hanas birthday, which gives her the jumping-off point to meet three of her classmates: Tamate Momochi, a charismatic and extroverted girl; Kanmuri Sengoku, who is shy and small; and the popular and pretty Eiko Tokura. Not wanting to lose the chance to make new friends, Hanas interactions with these three mark the beginning of some beautiful relationships that will change her life. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48736:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'High school student Wakana Gojou spends his days perfecting the art of making hina dolls, hoping to eventually reach his grandfathers level of expertise. While his fellow teenagers busy themselves with pop culture, Gojou finds bliss in sewing clothes for his dolls. Nonetheless, he goes to great lengths to keep his unique hobby a secret, as he believes that he would be ridiculed were it revealed. Enter Marin Kitagawa, an extraordinarily pretty girl whose confidence and poise are in stark contrast to Gojous meekness. It would defy common sense for the friendless Gojou to mix with the likes of Kitagawa, who is always surrounded by her peers. However, the unimaginable happens when Kitagawa discovers Gojous prowess with a sewing machine and brightly confesses to him about her own hobby: cosplay. Because her sewing skills are pitiable, she decides to enlist his help. As Gojou and Kitagawa work together on one cosplay outfit after another, they cannot help but grow close-even though their lives are worlds apart. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-45653:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When middle school kendo champion Ayumu Tanaka begins his first year in high school, he does not take the expected route of joining the Kendo Club; he signs up for the unofficial Shogi Club instead. His sole motive is falling in love at first sight with Urushi Yaotome-the clubs president and only member-and will do anything to get closer to her. However, Ayumu decides not to confess to Urushi until he can beat her in a match of shogi fair and square. Naturally, this self-imposed hurdle is a formidable challenge for Ayumu to overcome, as Urushi is far more experienced at the game and sees through his every strategy. Nevertheless, this does not stop him from praising her looks, her skill, or even her smile, which, coupled with Ayumus expressionless face and direct approach, makes Urushi constantly blush beet red. Learning more about shogi and the charming player sitting across from him, Ayumu inches toward making his confession with each exciting round they play together-even if it is one pawn at a time! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50265:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Corrupt politicians, frenzied nationalists, and other warmongering forces constantly jeopardize the thin veneer of peace between neighboring countries Ostania and Westalis. In spite of their plots, renowned spy and master of disguise \"Twilight\" fulfills dangerous missions one after another in the hope that no child will have to experience the horrors of war. In the bustling Ostanian city of Berlint, Twilight dons the alias of \"Loid Forger,\" an esteemed psychiatrist. However, his true intention is to gather intelligence on prominent politician Donovan Desmond, who only appears rarely in public at his sons school: the prestigious Eden Academy. Enlisting the help of unmarried city hall clerk Yor Briar to act as his wife and adopting the curious six-year-old orphan Anya as his daughter, Loid enacts his master plan. He will enroll Anya in Eden Academy, where Loid hopes she will excel and give him the opportunity to meet Donovan without arousing suspicion. Unfortunately for Loid, even a man of his talents has trouble playing the figure of a loving father and husband. And just like Loid is hiding his true identity, Yor-who is an underground assassin known as \"Thorn Princess\"-and Anya-an esper who can read peoples minds-have no plans to disclose their own secrets either. Although this picture-perfect family is founded on deception, the Forgers gradually come to understand that the love they share for one another trumps all else. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50602:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'With Anya Forger successfully enrolled at the renowned Eden Academy, Operation Strix advances to its second phase. To investigate Ostanian politician Donovan Desmond, Anya must either befriend his son Damian or collect eight Stella Stars to become an Imperial Scholar. Fortunately, Anya has already acquired her first star. In celebration, her adoptive father, Loid, decides to fulfill her wish to adopt a dog. During their canine search, Loid receives new orders from his superiors, who have found that a band of Berlint University students is plotting to assassinate Westalis Minister Brantz using bombs worn by trained dogs. While Loid tries to stop their plans, Anya stumbles upon the terrorists base of operations. There, she befriends a kindhearted, clairvoyant dog who the family later names Bond. Although the Forgers continue to lead their individual lives in secrecy, the family-with a new fluffy addition-remains united through all of the unusual obstacles thrown their way. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-40685:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Koguma, a reserved second-year high school student, has nothing-no parents, hobbies, friends, or goals. On her way home one afternoon, she visits a vehicle shop in hopes of acquiring a motor scooter. With only enough money to make ends meet, she is disheartened by the price tags and prepares to turn back. However, as she is about to leave, the shops owner offers her a pre-owned Honda Super Cub for ten thousand yen. Believing that the motorcycle will help brighten her monotonous world, she accepts the deal. As Koguma journeys through her town on small adventures with her Super Cub, she begins to build irreplaceable friendships and eagerly advances toward her new life. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36943:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'As Hanabi Natsuno returns home after six years in Tokyo, memories flood into her. As she prepares to start high school, she moves to Tachibanakan, the local dormitory for female students. Upon her arrival, Hanabi stumbles upon a bare naked beauty, and instantly falls head over heels for her. She also reencounters Konomi Fujiwara, her childhood friend who she barely remembers. Hanabi is introduced to the other residence of the dorm and quickly becomes the center of attention. As the girls instantly take to the newcomer and begin shooting for her affection-subtly or obtrusively-Hanabi realizes that it is certainly going to be an interesting school year. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-28861:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A spin-off from Teekyuu which centers on the daily life of Nasuno Takamiya, the \"exceedingly airheaded\" school tennis club member in Teekyuu, and her friends. ';}
#tags-12445:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Seikyou Private Academy, built on the intrigue of traditional occult myths, bears a dark past-for 60 years, it has been haunted by a ghost known as Yuuko, a young woman who mysteriously died in the basement of the old school building. With no memory of her life or death, Yuuko discreetly finds and heads the Paranormal Investigations Club in search of answers. A chance meeting leads Yuuko to cling to diligent freshman Teiichi Niiya, who can see the quirky ghost, they quickly grow close, and he decides to help her. Along with Kirie Kanoe, Yuukos relative, and the oblivious second year Momoe Okonogi, they delve deep into the infamous Seven Mysteries of the storied school. Tasogare Otome x Amnesia tells a unique tale of students who work together to shed light on their schools paranormal happenings, all the while inching closer to the truth behind Yuukos death. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-14189:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Tired of Yuukos antics for causing more ghost stories to be spread amongst the students, Kirie challenges her to a series of games which if Yuuko loses, she must behave. (Source: Wikipedia) ';}
#tags-15125:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Teekyuu is all about the wacky antics of four schoolgirls-Kanae Shinjou gets bored easily and often breaks the laws of physics to get what she wants; Nasuno Takamiya is incredibly rich and knows how to make things go her way; Marimo Bandou would probably get arrested from her actions like eating panties or kidnapping children; and Yuri Oshimoto, their ordinary junior, rounds out the eccentric bunch that forms the sole members of their schools tennis club. Despite their interest in learning the sport, the older girls prefer messing around, while Yuri, being the only one who actually knows how to play and the most mature in spite of being younger, has to deal with her seniors out of control behavior. When these four girls come together, insanity ensues in this lightning-paced comedy about a tennis club that doesnt really play tennis. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-18121:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second season of Teekyu series. ';}
#tags-20473:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Third season of Teekyuu series. ';}
#tags-26395:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Fourth season of Teekyuu series. ';}
#tags-49891:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A nameless sword wakes up to discover he has been reincarnated from his former life as a human. With his power of telekinesis, he moves around this new world, acquiring several skills and abilities. When the sword comes upon a forest filled with monsters, he meets a young girl fleeing from a beast. Grabbing the sword, the girl easily defeats the monster. After introducing herself as Fran, she names the sword \"Shishou\" and officially becomes his wielder. The two set out to become adventurers, but unfortunately for Fran, she is a member of the Black Cat Tribe-a Beastkin group with a bad reputation. No member of this tribe has ever evolved into a mightier beast, but Fran plans to be the first and achieve her parents dream. As Shishou promises to remain her sword until she attains her goal, they form an unstoppable partnership of impressive strength. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-34177:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Since entering high school, Kyou Nukui has not attended a single class. Instead, he spends his days locked in his bedroom composing music and posting it on the internet accompanied by his only friends drawings, an artist with the pseudonym \"Kiriyume.\" One day, Kyou hesitantly uploads his newest composition, and first departure from his typical style, TR03. Additionally, he does not upload under his usual handle \"HibikiP,\" but simply under the name \"me,\" and without a drawing from his mysterious friend. Shortly after, Kyou receives a very polite email, not only praising his music but also somehow discerning that he is, in fact, the composer behind TR03. The e-mail also asks for a meetup in a nearby park, to which he cautiously decides to go. To his surprise, however, he finds three elementary school girls at the meeting place! Suddenly, Jun Gotou, Nozomi Momijidani, and Sora Kaneshiro ask for his help to hold a concert in their home, an old church now used as an orphanage. And though Kyou is reluctant at first, after seeing their musical abilities, he eventually decides to accept their proposal. Based on the light novel of the same name by the award-winning Sagu Aoyama, Tenshi no 3P! follows Kyou as these three angels change his life. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-43693:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Lucius Modestus, an ancient Roman architect, finds himself job-hunting due to having trouble coming up with new ideas. As his demeanor and personality become dismal, his friends try taking him to a bathhouse for him to relax. Unable to unwind in the bustling and crowded bath, Lucius dips his head in the water. Down there, he finds a secret tunnel that transports him to a modern-day Japanese bathhouse, providing him the inspiration he needed to make a new creation. Loaded with what seems to be knowledge way ahead of his time, Lucius does his best to try and recreate his findings, usually inferior in quality due to his circumstances. However, the sheer ingenuity may be just enough to gain the attention of the citizens and regain his reputation as an architect. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-3455:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Timid 16-year-old Rito Yuuki has yet to profess his love to Haruna Sairenji-a classmate and object of his infatuation since junior high. Sadly, his situation becomes even more challenging when one night, a mysterious, stark-naked girl crash-lands right on top of a bathing Rito. To add to the confusion, Rito discovers that the girl, Lala Satalin Deviluke, is the crown princess of an alien empire and has run away from her home. Despite her position as the heiress to the most dominant power in the entire galaxy, Lala is surprisingly more than willing to marry the decidedly average Rito in order to avoid an unwanted political marriage. To LOVE-Ru depicts Ritos daily struggles with the bizarre chaos that begins upon the arrival of Lala. With an evergrowing legion of swooning beauties that continuously foil his attempted confessions to Haruna, To LOVE-Ru is a romantic comedy full of slapstick humor, sexy girls, and outlandishly lewd moments that defy the laws of physics. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-13663:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'As close encounters of the twisted kind between the residents of the planet Develuke (represented primarily by the female members of the royal family) and the inhabitants of Earth (represented mainly by one very exhausted Rito Yuki) continue to escalate, the situation spirals even further out of control. When junior princesses Nana and Momo transferred into Earth School where big sister LaLa can (theoretically) keep an eye on them, things SHOULD be smooth sailing. But when Momo decides shed like to \"supplement\" Ritos relationship with LaLa with a little \"sisterly love,\" you know LaLas not going to waste any time splitting harems. Unfortunately, its just about that point that Yami, the Golden Darkness, enters the scene with all the subtleness of a supernova, along with an army of possessed high school students! All of which is certain to make Ritos life suck more than a black hole at the family picnic. Unless, of course, a certain semi-demonic princess can apply a little of her Develukean Whoop Ass to exactly that portion of certain other heavenly bodies! (Source: Sentai Filmworks) ';}
#tags-28979:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The dispassionate, transforming assassin Golden Darkness returns to peer deeper into the mysteries surrounding her new life, while a sinister Nemesis manipulates her younger sister Mea from the shadows. Along with their newly discovered mother, Tearju, this previously estranged family quickly becomes the center of everyones attention. On the other hand, Princess Momos Harem Plan stands on shaky ground amidst Ritos inability to confess to his longtime crush Haruna, who has grown feelings of her own. But things arent as peaceful as they seem; an evil force looms amidst the innocuous commotion, threatening to eclipse the love, happiness, and friendship of Rito and his harem. Only the light of love can hope to banish the shadow. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-31711:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Extra episodes of To LOVE-Ru Darkness 2nd bundled with the seventh Blu-ray and DVD volume. ';}
#tags-37579:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Rumors tell about an ageless girl who only comes out at night, living in a mansion in the middle of the forest. Some say that she is a living doll with a soul. Upon hearing these rumors, Akari Amano seeks out this girl, only to find herself lost as she treks through the woods amidst the darkness. A vampire named Sophie Twilight saves her, turning out to be the rumored girl. However, unlike the vampires told in myths, Sophie does not attack humans and instead orders her blood online. Akari instantly becomes charmed with her doll-like appearance and proceeds to abruptly move in with her, thus starting their life together. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-41389:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Nasa Yuzaki is determined to leave his name in the history books. Ranking first in the national mock exam and aiming for a distinguished high school, he is certain that he has his whole life mapped out. However, fate is a fickle mistress. On his way home one snowy evening, Nasas eyes fall upon a peerless beauty across the street. Bewitched, Nasa tries to approach her-only to get blindsided by an oncoming truck. Thankfully, his life is spared due to the girls swift action. Bleeding by the side of an ambulance, he watches as the girl walks away under the moonlight-reminiscent of Princess Kaguya leaving for the moon. Refusing to let this chance meeting end, he forces his crippled body to chase after her and asks her out. Surprised by his foolhardiness and pure resolve, the girl accepts his confession under a single condition: they can only be together if he marries her! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-51533:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Special episode of Tonikaku Kawaii released Fall 2022. ';}
#tags-44931:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When Tsukasa Yuzaki receives a brand new smartphone as a surprise gift from her husband Nasa, she is delighted, quickly adding in contacts and mastering the arts of LINE and sticker-sending. However, her joy is short-lived: a former coworker calls in Nasa for a difficult job, and Tsukasa is dismayed to learn that her beloved might have to work through the night. Faced with her first night alone since her marriage to Nasa, will Tsukasa and her new phone be able to overcome the distance that separates the young couple and defeat the loneliness that threatens to pull her under? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-4224:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Ryuuji Takasu is a gentle high school student with a love for housework; but in contrast to his kind nature, he has an intimidating face that often gets him labeled as a delinquent. On the other hand is Taiga Aisaka, a small, doll-like student, who is anything but a cute and fragile girl. Equipped with a wooden katana and feisty personality, Taiga is known throughout the school as the \"Palmtop Tiger.\" One day, an embarrassing mistake causes the two students to cross paths. Ryuuji discovers that Taiga actually has a sweet side: she has a crush on the popular vice president, Yuusaku Kitamura, who happens to be his best friend. But things only get crazier when Ryuuji reveals that he has a crush on Minori Kushieda-Taigas best friend! Toradora! is a romantic comedy that follows this odd duo as they embark on a quest to help each other with their respective crushes, forming an unlikely alliance in the process. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-25157:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'One day, the bright red sun stopped shining, causing the \"Breakdown Phenomenon\"-the destruction of Arata Kasugas town and the disappearance of the people inhabiting it. All, however, is not yet lost; by utilizing the magical grimoire given to him by his childhood friend and cousin Hijiri Kasuga, Aratas world gets artificially reconstructed. In order to investigate the phenomenon, Lilith Asami appears before Arata, whose artificial world suddenly disintegrates. He is given two choices: hand over the book, or die. However, Arata chooses the third option-enrolling in the top-secret magic school Royal Biblia Academy, where six other magical users await him. Together with Lilith, these six form the Trinity Seven, the elite of the school who each bolster their own power and skill. With the ambition to save Hijiri and the help of his newfound friends, Arata stops at nothing to prevent the destruction of his beloved hometown and to bring his best friend back. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-34019:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'In Japanese folklore, a \"tsukumogami\" is an object that has gained a soul, becoming alive and self-aware. There are two types of tsukumogami: the mature \"tsugumomo,\" who have developed through long years of harmony with their owners, and the aberrant \"amasogi,\" premature spirits that are only born to grant the destructive wishes of certain people. Kazuya Kagami has never gone without his mothers obi after her death. Be it at home or school, he keeps it safe with him at all times. One day, he nearly loses his life when a wig amasogi attacks him. When all seems to be over, his treasured obi defends him, transforming into a beautiful girl. She introduces herself as Kiriha, a tsugumomo owned by Kazuyas mother. With Kirihas arrival, Kazuya enters a reality he has never seen before, a world with gods and tsukumogami. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49533:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The beginning of the Meiji era spelled the end of the tanukis tricks. These raccoon dogs, who are able to transform into human beings, used to love fooling humans until advanced technology rendered their endeavors futile. However, Mameda, a young tanuki girl, has not given up on this tradition, and-resolved to follow in her fathers footsteps-travels to Osaka in hopes of duping people. As others in her village predicted, Mameda fails to deceive a single person, and she is even hunted down by an angry crowd. After finding refuge in a theater, she stumbles upon a rakugo performance given by a master of the art, Bunko Daikokutei. Fascinated by the vivid images created by the rakugokas acting, Mameda becomes enamored with this style of storytelling and decides to become Bunkos apprentice! Despite her initial reluctance to take a disciple, Bunko begins to teach Mameda rakugo after witnessing the young tanukis perseverance. Between undertaking a taiko apprenticeship, handling her work at the theater, and memorizing plays, Mameda needs to give her all if she ever plans to master the only art that still has a chance to fool people. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-27927:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'An original anime advertising Urawa City in Saitama, Japan. ';}
#tags-32454:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The girls of the Usakame High tennis club, Tanaka Kinako, Suzuki Ayako, Sato Kurumi, and Nishiarai-Taishi Nishi, pursue their various dreams... This high school comedy kind of thing starts now. Usakame, the official rival of the high intensity comedy Teekyuu, depicts the mostly ordinary but slightly strange daily lives of four girls who devote themselves to practice. All members of Earth Star Dream, an Earth Star Entertainment idol unit of nationally famous voice actors, appear in the show! Sit back, relax, and enjoy Teekyuus rival Usakame. (Source: Crunchyroll) ';}
#tags-34615:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Unaired episode included with the Blu-ray. ';}
#tags-41226:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'At the start of her freshman year in college, Hana Uzaki reunites with Shinichi Sakurai, an upperclassman who was in the same club as her during her high school days. However, much to her surprise, the once active senior has ended up becoming a \"lonesome\" student, preferring to spend his free time in quiet peace. Uzaki does whatever she can to keep Sakurai from being \"alone,\" from convincing him to go to the movies to going to his part-time workplace. While Sakurai finds her irritating and tiresome, he still goes along with Uzakis hijinks and shenanigans, even if he knows that her perky personality will only lead the two of them into various comical situations. Even so, as the days pass by, their relationship only gets better, to the point where people around them misinterpret them to be a couple. At any rate, whenever Uzaki wants to hang out with her upperclassman, fun and adorable wackiness is sure to follow! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-42962:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'During the summer holidays, energetic Hana Uzaki spent most of her time accompanying her lonesome upperclassman, Shinichi Sakurai. Now that school has resumed, Uzakis teasing continues to ramp up, much to Sakurais constant annoyance. Nevertheless, no amount of ridicule can damage the pairs relationship-which only seems to be getting better as their college days fly by! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-31439:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The adorable girls of Ousui Academys student council love to spend time with their crush, Kouki Narumi. But what happens when he isnt around? For the student council, consisting of otaku president Kaoruko Rokuonji; headstrong Ashe Rufflette Sakuragi; quiet computer programmer Toa Narumi; and Toas best friend, the impish Mihiro Miyase, it means they will have to keep themselves entertained. Wagamama High Spec offers a glimpse into the girls lives as they get into amusing-and sometimes risqué-hijinks at their school and around town. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-30355:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Wakaba Kohashi, a sheltered rich girl, dreams of becoming a fashionable and trendy gyaru because she admires their outgoing and carefree nature. With this goal in mind, Wakaba begins the school year hoping to make her high school debut as a gyaru. On the first day of class, she meets the pure Moeko Tokita, the serious Nao Mashiba, and the eccentric Mao Kurokawa, and the four of them quickly become friends as they learn about and imitate each others lifestyles. Wakaba*Girl follows the adventures of these four friends while they experience events like school festivals, waterpark trips, and gym class tests. Along the way, Wakaba discovers what it is like to live as a regular student while Nao, Moeka, and Mao catch a glimpse into the life of a rich family. With never a dull moment in their lives, the four girls make sure to live each day to the fullest. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-37682:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After reluctantly being dragged to a festival at her parents rural hometown, Oriko \"Okko\" Seki must face her sudden harsh reality: the death of both of her parents in a car accident shortly after they arrive. Now, Okko must live at her grandmothers traditional hot springs inn, which she is surprised to find is occupied by the ghost of a barefoot child. He encourages Okko to follow in her grandmothers footsteps and prepare to inherit the inn. Initially, Okko struggles to keep up with the responsibilities of the inn and the accommodation of guests. However, her parents told her that an inn is welcoming for everyone, and she strives to honor their memory. After discovering a few other spirits around the village, Okko learns that even though her parents are gone, she does not have to be lonely. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32899:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Kae Serinuma is a very kind second-year high school student and a devoted otaku. A little known fact about her, though, is that shes obsessed with BL, or Boys Love. Serinuma cant help but to fantasize about her male classmates falling for each other and enjoys imagining them together. A more known fact about Serinuma, however, is that shes noticeably overweight. While watching her favorite show one day, Serinuma witnesses the death of her most beloved character. Utterly depressed, she cant muster up the energy to eat her meals, let alone attend school. After an entire week, she finally recovers. But now theres something unusual about her-during the time she refused to leave her room, she ended up losing a large amount of weight and has somehow become strikingly beautiful! Now catching the eye of everyone who sees her, she finds herself at the center of attention of four boys she has always known at her school. Though they all wish to spend time with her, Serinuma would much rather they spend time falling in love with one another. How will Serinuma deal with the four boys pursuing her BL-obsessed self? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-37993:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'College student Miyako Hoshino is quite shy around other people. She mostly spends her time in her room making cosplay outfits. When her fifth-grade sister Hinata brings her classmate Hana Shirosaki home, Miyako instantly becomes captivated with Hanas cuteness. Miyako tries to do various things, ranging from making Hana wear cosplay dresses to giving her sweets. This gives Hana a bad impression of her at first, but Miyako will do anything to grow closer to the angel who has descended before her. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38999:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Hinata Hoshino, Hana Shirosaki, and Noa Himesaka are off to the countryside for a camping trip. At Hinatas behest, her elder sister, Miyako, reluctantly tags along. Seeing how gloomy Miyako is, the trio do their best to get her to enjoy herself too. Besides the camping trip, Watashi ni Tenshi ga Maiorita! Special contains three more short stories of the girls. Although their lives seem normal, one thing is certain: there is definitely no shortage of cuteness here! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-37786:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Yuu Koito has always been entranced with romantic shoujo manga and the lyrics of love songs. She patiently waits for the wings of love to sprout and send her heart aflutter on the day that she finally receives a confession. Yet, when her classmate from junior high declares his love for her during their graduation, she feels unexpectedly hollow. The realization hits her: she understands romance as a concept, but she is incapable of experiencing the feeling first-hand. Now, having enrolled in high school, Yuu, disconcerted and dispirited, is still ruminating over how to respond to her suitor. There, she happens upon the seemingly flawless student council president, Touko Nanami, maturely rejecting a confession of her own. Stirred by Toukos elegant manner, Yuu approaches her for advice, only to be bewildered when the president confesses to her! Yuu quickly finds herself in the palm of Toukos hand, and unknowingly sets herself on a path to find the emotion which has long eluded her. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-14813:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Hachiman Hikigaya is an apathetic high school student with narcissistic and semi-nihilistic tendencies. He firmly believes that joyful youth is nothing but a farce, and everyone who says otherwise is just lying to themselves. In a novel punishment for writing an essay mocking modern social relationships, Hachimans teacher forces him to join the Volunteer Service Club, a club that aims to extend a helping hand to any student who seeks their support in achieving their goals. With the only other club member being the beautiful ice queen Yukino Yukinoshita, Hachiman finds himself on the front line of other peoples problems-a place he never dreamed he would be. As Hachiman and Yukino use their wits to solve many students problems, will Hachimans rotten view of society prove to be a hindrance or a tool he can use to his advantage? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-23847:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'With the Volunteer Service Club now firmly established, it is receiving more requests from students in search of solutions to their various issues. However, the club members often struggle to see eye to eye when it comes to their problem-solving ideals. The suggestions that Hachiman Hikigaya recommends frequently clash with those of Yukino Yukinoshita, fracturing the relationships within the club. Despite their differences, with the trio constantly trying to find common ground, they may soon reach a point where they discover something genuine. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-42568:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The city of Tajimi is well-renowned for its Mino ware ceramics and being the hometown of Himeno Toyokawas mother. Considered a legend in the world of pottery, Himenos mother suddenly passed away when Himeno was four. However, her legacy lives on in the dozens of unique mugs that adorn the Toyokawas new restaurant in Tajimi. Having moved back to the city recently following the bankruptcy of her fathers company in Tokyo, Himeno brings some of her mothers mugs to her first day of high school in an attempt to make friends. One person who immediately takes an interest is Mika Kukuri, an eccentric girl in Himenos class who soon introduces her to Tooko Aoki, the president of the Pottery Club. After learning more about her mothers contributions to the club and the art form, Himeno asks her father for permission to join, which he gladly gives. Alongside Mika and her childhood friend Naoko Naruse, Himeno enters the Pottery Club to continue her mothers beloved work and discover her own passion for the craft. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49263:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The conclusion of the Mino ware contest has spurred Himeno Toyokawa to create a piece even more remarkable than the last. Anxious to embrace the future yet emboldened by her mothers legacy, Himeno strives to find the right inspiration-a task that proves to be just as ambitious as her goal. When Himenos father suggests that her next creation should be the centerpiece at the cafe, expectations for the final product only grow with each passing day. Through new encounters and experiences, Himeno and her friends reconnect with the foundation of their passion in their search for what lies at the core of pottery. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-14355:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'As a child, Aoi Yukimura adored mountains and was passionate about climbing. However, a playground accident has since left her afraid of heights, turning her toward indoor hobbies. Unfortunately, now a shy and timid first-year high school student, Aoi has become so absorbed in these pastimes that she can barely socialize with others, leaving her practically friendless. It is only when she runs into the lively Hinata Kuraue, an old friend from her climbing days, that things start to change. Impulsive and high-spirited, Hinata insists on having Aoi join her in all sorts of climbing activities. Though reluctant at first, Aoi quickly finds that her time with Hinata brings back fond memories of their childhood and soon decides to start climbing again. As the return to her past hobby starts to bring her out of her shell, Aoi finds herself gaining close friends, taking on new challenges, and continuing to find her own encouragement to climb. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-21435:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Continuing their treks through the high peaks of Japan, the mountaineering girls are back for more! First-year high school student Aoi Yukimura, a shy girl with a fear of heights, and her wildly energetic friend Hinata Kuraue set out once again to conquer the perils of backyard camping trips, summer homework, and even a climb on the mountain of their dreams. Joined by middle school student Kokona Aoba and their knowledgeable upperclassman Kaede Saitou, the squad members are ready to take on whatever slopes and challenges they might face, no matter how steep. Through their shared hobby of mountain climbing, they bond closer than ever and even make new friends on trails all over the country. Whether it is just a local hill or the tallest mountain around, nothing is too much for Aoi and the crew to handle. They will climb, stumble, and rise to even greater heights together! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35672:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'With the conclusion of an unforgettable summer break, Aoi Yukimura remains invigorated to continue pursuing her new hobby in mountaineering. Having braved her fear of heights and fulfilled her childhood promise with Hinata Kuraue, any opportunity to go climbing intrigues the first-year high school student-including a second chance to reach the summit of Mt. Fuji. Although the formidable yet exciting trip is planned for next summer, Aoi is already preparing as much as she can to guarantee her success this time around. However, as budding expectations blossom with the shift of the seasons, ascending the unexplored peaks of colorful endeavors begins to strain the bond between the two longtime friends and the perspectives they share of the future. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-17341:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Aoi Yukimura and her friends decide to take on a new challenge: indoor rock climbing! However, the sight of the wall flusters Aoi, who frets over its height and complexity. Fortunately, Kaede Saitou is there to explain the rules of indoor climbing, inspiring the girls to give it a try themselves. Though the wall may seem intimidating and insurmountable, Aoi finds that with a little help from her friends, she may be able to overcome this challenge. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35673:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'On the final day of summer vacation, Kokona Aoba is ready to spend some long-awaited time with her mother, but these plans are unfortunately canceled due to work. Opting to go outside instead, she takes a stroll down a familiar path-one where fond memories appear at every corner. Later, in the middle of autumn, Hinata Kuraue and Aoi Yukimura are looking through a scrapbook of their childhood. Snooping around in Aois room, Hinata finds that she has kept a strange acorn as a keepsake, but doesnt remember the reason why. As its discovery dwells on her, a wave of old memories comes forth, causing her to reminisce about a forgotten event from her childhood. From time spent with loved ones to promises from the past, Yama no Susume: Omoide Present follows the three girls as they cherish old memories while crafting entirely new ones to remember. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-28677:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When Ryuu Yamada entered high school, he wanted to turn over a new leaf and lead a productive school life. That is why he chose to attend Suzaku High School, where no one would know of his violent delinquent reputation. However, much to Ryuus dismay, he is soon bored; now a second year, Ryuu has reverted to his old ways-lazy with abysmal grades and always getting into fights. One day, back from yet another office visit, Ryuu encounters Urara Shiraishi, a beautiful honors student. A misstep causes them both to tumble down the stairs, ending in an accidental kiss! The pair discover they can switch bodies with a kiss: an ability which will prove to be both convenient and troublesome. Learning of their new power, Toranosuke Miyamura, a student council officer and the single member of the Supernatural Studies Club, recruits them for the club. Soon joined by Miyabi Itou, an eccentric interested in all things supernatural, the group unearths the legend of the Seven Witches of Suzaku High, seven female students who have obtained different powers activated by a kiss. The Supernatural Studies Club embarks on its first quest: to find the identities of all the witches. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-37940:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After growing up in Tokyo, high school student Jin Kaito moves to Nagoya where he meets Yatogame Monaka, a fellow student who puts her Nagoya dialect on full display. With her cat-like appearance and unvarnished Nagoya dialect, Yatogame wont open up to him at all. This popular local comedy is increasing the status of Nagoya through observation of the adorable Yatogame-chan! (Source: Crunchyroll) ';}
#tags-39960:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second season of Yatogame-chan Kansatsu Nikki. ';}
#tags-42959:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Third season of Yatogame-chan Kansatsu Nikki. ';}
#tags-50438:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Fourth season of Yatogame-chan Kansatsu Nikki. ';}
#tags-34792:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'In the seaside village of Hinashi Town, Kai Ashimotos grandfather is one of the locals who reinforces the legend that mermaids lurk near Merfolk Island and consume humans. Due to allegedly attracting merfolk and subsequently causing the death of the elders mother, music is seldom discussed in the Ashimoto household. Even so, Kai finds solace in making looped beats on his laptop and uploading them to the internet. Despite his reserved and glum demeanor, Kai is approached by Kunio and Yuuho Ebina, two cheerful classmates that happened upon one of his videos. The pair ask him to join their rock band but are met with apathy. Nevertheless, Kai agrees to accompany them in a practice session on Merfolk Island, where he soon witnesses something that he cannot explain. Later that night, Kai is composing music in his room when he attracts a familiar entity-a mermaid. As she twirls and grins to the sound of his stereo, Kai discovers a number of aspects about the being who introduces herself as Lu: she possesses incredible water manipulation powers; she buds a pair of functioning legs with the sound of music; but most notably, she is a truly benevolent creature who simply wants people to like her. Fostering a dynamic friendship, Kai and Lu gradually come to express their genuine selves, testing the long-standing boundaries that have deafened the resounding harmony among the people of Hinashi Town. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50346:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Kou Yamori is an average middle school student who struggles with grasping the complex concept of love. Because he sees little sense in surrendering to the norm, he soon stops going to school. Plagued with insomnia due to his idleness, Kou begins roaming the lonesome streets at night. One night, Kou encounters a bizarre girl named Nazuna Nanakusa who believes that people stay awake during the night because they are dissatisfied with how they spent their day and cannot rest until they release their inhibitions. Nazuna offers to help Kou with his sleep issues and invites him over to her place, where she convinces him to share a futon with her. Feeling uncomfortable, Kou only pretends to doze off-which is when Nazuna suddenly bites his neck, revealing herself to be a vampire! While Kou thinks the bite will turn him into a vampire, the specifics of transforming are not that simple. In order to change, he must be bitten by someone he truly loves. Ready to let go of his dreary mortal life, Kou decides on a new goal: he will fall in love with Nazuna and become a vampire himself. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-15535:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The story revolves around Yukami Makoto, a high school boy whose hobby is visiting hot springs. His 100th hot spring visit is at Miyama-kan, an inn run by four poster girls: Tokura, Akino, Tsutsuji and Mitomo. There, Makoto spies Yuri, a goddess of the hot springs, and unexpectedly usurps her powers. Makoto ends up working at the inn. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-34798:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'While the perfect getaway for most girls her age might be a fancy vacation with their loved ones, Rin Shimas ideal way of spending her days off is camping alone at the base of Mount Fuji. From pitching her tent to gathering firewood, she has always done everything by herself, and has no plans of leaving her little solitary world. However, what starts off as one of Rins usual camping sessions somehow ends up as a surprise get-together for two when the lost Nadeshiko Kagamihara is forced to take refuge at her campsite. Originally intending to see the picturesque view of Mount Fuji for herself, Nadeshikos plans are disrupted when she ends up falling asleep partway to her destination. Alone and with no other choice, she seeks help from the only other person nearby. Despite their hasty introductions, the two girls nevertheless enjoy the chilly night together, eating ramen and conversing while the campfire keeps them warm. And even after Nadeshikos sister finally picks her up later that night, both girls silently ponder the possibility of another camping trip together. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-37341:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When Chiaki Oogaki and Aoi Inuyama start the Outdoor Activities Club at their school, it is only the two of them and an array of ambitious plans. Things do not change much even after a new member-Nadeshiko Kagamihara- joins. And yet, the cheerful, cozy atmosphere seems to bring many curious visitors to their small headquarters. As the three girls set out on a camping trip to Australia alongside their friends Rin Shima and Ena Saitou, an unexpected incident turns the relaxing event into quite an adventure. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-52046:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Among all the beasts that roam the world, there are unique types of \"ultimate species\" that harbor immense strength and magical prowess considered to be at the top of the power scale. As such, many humans covet their abilities, leading some of these species to the brink of extinction. As a beast tamer, Rein Shroud can employ the assistance of various animals for many tasks, such as reconnaissance and logistics. By virtue of his ability, he joins a party led by the vile and manipulative hero Arios Orlando, only to be banished after six months due to his uselessness as a non-combative class. However, unbeknownst to the team that cast him away, Rein is an exception among beast tamers. His potential becomes apparent when he meets Kanade-a cat spirit who is also one of the ultimate species-and is able to form a contract with her. With Kanade by his side, Rein sets out on his journey as an adventurer, steadily rising up the ranks and meeting more ultimate species along the way. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-6747:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'On live television, Mina Tepes, the ruler of all vampires, reveals the existence of her species to the world and states her plan to build a sanctuary in Japan for vampires, called the Vampire Bund. Using her familys wealth to pay off the nations debt, they have agreed to let her build this safe-haven for her fellow creatures of the night. But not everyone is so easily swayed by Minas influence, as her announcement brings about conflict with humans who believe that the queens quest for peace is a fa&ccedil;ade. Akira Kaburagi does not believe in vampires and gets uneasy whenever they are brought up, although he has yet to realize why. Apart from suffering a head injury a year ago, he lives on blissfully until he meets Mina. She triggers within him memories of a life he had long forgotten, and he soon begins protecting her without understanding why. But Akiras secret is far stranger than he could have ever thought possible-he discovers that he is a werewolf, sworn from birth to protect the vampire queen, even if it costs him his life. Now, as these two dance a rondo of death in the Vampire Bund, Mina and Akira find out just how deep their bond goes. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49828:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Suletta Mercury leaves her planet and enters the Asticassia School of Technology at the behest of her mother. There, right and wrong are determined through duels between students, and the top-ranking duelist will receive Miorine Rembran as their fiancée-this prize being decided by Miorines father. When Guel Jeturk, the best pilot in school and Miorines current fiancé, demands that his betrothed move in with him, Suletta disapproves, so Guel challenges her. Although she emerges as champion, Suletta is subsequently detained on suspicion of piloting a forbidden type of mobile suit-a GUND-ARM, or \"Gundam\"-which results in her victory being voided. Miorine refuses to accept any more injustices and proposes another duel with even higher stakes. Now, Suletta must triumph a second time, otherwise she will be expelled and the Gundam Aerial that means so much to her will be destroyed. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-22535:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'All of a sudden, they arrived: parasitic aliens that descended upon Earth and quickly infiltrated humanity by burrowing into the brains of vulnerable targets. These insatiable beings acquire full control of their host and are able to morph into a variety of forms in order to feed on unsuspecting prey. Sixteen-year-old high school student Shinichi Izumi falls victim to one of these parasites, but it fails to take over his brain, ending up in his right hand instead. Unable to relocate, the parasite, now named Migi, has no choice but to rely on Shinichi in order to stay alive. Thus, the pair is forced into an uneasy coexistence and must defend themselves from hostile parasites that hope to eradicate this new threat to their species. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38924:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The siblings Kashou and Shigure Minazuki enjoy the company of six catgirls. Chocola and Vanilla assist Kashou in his job as a baker at the patisserie La Soleil, while the others-Coconut, Azuki, Cinnamon, and Maple-accompany Shigure in her daily life back at their home. One afternoon, when Chocola goes out for an errand, she notices a green-haired kitten alone by herself at a park and decides to bring her back to the patisserie. Soon after, the Minazuki household adopts her and gives her a name: Cacao. With a new member in their family, the members of the Minazuki household continue their everyday lives-bound to become livelier than ever. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-31953:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Since childhood, Aoba Suzukaze has loved the Fairies Story game series, particularly the character designs. So when she graduates from high school, it is no surprise that she applies to work at Eagle Jump, the company responsible for making her favorite video game. On her first day, she is excited to learn that she will be working on a new installment to the series: Fairies Story 3-and even more so under Kou Yagami, the lead character designer. In their department are people who share the same passion for games. There is Yun Iijima, whose specialty is designing monsters; the shy Hifumi Takimoto, who prefers to communicate through instant messaging; Hajime Shinoda, an animation team member with an impressive figurine collection; Rin Tooyama, the orderly art director; Shizuku Hazuki, the game director who brings her cat to work; and Umiko Ahagon, the short-tempered head programmer. New Game! follows Aoba and the others on their adventure through the ups and downs of game making, from making the perfect character design to fixing all the errors that will inevitably accumulate in the process. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-2966:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Holo is a powerful wolf deity who is revered in the small town of Pasloe for blessing the annual harvest. Yet as years go by and the villagers become more self-sufficient, Holo has been reduced to a mere folktale. When a traveling merchant named Kraft Lawrence stops at the settlement, Holo offers to become his business partner if he takes her to her northern home of Yoitsu. The savvy trader recognizes Holos unusual ability to evaluate a persons character and accepts her proposition. Now in the possession of both sharp bargaining skills and a charismatic negotiator, Lawrence inches closer to his goal of opening his own shop. However, as Lawrence travels the countryside with Holo in search of economic opportunities, he begins to realize that his aspirations are slowly morphing into something unexpected. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50461:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Blackmailed into playing a dating simulator set in a matriarchy, an ordinary man must put up with the unbearable and convoluted world until he clears the game. After countless days of grinding, he finally manages to beat it, but his hardcore gaming comes at a cost: extreme sleep deprivation and hunger. While heading out to the convenience store to solve one of these problems, the man tumbles down the stairs and falls unconscious, only to wake up to the worst possible realization-he has been reincarnated into the game as the mob character Leon Fou Bartfort. Now trapped in a world he despises, Leon must use his knowledge of the game to navigate through the plot safely and sustain himself in a society where the odds are heavily stacked against him. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-31240:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When Subaru Natsuki leaves the convenience store, the last thing he expects is to be wrenched from his everyday life and dropped into a fantasy world. Things are not looking good for the bewildered teenager; however, not long after his arrival, he is attacked by some thugs. Armed with only a bag of groceries and a now useless cell phone, he is quickly beaten to a pulp. Fortunately, a mysterious beauty named Satella, in hot pursuit after the one who stole her insignia, happens upon Subaru and saves him. In order to thank the honest and kindhearted girl, Subaru offers to help in her search, and later that night, he even finds the whereabouts of that which she seeks. But unbeknownst to them, a much darker force stalks the pair from the shadows, and just minutes after locating the insignia, Subaru and Satella are brutally murdered. However, Subaru immediately reawakens to a familiar scene-confronted by the same group of thugs, meeting Satella all over again-the enigma deepens as history inexplicably repeats itself. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49944:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'No synopsis information has been added to this title. Help improve our database by adding a synopsis ';}
#tags-33433:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After Germania invaded a neighboring country in 1939, Europe spiraled into a devastating war. During the war, Germania set its sights on the weak alpine country of Elystadt. Boasting a far superior military and having achieved profuse success earlier in the war, it was expected that Germania would conquer Elystadt with ease. Matters are only made worse for the small country when Germanian soldiers capture their princess, Ortfiné \"Finé\" Fredericka von Eylstadt, as she is heading to a crucial meeting with Britannia. Yet, when a concurrent Germanian transport mission goes awry, Izetta, the last witch alive, escapes. When she recognizes Princess Finé from her childhood, Izetta rescues her from the Germanian soldiers by making use of her magical abilities. Now reunited with the princess, Izetta pledges to protect Elystadt from Germania, and with the last surviving witch on their arsenal, Elystadt hopes to turn the tides against the imperialist war giant. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36000:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'In the future in Onomichi, Hiroshima fish disappear from the sea around the world and only whales live in the ocean. The Ministry of Fishery decides to set up giant experimental Universe Fish Tanks in space. The Onomichi Universe Fishery Union is established and begins to train space fishermen. Female fishermen are in demand due to the strengthening of an equal employment law for men and women. Six new female space fishermen are selected, and the story centers on supporting their growth. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-16417:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Inside the Usagiyama Shopping District lies an eccentric but close-knit community of business owners. Tamako Kitashirakawa, a clumsy though adorable teenage girl, belongs to a family of mochi bakers who own a quaint shop called Tama-ya. One day, Tamako stumbles upon a talking bird that presents himself as royalty from a distant land. Dera Mochimazzi, as he calls himself, states that hes seeking a bride for his countrys prince. Intent on his mission, Dera follows Tamako home and develops an addiction to mochi, becoming painfully overweight and subsequently unable to fly back to his homeland; thus, he takes up residence with Tamakos family and becomes the communitys beloved mascot. Meanwhile, Tamakos friend, Mochizou Ooji, continues to hide his true feelings for her. Their fathers are fierce mochi rivals, but will it be enough to drive a wedge between Tamako and Mochizou? And just what will happen to Deras task of finding his princes destined bride? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-22319:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A sinister threat is invading Tokyo: flesh-eating \"ghouls\" who appear identical to humans and blend into their population. Reserved college student Ken Kaneki buries his nose in books and avoids the news of the growing crisis. However, the appearance of an attractive woman named Rize Kamishiro shatters his solitude when she forwardly asks him on a date. While walking Rize home, Kaneki discovers she isnt as kind as she first appeared, and she has led him on with sinister intent. After a tragic struggle, he later awakens in a hospital to learn his life was saved by transplanting the now deceased Rizes organs into his own body. Kanekis body begins to change in horrifying ways, and he transforms into a human-ghoul hybrid. As he embarks on his new dreadful journey, Kaneki clings to his humanity in the evolving bloody conflict between societys new monsters and the government agents who hunt them. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-35249:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Famous racehorses that have left behind worthy legacies, unique as they can be, are reincarnated as horse girls in a parallel world. In this life, they start their journey anew as they continue to race and perhaps relive the success they once lived through. Aspiring to become the best racehorse in Japan, a horse girl named Special Week moves to Tokyo to enroll in the Tracen Academy-an institution that nurtures horse girls like her to become better racers. There, Special Week witnesses the sophisticated running style of Silence Suzuka and is inspired to become a racer like her. Shortly after, Special Week finds herself recruited into Silence Suzukas team, Spica. From there, she begins her path to the top-one lap at a time. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50710:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When aliens known as the Oni threaten to invade the Earth, they promise to leave under one condition-a randomly-chosen human must win a one-on-one game of tag against Lum, the beautiful daughter of the Oni leader. The \"lucky\" person selected happens to be the lustful and unlucky high schooler Ataru Moroboshi. Given 10 days to attempt to grab Lums horns, Ataru realizes how impossible the challenge is as he is faced with Lums extraterrestrial powers. Motivated by a promise of marriage from his childhood friend Shinobu Miyake, Ataru manages to catch Lum off guard. He mistakenly grabs hold of her bikini top first, but he eventually achieves his true goal. Although the game is over, Lum misunderstands that she is the one whom Ataru wants to marry, and she decides to move in with him. The poor student constantly tries to shake off the clingy Lum while doing his best to reconcile with his desired fiancée. After Atarus heroic feat results in such a disastrous outcome, it is questionable whether luck will ever be on his side. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49780:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The story depicts the lazy, unhealthy daily life of Kawashiri, who loves alcohol and anything greasy, salty, or sweet. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-37405:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Tanaka Daisuke is an ordinary college student living alone since last year. He occupies a run-down and cramped apartment-just like many other young adults. However, there is one peculiar bonus about living in his accommodation. Whenever he settles his rent, he receives sexual services from the landlady, Asou Miyuri. Despite her childish looks, she is a grown woman who is more than eager to experience the charms of Tanakas masculine body. At first shy and overwhelmed by her relaxed and outgoing approach, Daisuke soon starts looking forward to these monthly meetings, as Asou treats him to all kinds of naughty positions and kinky outfits no young man could ever resist. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-649:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After his mother passes away, Taro Hanaukyo is invited to his grandfathers home. There, he meets a beautiful maid named Mariel and finds out that his grandfather has retired to a remote island and has given him ownership of his estate. Taro also discovers that not only is the estate a colossal mansion, it has hundreds of gorgeous maids ready to serve him 24 hours a day, seven days a week. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-31578:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Three high school girls have mastered the art of cooking simple, B-class dishes called JK meshi. The three girls - Reina, Ryouka, and Ruriko - are all classmates in their second year of high school. They often get distracted when studying for tests, and when they do, they cook JK meshi. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-50760:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The Teppen Grand Prix is a competition established out of an appreciation for stand-up comedy. As devoted fans of such performances, Yayoi Sakamoto and her two friends-Yomogi Takahashi and Yuzu Hosono-form the stand-up trio Young Wai-Wai. After qualifying for the final round in the prix, the three go up against other comedic trios, but only one group can emerge victorious. With participants housed in a famous dorm where many comedians before them have lodged, the contestants time living at the establishment will give them a chance to prove they have what it takes to make their audience laugh until they cry! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-43771:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'VAZZY and ROCK DOWN are the two units that make up Tsukino Talent Productions all-male VAZZROCK group. Led by Takaaki Mamiya and Shou Onoda respectively, both units announce via a round-table livestream that they are working hard to prepare for the upcoming VAZZROCK Live Flawless event. From taking extra dancing and singing lessons to starring in a TV period drama, these 12 idols must give it their all as they work toward a spectacular show that will impress their fans. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48548:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Futaro has led five quintuplets to the point where they can graduate and pursue their own dreams. Now, finally, they had reached their final school festival. Having decided to make this occasion one to remember, Futaro searches for his feelings for the five quintuplets. (source: ANN) ';}
#tags-30654:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Returning from their summer vacation, the students of Class 3-E at the prestigious Kunugigaoka Middle School find themselves up against unbeatable odds. Faced with the possibility of world annihilation, the students must come up with increasingly elaborate and creative ways to kill their teacher, the cunning yet optimistic and helpful Koro-sensei. However, eliminating Koro-sensei is not the only objective the students need to worry about. Gakuhou Asano, the academys merciless and cruel principal, seeks to prevent Class 3-Es success by brainwashing his other hard-working pupils into ruthlessly competitive studying machines. Hostility begins to linger in the air as traitors and killers alike attempt to claim the bounty on Koro-senseis head for themselves. Nagisa Shiota, one of Class 3-Es most skilled assassins, finds himself in the middle of the conflict. While he works to maintain his academic standing and prevent the end of the world, domestic affairs jeopardize his place in Class 3-E. Together with his dedicated classmates, he must now face the threats head-on. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33513:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A year can change a persons life forever. The 365 days Class 3-E of Kunugigaoka Junior High spent with their eccentric teacher, Koro-sensei, certainly did. Carrying the memories of that year close to their hearts, alumni Nagisa Shiota and Karma Akabane return to their former classroom to recall the events of that momentous time of their lives. Nagisa and Karma are reminded by the familiar rooms, desks, chalkboard, and the class album of the events that shaped them into \"assassins\" and prepared them for the real world. That is the legacy of their octopus-like teacher-who had introduced himself by threatening to destroy the world if they didnt kill him by the end of the school year-and the time spent in the bizarre yet exceptional \"Assassination Classroom.\" [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-32379:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Now branded for death and destined to be hunted by demons until the day he dies, Guts embarks on a journey to defy such a gruesome fate, as waves of beasts relentlessly pursue him. Steeling his resolve, he takes up the monstrous blade Dragonslayer and vows to exact vengeance on the one responsible, hunting down the very man he once looked up to and considered a friend. Along the way, he encounters some unlikely allies, such as a small elf named Puck, and Isidro, a young thief looking to learn swordsmanship from the former mercenary. As the ragtag group slowly comes together after having decided to join Guts in his quest, they will face incredible danger unlike anything they have ever experienced before. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-34055:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Demons have now become commonplace around the kingdom of Midland, which has fallen into chaos. The swordsman Guts still cannot stay in one place for long due to his demonic brand. He could always manage to protect himself when he was alone, but now he has the added challenge of protecting former Commander Casca, a shell of her former self who neither remembers nor trusts him. They never have a moments rest with the constant threat of demons, and they need a place where Casca will be safe till they find a way to heal her. Their elf ally, Puck, tells of the mystical land of Elfhelm, which is supposed to be a safe haven from the demons that ravage the lands. Tired and with only a vague hope, they struggle on to find a place to live-and they still need to find those responsible for the madness they are forced to endure. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-52976:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Fleeing a traumatic childhood, lone mercenary Guts drifts from battle to battle, striking down powerful enemies with his unwieldy sword. After one skirmish, Guts clashes with the mystifying Griffith and his small army known as the Band of the Hawk. The victorious Griffith drafts Guts into his ranks, granting the swordsman a kinship unlike anything he has ever known. Alongside the skilled warrior Casca, Guts helps Griffith guide the band to fame and glory. But as he gains military prestige, Griffith becomes the target of assassination attempts and political schemes. He uses Guts to further his ambitious rise to power, taking advantage of the swordsmans lack of aspiration. Even as he grows closer to Casca, Guts absence of direction robs him of any sense of belonging. Fostering opposing desires, Guts and Casca fight for Griffiths dream-although fractures forming among the trio threaten to disrupt their world. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-14967:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The Neighbors Club-a club founded for the purpose of making friends, where misfortunate boys and girls with few friends live out their regrettable lives. Although Yozora Mikazuki faced a certain incident at the end of summer, the daily life of the Neighbors Club goes on as usual. A strange nun, members of the student council and other new faces make an appearance, causing Kodaka Hasegawas life to grow even busier. While they all enjoy going to the amusement park, playing games, celebrating birthdays, and challenging the \"school festival\"-a symbol of the school life normal people live-the relations amongst the members slowly begins to change... Let the next stage begin, on this unfortunate coming-of-age love comedy!! (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-4181:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Clannad: After Story, the sequel to the critically acclaimed slice-of-life series Clannad, begins after Tomoya Okazaki and Nagisa Furukawa graduate from high school. Together, they experience the emotional rollercoaster of growing up. Unable to decide on a course for his future, Tomoya learns the value of a strong work ethic and discovers the strength of Nagisas support. Through the couples dedication and unity of purpose, they push forward to confront their personal problems, deepen their old relationships, and create new bonds. Time also moves on in the Illusionary World. As the plains grow cold with the approach of winter, the Illusionary Girl and the Garbage Doll are presented with a difficult situation that reveals the Worlds true purpose. Based on the visual novel by Key and produced by Kyoto Animation, Clannad: After Story is an impactful drama highlighting the importance of family and the struggles of adulthood. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-6351:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'On a rainy day, Ryou Fujibayashi musters up the courage to confess her feelings to Tomoya Okazaki. Despite not knowing each other for long, the two start dating and develop a harmonious relationship. However, tensions begin to rise when a rumor surrounding Tomoya and Ryous older sister Kyou spreads around school. Navigating through a web of emotions, Tomoya and the Fujibayashi twins determine where their love truly lies-even if it means standing in the downpour of the heartbreaking truth. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-4059:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Clannad: Mou Hitotsu no Sekai, Tomoyo-hen is set in an alternate reality where Tomoya Okazaki dates his junior, Tomoyo Sakagami. Tomoyo has been elected to be the schools next Student Council President. This is great news as she can now work toward her goal of preventing the schools cherry blossom trees from being axed. Although Tomoya is ecstatic for her, given his reputation as a delinquent in school, his relationship with Tomoyo is making them the subject of gossip around the campus, which can potentially compromise her standing as Student Council President. The school communitys disapproval of their relationship becomes more apparent when the Student Councils Vice-President and even the schools administration warn Tomoya to distance himself from Tomoyo. With the bad atmosphere widening the rift between Tomoya and Tomoyo, will Tomoya succumb to societal pressure and do as they say, or will their love for each other rise above it all? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-40416:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Soon after falling into another world, Kurumi Tokisaki takes interest in a particular white cat. Much to Kurumis disappointment, the two part ways. Kurumi later meets Hibiki Higoromo, a white haired quasi-spirit. Hibiki explains that they are at the center of a killing game between quasi-spirits. Within the Neighboring World, the spirits compete for a single wish to be granted to the lone survivor of the death-match. Understanding the rules of the game, Kurumi and Hibiki reach a compromise-a temporary alliance. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-42423:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second part of the Date A Bullet films. ';}
#tags-41461:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Despite the numerous challenges he has overcome so far, Shidou Itsukas mission with Ratatoskr is far from over. In a departure from his daily routine, Shidou encounters a starving woman lying on the street and ends up helping her. After the two arrive at her apartment, the woman introduces herself as Nia Honjou-a popular manga artist working under a pen name. However, cutting straight to the chase, Nia reveals that she is also a Spirit and is aware of Shidous secret operation. Interested in seeing his charisma firsthand, Nia challenges Shidou to win her over on a date. As he strives for an opportunity to seal her powers, Shidou learns more about Nia and her history with Deus Ex Machina Industries, a name he is all too familiar with... [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-52196:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Fifth season of Date A Live. ';}
#tags-41006:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Rika Furude and her group of friends live in the small mountain village of Hinamizawa; in June 1983, they welcome transfer student Keiichi Maebara into their ranks, making him the only boy in their group. After school, they have fun playing games and spending each day living their lives to the fullest. Despite this seemingly normal routine, Keiichi begins noticing strange behavior from his friends, who seem to be hiding the towns dark secrets from him. Elsewhere, a certain person watches these increasingly unsettling events unfold and remembers all the times that this, and other similar stories, have played out. Using that knowledge, this person decides to fix these broken worlds. However, when certain variables change, the individual is faced with a horrifying realization: they have no idea what to expect or how to stop the impending tragedy. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48488:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Rika Furude and Satoko Houjou are best friends who have lived in the small village of Hinamizawa for their entire lives. Alongside their other friends, they spend every day together, and every moment is filled with fun and laughter. However, as Rika and Satoko begin to grow older, a life-changing opportunity presents itself to both of them. Rika is determined to follow her dreams and wants Satoko by her side. Although Satoko is hesitant, she decides to walk this path with Rika. However, the realization of her dream forms a rift between them. This leaves the girls living in completely different worlds, with Rika enjoying her new life and making new friends while Satoko grows more and more isolated. Longing to return to the nostalgic days in Hinamizawa, Satoko despairs and wishes things could be changed. Just when she is at wits end, an encounter with a supernatural entity changes Satokos perception and imparts new revelations about her best friend Rika. This begins her journey to get the future she desires-by any means necessary. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-51009:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second season of Jujutsu Kaisen. ';}
#tags-53050:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Third season of Kanojo, Okarishimasu. ';}
#tags-49721:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'As summer break comes to an end, Nishikata is stoked to try out his newest pranks and finally outdo his classmate Takagi once and for all. Despite his losing streak, he is slowly getting to know the unrelenting workings of her crafty mind. However, he soon realizes that Takagis motivations behind her teasing may not be what he initially assumed. One thing is certain, though: each fun-filled day of strategizing and competing brings the two closer than ever. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Guts, a man who will one day be known as the Black Swordsman, is a young traveling mercenary characterized by the large greatsword he carries. He accepts jobs that offer the most money, but he never stays with one group for long-until he encounters the Band of the Hawk. Ambushed after completing a job, Guts crushes many of its members in combat. Griffith, The Band of the Falcons leader and founder, takes an interest in Guts and duels him. While the others are no match for Guts, Griffith defeats him in one blow. Incapacitated and taken into the Band of the Hawks camp to recover, Guts wakes up two days later. He confronts Griffith, and the two duel yet again, only this time with a condition: Guts will join the Band of the Falcon if he loses. Due to his fresh injuries, Guts loses the fight and is inducted by Griffith. In three years time, Guts has become one of the Band of the Hawks commanders. On the battlefield, his combat prowess is second only to Griffith as he takes on large groups of enemies all on his own. With Guts immense strength and Griffiths leadership, the Band of the Hawk dominate every battle they partake in. But something menacing lurks in the shadows, threatening to change Guts life forever. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49458:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Third season of Kono Subarashii Sekai ni Shukufuku wo! ';}
#tags-44204:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'During a blizzard, Masayuki Murois old high school friend pushes him off a mountain to certain death. However, Masayuki survives the fall and escapes to safety thanks to Yuki-Onna, the spirit of a beautiful young woman who is said to lead men to their demise-but all she asks in return is money. Eleven years later, Masayuki has lived a successful life, having gotten married and amassing a great fortune. But when his company collapses and his wife cheats on him, Masayuki retreats to the city where Yuki-Onna once saved him, and he reconnects with her by offering her money and tasty meals. While Masayuki recovers from his misfortunes, another one knocks on his door: his ex-wife is found beaten to death, and now only Yuki-Onna-who cannot reveal herself-can corroborate his alibi. With no one to turn to, Yuki-Onna enlists the help of the spirits God of Wisdom, Kotoko Iwanaga. Revered by the various spirits that wander the earth, Kotoko uses her extraordinary wits and cunning to solve all quarrels they may have. In her duty to protect spirits and humans from colliding, Kotoko drags along her immortal boyfriend, Kurou Sakuragawa, and promises to prove Masayukis innocence without exposing Yuki-Onnas existence. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-39808:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The carefree journeys of the four girls continue! As their fleeting yet eventful summer becomes a distant memory, the arrival of fall signals a new school year with limitless opportunities. Even as the four girls return to their peaceful routine, the appearance of new faces enlivens the anything but exciting rural life of Asahigaoka. Non Non Biyori Nonstop leisurely walks back into the lives of Hotaru Ichijou, Komari Koshigaya, Natsumi Koshigaya, and Renge Miyauchi as they fully embrace their rural lifestyles and turn anything they find into nothing but fun! [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-5341:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Traveling merchant Kraft Lawrence continues his northward journey with wolf goddess Holo, in search of her lost home of Yoitsu. Lawrence and his sharp-witted partner continue to make some small profits along the way, while slowly uncovering more information about Holos hometown. However, the road to Yoitsu is a bumpy one filled with many troubles-Lawrence runs into a charming young fellow merchant who has his eyes set on the female wolf companion, and he begins to doubt if Holo will remain by his side; he and the goddess will also have to consider precarious and risky business deals as Lawrence strives to achieve his dream of becoming a shopowner. All the while, with his determination tested at every turn during his journey, Lawrence must question his relationship with Holo, take on business ventures, and ask himself whether it is time for him and Holo to go their separate ways. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-50348:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second season of Peter Grill to Kenja no Jikan. ';}
#tags-38414:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Covered in ice and snow, Elior Forest is the home to dangerous magical beasts and 50 elves frozen in ice. One day, the great spirit Puck helps a young girl break out of her ice prison. Her name is Emilia, a half-elf born with silver hair, long ears, and amethyst eyes-features that resemble the evil Witch who destroyed half the world long ago. Shunned by society because of her appearance, Emilia dwells in the forest with Puck as her sole companion and family. Burdened with a sin of destruction she does not remember committing, she spends her days trying to find a way to help her frozen kin. But when the great spirit Melakuera, the Arbitrator of the world, finds Emilia, her right to stay alive is brought into question. Will the bonds of ice she formed with Puck prove to be the warm thread that defies fate? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-39587:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'A reunion that was supposed to spell the arrival of peaceful times is quickly shattered when Subaru Natsuki and Emilia return to Irlam village. Witnessing the devastation left behind by the calamities known as Sin Archbishops, Subaru sinks into the depths of despair as his ability to redo proves futile. As the group makes their way to the Sanctuary in search of answers, Subaru has an unexpected encounter with the Witch of Greed-Echidna. Subjected to her untamed rhythm, he is forced to dive into the spirals of the past and future. At the same time, several mysterious threats set their sights on the Sanctuary, heralding a horrific fate for the hapless people trapped within. Everlasting contracts, past sins, and unrequited love will clash and submerge into a river of blood in the second season of Re:Zero kara Hajimeru Isekai Seikatsu. Pushed to the brink of hopelessness, how long will Subarus resolve to save his loved ones last? [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-42203:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After a stern yet compelling speech by Otto Suwen, Subaru Natsuki solemnly swears that he will successfully make it through this timeline and save everyone he can along the way. The first step toward achieving this goal is to help Emilia work through her past; however, that is easier said than done. Feeling as if she has been lied to by everyone around her, it will be difficult for Emilia to trust anyone, even Subaru, her self-proclaimed knight. Re:Zero kara Hajimeru Isekai Seikatsu 2nd Season Part 2 presents the culmination of Subarus experiences with the Sanctuary and its people, along with his unwillingness to give up hope on saving them. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-16051:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After their loss against Suzuridani Academy, the members of the Keishin Academy girls basketball team-Tomoka Minato, Maho Misawa, Airi Kashii, Hinata Hakamada, and Saki Nagatsuka, along with their coach, Subaru Hasegawa-exert more of their time and effort in improving in the sport day by day. However, this time around, new rivals with strengths possibly exceedings theirs and friends appear on their way to the top. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-4214:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'It has been one year since Tsukune Aono enrolled at Youkai Academy, and since then his life has taken an interesting turn. In addition to being the only human at a school for monsters, he has attracted a bevy of beautiful women who want him all for themselves: the sexy succubus Kurumu Kurono; Yukari Sendou, a witch; stalker and yuki-onna Mizore Shirayuki; and Moka Akashiya, a kind vampire who, when her rosary is removed, reveals a darker personality. But soon, trouble visits Youkai Academy in the form of Mokas younger sister, Kokoa Shuzen. She is furious that her \"true older sister\" is sealed within Mokas rosary, and vows to bring out Mokas darker self. However, Kokoas thoughtless actions may affect more than just her sister... [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-30363:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Basara Toujou has a hard life. He is the older step-brother to two demonic sisters, Mio and Maria Naruse, whom he protects from entitled demons looking to claim Mios power for themselves. On top of that, rising political tension within the demon realm only makes his job more difficult. When a messenger arrives with summons for Mio to the demon realm, she and her friends go in spite of the danger. Now on the enemys turf, Basara will have to grow stronger through erotic pleasure in order to do the impossible and protect everyone. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36688:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'No synopsis information has been added to this title. Help improve our database by adding a synopsis ';}
#tags-37804:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Four years after the production of Daisan Hikou Shoujotai, the once renowned Musashino Animation-commonly known as \"Musani\"-is in a dire state. The abrupt cancellation of an ambitious project left the company in financial turmoil, causing most of the staff members to resign. Since then, Musani has failed to create any remarkable works and gradually lost its luster. Despite her wavering optimism, producer Aoi Miyamori is unwilling to let this situation continue. Luckily, her opportunity comes in the form of SIVA, an original feature film scheduled to release in 10 months. Meanwhile, Aois friends are also facing problems with their own professions: animation supervisor Ema Yasuhara is struggling to keep up with her tight schedule; reporter and voice actress Shizuka Sakaki is discontent with the lack of anime roles; screenwriter Midori Imai has been unable to find inspiration since her previous failure; and 3D artist Misa Toudou is concerned that her excessive passion hinders her career. While the anime industry is one full of setbacks and uncertainties, the five girls are all hellbent on persevering through the arduous path ahead-which just might bring them a step closer to accomplishing their shared dream. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-53065:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Sequel of Sono Bisque Doll wa Koi wo Suru. ';}
#tags-53887:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Second season of Spy x Family. ';}
#tags-30567:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Fifth season of Teekyuu series. ';}
#tags-31440:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Sixth season of the Teekyuu series. ';}
#tags-32228:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Seventh season of the Teekyuu series. ';}
#tags-33811:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Eighth season of the Teekyuu anime series. ';}
#tags-35370:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Ninth season of the Teekyuu anime series. ';}
#tags-53913:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: '2nd Season for Tensei shitara Ken deshita ';}
#tags-27899:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Ken Kaneki has finally come to accept the monstrous, flesh-craving part of himself that he has feared and despised for so long. After escaping captivity and torture, Kaneki joins Aogiri Tree-the very militant ghoul organization that had abducted him, leading his friends to question his true motive and loyalty. As tension between the government and the ghouls continues to rise, the Commission of Counter Ghoul, the governments specialized anti-ghoul agency, has intensified their efforts to completely purge Tokyo of ghouls. This threatens the transient peace of Kanekis friends and former comrades-the ghouls at the Anteiku coffee shop. Aware of the dangerous situation, Kaneki faces several battles that puts his precious fleeting humanity on the line. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-36511:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Two years have passed since the CCGs raid on Anteiku. Although the atmosphere in Tokyo has changed drastically due to the increased influence of the CCG, ghouls continue to pose a problem as they have begun taking caution, especially the terrorist organization Aogiri Tree, who acknowledge the CCGs growing threat to their existence. The creation of a special team, known as the Quinx Squad, may provide the CCG with the push they need to exterminate Tokyos unwanted residents. As humans who have undergone surgery in order to make use of the special abilities of ghouls, they participate in operations to eradicate the dangerous creatures. The leader of this group, Haise Sasaki, is a half-ghoul, half-human who has been trained by famed special class investigator, Kishou Arima. However, theres more to this young man than meets the eye, as unknown memories claw at his mind, slowly reminding him of the person he used to be. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-37799:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'After the conclusion of the Tsukiyama Family Extermination Operation, the members of the Commission of Counter Ghouls (CCG) have grown exponentially in power and continue to pursue their goal of exterminating every ghoul in Japan. Having resigned from Quinx Squad, the now seemingly emotionless Haise Sasaki begins taking on more and more tasks from the CCG with no regard to the difficulty. Despite his vacant expressions, Ken Kanekis memories are resurfacing in Haise, leaving him in a state of internal conflict. Meanwhile, his new coldhearted behavior is affecting the people around him. Quinx Squad are left in shambles, having to cope with the death of one of their members without the support of their former mentor. Amidst this turmoil, both Quinx Squad and Haise must continue to fulfill their duties to the CCG, whether willingly or not. However, the presence of a mysterious group behind the CCG has been made known to Haise, and certain whispers of corruption have not gone unheard by the Quinx Squad as well. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-33581:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The films story begins when Arata inadvertently touches \"Hermes Apocrypha,\" Liliths Grimoire. Suddenly, he is enveloped by a bright white light, and a girl appears before him. She calls herself Lilim, and treats both Arata and Lilith as her parents. At the same time she appears, something changes in the world. The forbidden Eternal Library awakens. In the Library is sealed the ultimate culmination of Alchemy, the White Demon Lord. The White Demon Lord plots to eliminate Arata and the Trinity Seven to usurp the position of Demon Lord. Bristling with untold power, the White Demon Lord attacks Arata, and triggers a desperate crisis where Arata and the Trinity Seven must save the world in this last battle. (Source: ANN) ';}
#tags-37986:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Heavens Library to Crimson Lord brings back Arata, Lilith, and the rest of the Trinity Seven to face off against the greatest enemy in the history of the Trinity Seven; Liliths own father, who is revealed to be the strongest Demon Lord, challenges Arata who is now a Demon Lord candidate. (Source: Avex Pictures, edited) ';}
#tags-39469:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'When \"ordinary boy\" Kagami Kazuya meets the beautiful tsukumogami Kiriha, his life gets turned upside-down. As a \"Taboo Child\" who draws the supernatural towards him, he receives orders from the God of the Land, Kukuri, to become an exorcist and defeat these evil forces. And so, he and Kiriha do battle. To find out information on these supernatural beings, Kazuya and his friends set up a counselors club at school. But behind the typical-seeming troubles he hears about, he uncovers a major plot to target Kukuri... In addition to the sadistic-yet-beautiful tsukumogami Kiriha, the situation draws other girls to Kazuya to join the fray! (Source: Crunchyroll) ';}
#tags-44141:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'No synopsis information has been added to this title. Help improve our database by adding a synopsis ';}
#tags-39547:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Resolved to become a more independent person, Yukino Yukinoshita decides to smoothen things out with her parents, and the first step toward achieving that goal is to prove herself. As graduation draws closer for the third-year students, Iroha Isshiki-the president of the student council-requests a graduation prom in collaboration with the Volunteer Service Club. Yukino accepts this request of her own volition, hoping to use it as a chance to demonstrate her self-reliance, but what lies ahead of her may prove to be a hard hurdle to cross. Yahari Ore no Seishun Love Comedy wa Machigatteiru. Kan revolves around the graduation prom as emotions are poured into the preparations for the event. At the same time, a chance for the Volunteer Service Club members to better understand each other presents itself. And thus, Hachiman Hikigayas hectic and bittersweet high school life begins to draw to a close. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-48491:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'While reminiscing about her journey so far, Aoi Yukimura finds herself eager to go mountaineering once more. A likely opportunity arises when Koharu Senjuin invites Aoi to check out the Mountaineering Club after school. As the head of the club, Koharu speaks enthusiastically of the activities she and the other members partake in, especially as they strive to reach the top in various competitions. Although impressed by the clubs dedication to its goals, Aoi feels reluctant to join, preferring to learn and enjoy mountaineering at her own pace. Her experience during this brief visit, however, leaves her wondering why she climbs mountains in the first place. With the support of her friends, Aoi searches for the true motivation behind her hobby, all while continuing to train for the highly anticipated second trip to the summit of Mt. Fuji. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-38475:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'As time marches forward, Rin Shima, Nadeshiko Kagamihara, and their friends have grown into full-fledged adults. Now with careers and responsibilities, they can no longer freely spend their days camping and adventuring. However, Chiaki Oogaki, who currently works for the Yamanashi Tourism Organization, reunites the group as she comes up with an exciting proposal-to build a campground together to revitalize an abandoned patch of land from their homeplace, the Yamanashi Prefecture. Motivated by this ambitious project, the girls combine their efforts to create an environment where future generations can enjoy unique moments as they once did, all while reminiscing the charms of camping from their high school days. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-49026:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'Mystery Camp Relaxing in the heart of nature is a constant joy for Nadeshiko Kagamihara, Aoi Inuyama, and their friends. But when the camping experience changes in unexpected ways, one can only be curious about the extraordinary wonders that have yet to be explored. Tabisuru Shima Rin Gathered around a campfire, the girls of the Outdoor Activities Club and Ena Saitou all propose various ideas to Rin Shima for her next trip. However, their suggestions are tailored to their personal preferences-not to mention that Rin has plans of her own. [Written by MAL Rewrite] ';}
#tags-53410:after {font-family: Finger Paint; content: 'The third season of Yuru Camp△. ';}
